Authors
Pedro Sena
Number of Reviews
224

Title
Review for Okraina (1998)
(Seen at the 22nd Portland International Film Festival, in Portland, Oregon)
It's hard to tell if this is a farce, or a comedy, or just plainly, one of
those films that really wants to take the proverbial pogo stick and shove it
in the .... of those who really deserve it. BUT, wait a minute, who is that
person?
It is the story of a few men that had their land stolen, and then sold to
someone who ended up owning the rights to it for 100 years, so that he could
look for oil, or some other equitable resources. Well, it doesn't matter who
these rights went to. Might as well been Ross Perot. Never mind that the
people that live there need food, and have worked this land for centuries
and are not getting anything for it at all. Is this a statement on the
Capitalist world? Or is this a major attack on the failure of the new system
in Russia, where privatization seems to be aiding a few, but hurting the
most? Or is this the signal that there are inherent problems which the
country itself has not addressed?
Shot in Black and White, in a cool style that really shows the b&w of the
cold, icy country where these people live, it is the story of one man that
decides to undertake a crusade to either regain their land or avenge the
land that was stolen from them. How to get this done, is something that they
have to figure out along the way. Some of the people had been their very own
neighbors and friends, and now they are turned against each other. As the
man gathers his friends, and departs, the group has a few adventures, some
of which are very amusing.
However, there are barriers. Some of the people that engineered these
deals, did so to gain something for themselves at the cost of their friends.
In one case, he was outright tricked, or robbed.
As the entourage takes off for Moscow, they meet their adversaries, and
they have to get information as to the next step and the manner in which
they get this information is one of the times that we come to like in this
film, even if sordid. It is all a part of the deadpan humor, that is found
in this film that is often subtle, but after a while gets you going. Just
when you think the film is beginning to drag on, we crack up.
Eventually the film gets into its end, and the farmers get their due. They
get to see the Certificate of Ownership, which they undoubtedly will take
home with them. And the end of the film, is a bit of a throwaway, but it
makes the point. It is the people that matter, and must be answered to in
the long run.
Not per se a great film, but an enjoyable one that has some rather funny
moments and a type of humor that we don't always enjoy or are afraid to
appreciate. It is black humor in every sense of the word, but at the same
time it is deadly serious, since the characters have a valid point, and
deserve some recognition and respect. What the film does not say, or worry
about, is that the government is responsible for these things. The film
maintains the individualistic point of view through out and refuses to
discuss politics. We are left with a story of a few men, and their adventure
in trying to recover their very own Utopia. Well, right or wrong, the nice
thing is that they get it. How, that's another story.
Well written, and as usual, a wonderful acting exercise where
characterization is of supreme importance, and each character is very
different from the other. Few films, or plays have such a well defined cast,
and this reviewer has not been able to find information on this film that
would have helped give credit where credit is due.
Their are large musical passages in this film during the quiet moments that
induce a sense of isolation and loneliness which these people no doubt live
under, but all in all it is difficult to fault this film as inferior. It's
humor, as subtle and quick as it is, and so darn'd deadpan, keeps you on
your toes and wondering what next. It is done rather allegorically,
specially towards the end, but by then it doesn't matter. We are just happy
that this group of people was able to achieve what they needed for survival.
Even if the ending is a throwaway.
3.5 of 5 GIBLOONS
Reviewed by Pedro Sena, Copyright (c) Pedro Sena 1999. All Rights Reserved.

Title
Review for Eréndira (1983)
Erendira is not a bad film. But it does show that the Mexican community has
a knack for doing something strange, or weird, or just plain bad. This film
fits into the area of the Jodorowsky material, or some of the very odd
things that get made.  It isn't a great film, but it is rather unusually
written with its many biblical references, and an undertone
that one has a hard time deciding if it is worth laughing, or crying.
But it does try to do something with its material, and one wonders if it is
Irene Pappas that tries to save, what would otherwise be a bad film. It
comes off, as a colorfully bad Luis Bunuel film, with the themes right in
front of us, but we never see them.
It is the story, based on Gabriel Garcia Marquez' novel, of a young woman
who is kept by her mother, and is forced into prostitution to pay for
everything that the girl has ever done wrong, as a way to pay her debt to
the mother.  But as is often the case, the
young girl does get attached to one young man, and an impossible situation
arises.  She can't pay her debts, and the mother does not wish the daughter
to leave, or she would be all alone in the "desert" which is where most of
the film takes place.  But the
daughter has her clumsy moments, and these are the excuse that keeps her
trapped.
In between, is a bunch of stuff that makes little sense, it seems, as the
mother goes into a trance like state during her sleep, and tells many
stories that range from the weird to the very strange.  One thing is
obvious, they are some of the things that went through
her mind when she was a young girl, and also forced into prostitution. A
daydream coming alive.  The young girl thinks that the mother is losing it,
which she is.
And to save their love affair, the young one decides the young man has to do
a deed for her, and this deed, is unfortunately what is also going to get
her cursed into becoming exactly what her mother was. In the end, nothing
has changed it seems..... in between, there are these rather amusing, and
gypsy like settings in the beach and the desert which keeps our attention on
what is going on, which is not much, but makes us wonder.
Irene Pappas is not bad, although the way many film makers have used her,
has not made her look attractive, or strong as an actress. This film has
enough dialogue for her, but it is one of those situations where it is
really hard to figure out whether she is
helping the whole project or not. I venture to say that she makes it better,
but that may not be the case.
A strange film, well photographed, very colorful, but otherwise dull.
3 GIBLOONS
Copyright (c) Pedro Sena 1996. All Rights Reserved.
Member of the Internet Movie Critics Association

Title
Review for Hitlerjunge Salomon (1990)
Europe, and it is something that very few Americans really relate to, has
been terribly damaged from the World Wars.  Not only were countries totally
decimated, so were complete family trees, specially the one relating to the
Jewish faith.
In the past forty years, many films have depicted this destruction, and the
human suffering which it had caused.  Be it an Italian film like THE
BICYCLE THIEF, or later, the polish film KNIFE IN THE WATER, and the ability
of many film makers to begin expressing themselves through the film medium,
the main theme was always someone's incredible journey of survival against
some incredible odds.  Aside from the more unusual films about the war, like
THE TIN DRUM, almost all of them, stand up for the defense of the faith,
indeed any faith, that was oppressed.
Today, there are some people who lived in those days as youngsters, and some
of them, have finally out lived their fears, to be able to tell a horrific
story, and while they still have a sense of religious piety, they more often
than not have yet, a larger sense of self, than most.
Solomon Perel, was just such a person, who basically along the way, got a
bit lucky, and was able to survive because he went to a few schools and
learned a language or two, which as it turns out, was his saving grace.  The
struggle for survival takes many turns.  But as almost all of them  around
him fall by wayside ( they all display an over emotional response,  by the
way ) he manages to hold his head together long enough to keep himself alive
until the war ends, or his freedom, if he can find a way.  Solomon
Perel was luckier than most, he escaped to Palestine, and now lives in
Israel.
This film is more about the indoctrination of the younger ones, than it is
about anything else.  The Germans spent a lot of effort educating their
future generation of Aryans to rule the world.  And the Russians spent a lot
of time convincing many that their atheistic view point was more valid than
the opposing view point.  And of course, the Jews in the film, merely remain
faithful to their creed, imposing some rules on the young ( no
different there ), but at least, it is on a more acceptable mode.   Except
for one thing which the young man has to hide during his youth, and is a bit
of a problem in the German schools.  He is circumcised, and it came close to
costing him his life.
The film moves along very well, and is not predictable at all, which is very
similar, I'm sure to what the young Solomon had to go through.  It doesn't
have boring moments, and even includes some flights of fancy by the young
man, who has a bit if a sense of humor, even if subtle.
NICE FILM. SHOULD BE SEEN BY CONSCIENTIOUS FILM VIEWERS.
Copyright (c) Pedro Sena 1994
Member of the Internet Movie Critics Association

Title
Review for Orlando (1992)
This may not be one of the best films ever done.  And it may never go very
far in its making.  But it is a piece of work dedicated to writers and
artists that are considered a veritable underground to the currents that are
well known.
Be it the novel by the writer Virginia Wolff, which is a rambling notion
about love and its many moods, or be it the people involved in this
production, everyone involved in it, is a small artists in his/her own
right.
>From the excellent music through out, by some of the best underground
musicians around, to the outstanding showcase of costumes ( had an Oscar
nomination ), this film only suffers in that the story is not a conventional
affair, that we have DEEMED, and now DEMAND, that every movie have.  It is a
series of vignettes, all relating to Orlando in his/her various lifetimes
 from 1610 to the late 1800's ).  Let's just say that it is a slight study
of how the Romantic part of our love came and went.  And how it was
destroyed by a vision, or a desire.
Orlando is, at best, a fictitious personage, embodied to live through
various feelings, like rejection, love, until it comes across a  sensible
definition, and understanding of what love means.  And the film, like the
novel, doesn't care WHAT we think.  It just moves to the next time period.
The music changes, the costumes change,
and the character adapts to the new time frame.  And fails again.
In between there are the many notions that have ruined ten billion love
affairs.  The parentage, the romantic notions, the idealistic visions ( the
American specially ), the politics, you name it, it's all here.
The sad thing is that this film can never be considered good, unless you are
a literary minded person, who might just appreciate what SHOULD be
considered, an experiment in the exercise of writing. And an experiment in
the exercise of love as well.  How does the same person/character behave in
different times, which is a nice -- but impossible -- idea to work with.  A
modern sensibility with the romantic notions of the young American going to
fight for "freedom" would be considered a "copout" nowadays.  I much think
that
Virginia Wolff attempted to do this.
Sally Potter's film is faithful to the original writer in every sense.  It
does not give excuses.  It presents what it feels it has to, without
compromising the periodic needs.  With Tilda Swinton playing the main
character, with a face that is ready for love, but dispassionate all the
same.  A face that is stuck in the ideal, rather than the real.
Kudos should be given to the use of the music in this film.  There are some
Extremelly well thought out music pieces, and by people that have been
around a long time in the underground of the music scene in England.  And
for once, their music gets a chance to be noticed, and appreciated.  Sally
Potter also did much of the
music, thereby showing a multi talent.  I just wonder if too much of her
went into it, when she could have let others do it, and she might have
concentrated on making a film that we all in the film viewing community
could enjoy.  As it is, it is a very nice film, but a real freak of the
nature of film.
Thinking person's film.  Should qualify as ANTI-FILM of the year.

Title
Review for Cyrano de Bergerac (1990)
Cyranno is a good film.  In fact, it is much better than the first film
version of this story which brought Jose Ferrer an Oscar.
I am not a Gerard Depardieu fan.  To me, he is to the French, what Arnold
and Bruce are to the American fans.  Heart throbs.  Sometimes I am glad I am
not a woman, to have those tastes.   But Gerard, does stand out in this
film, in a role that can fit his size and lack of ability.  He has been
taught how to  read poetry, or at least, how to say it.  And at the same
time, the film is so well directed, that it probably hides Depardieu's
inability's, while allowing  for his strengths.  As in his past characters,
in many small time films ( Jean de Florette is the exception ) he usually
played the part of bad boy, or lover  who took advantage of his many
girlfriends, and a good for nothing character, his brooding tendencies seem
to fit this character.  While Cyranno is quick to his feet with his epee, he
is slow to his feet with his honesty, and love.  And the procrastination
lasts a lifetime, which the poor girl Roxanne never has  realized, or
figured out.  Either Cyranno is too shy, or this girl just is too
naive, and not a good companion for him, who is so intellectually
stimulated. After 30 years, their love is still not discussed.  Only on his
last words is he capable of telling his beloved about all his letters, and
his tries to reach her attention.
It is a statement on the ideological ways of youth, who would rather get
involved with an idea they like, rather than a person who might be good for
them, and then wonder why things didn't work out, when they could try the
ones who really care first.  Roxanne is infatuated by the young fighter and
soldier whom she thinks is trying to reach her.  The young soldier dies and
Roxanne is grief stricken, but never notices that the beautiful letters
still come to her.
The best thing in this movie are the costumes and the moody settings.  The
weakest is the whole ending, when it gets a bit soggy.
The script is written by today's best known film writer, JEAN CLAUDE
CARRIERE, whose material has now graced the stages and film screens for over
four  decades, always with satisfying results.  The talent is the mix of
well  known poetry, and lines, with a setting that is excellent, and an
atmosphere
that is really  beautiful and well lit.  With such nice costumes, if you
don't do a good job acting it all through, you just don't have it.
Anna Brochet plays the role of Roxanne, and is a bit on the flaky
( youthful ) side and loses the innocence as she gets older, but never
figures out who  her pursuer is although it is obvious to us.  Depardieu
starts strongly and  ends weakly.  It may have merited his Oscar nomination.
He is good.  But the  movie is much better.
The Steve Martin film was taken from this story, and while it is funny, it
does not have the 'tragic lovers' feel that this film and original story
does.  The Martin film is a good natured love story, based loosely on a good
story, with a much better result.  If you are, or were, a French student,
you have read  this play, with its old French style.  The poetry is good.
See it, when you feel like seeing something different.
This film won a bunch of awards in many of Europe's film festivals.

Title
Review for Chaplin (1992)
I was born during a time when Charles Chaplin was the most important part of
film, when you were a kid growing up.  And the intelectual world around me,
also liked him for other reasons, most of them with political overtones.
This film, joins both, and makes a truly inspirational film, about a legend,
who made mistakes, but also gave us so much more, that we can never measure
in the scale of enjoyment.  Much of his comedy was precious.  And he did not
repeat himself, as did most of those around him.  This bit does not go by
un-noticed by the director.
Charles Chaplin started in the early days, in the Mack Sennett stuff, as a
bit part actor.  He soon graduated to his own films, and even though he had
some terrible times, the competition for the dollar was very tough, and the
depression was just arriving, he managed to give Hollywood a dignity which
it lacked.  The Busby Berkley
stuffs looked stupid when people couldn't afford a bowl of soup.  The Mack
Sennett stuff needed money.  But Charles just did his own little films, even
with little budget, and busted out through the depression like the no one in
Hollywood could.  And he became the ultimate symbol of what the depression
is really like, with his short THE TRAMP.
But Charles' life wasn't simple.  From the early days when he felt compelled
to live a slight fantasy, until he learned of a lie, he kept himself a
constant list of ladies in waiting, and some of them were famous for trying
to hook rich people in those days ( several scandals ).  He barely escaped
one himself.  But his art form was better than ever.
In enter, the portion of his life he would rather forget.  The FBI in those
days, had no intrigue, except to try and snoop out anyone that was
un-American, or whomever, J. Edgar Hoover felt should be bothered.
But the real art survives, and little can touch it, and a small time hero
like Hoover can never touch it.  They manage to pull off an anti American
fiasco, but the whole thing looms stupid and the film makers are having a
heyday with the government's stupidity and waste of funds.
The film ends, with the famous special OSCAR that Charles Chaplin was given
for his tremendous efforts, specially during a time when it appears that all
was lost.  Charles may have been, but the tramp was not.
Superb performances in this film include Robert Downey Jr as Chaplin, and
Dan Aykroyd as Mack Sennett, and even Kevin Kline as Douglas Fairbanks.  The
surprise bit is the grand-daughter ( Geraldine Chaplin )
playing grandma, who tried so hard, to help their sons withstand so much
during such hard times.
Lovingly directed, with a respect that is not always found in much film
making these days, this longish film is a treat.  Visually, story wise, and
just about at any turn.  It is told in retrospect, as a bit of a memory, by
an aging Charles who is telling one of his biographers ( Anthony Hopkins )
about some of the events in his life. The biographer is disappointed that
there are many holes in the tale, of moments that are obviously buried, and
Charles does not wish to discuss them. like his father, and some of his more
notorious affairs.
But the film is a great tribute to one of the greatest artists the 20th
century has ever seen on film.  He may not have been perfect for himself, or
many, but he made it perfect for the audience, who just howled, and bowled
over, such tremendously funny material.
This film is worthy of all the accolades it ever got, and then some.

Title
Review for Andrei Rublyov (1969)
 While I find this film rather good, and just crying to be great, there is a
sad thing seen here..... and it is hard to tell if it is an aging film
community in Russia that is now trying to find its spark with  a new
identity, or, is it that the rapid changes in the Soviet Union have caused
the film community to fall apart, and it takes an effort by the likes of a
Tarkovsky, to keep it alive.
 There are several lapses in the print I saw, which seem to indicate that
there are a few problems in that industry.  The soundtrack is terribly
disjointed and more than once there are no sounds that appear that have
absolutely nothing to do with the events on the screen.  And the voice track
is also severely off sync in various spots, through out the vignettes in
this film.
 SYNC... that seems to be the theme if this rather long, but interesting
exercise in the development of a film that is done in 9 vignettes ( that's
how many I counted ) that cover about 23 years in the life of Andrei Rublev,
and what may have helped the painter come up with the art style that he used
to paint the Trinity church in St. Petersburg.
 The time is between 1400 and 1423, an unstable time in Russian history ( as
it was when the film was being done... ) and Andrei has been commissioned to
paint the cathedral -- but he is lacking the inner desire, or the vision, to
make his work come alive, and it takes him nearly 20 years to get to the
church for which his name is now imprinted in art history books.
 With a very typical Russian style of acting -- very serious -- long
monologues -- very detailed speech -- very thoughtful ( ie.. heads looking
upwards ) -- this film does not really bore the viewers despite its near
four hours, as much as it leaves us wondering where this story  is taking
us.  Possibly to the same discoveries that Andrei Rublev had to go through.
 The tradition of the Russian film is quite alive, even in the visual style
of Tarkovskey, something which allows the actors plenty of space to work
with, who are obviously well rehearsed, and do a fine job, even in dual
roles for at least four or five actors.
It is a good film, but are we ready for philosophy in movement, rather than
a story about a philosophy...??? That is Tarkovskey.

Title
Review for Tacones lejanos (1991)
The Spanish have a knack for the surrealistic, and really weird sometimes.
The story is about a fading 'star' actress that retreats at midlife to
Mexico ( very common ) in order to keep her career going.  And her daughter
stays behind.  Several years later, she returns to Spain, and gets all kinds
of attention ( publicity ) by the press.
The daughter married her former lover and producer.  And the mother
rekindles her affair with him as well.  And the whole thing gets tangled up
so badly that one wonders what is going to happen next.
Amidst all this, there is a cross dresser who does the night club circuit by
singing several songs by the famous actress.  And this person has a very
special mark, by which he is known.
There are many traces of Luis Bunuel in this film.  The story appears to be
a real mess until it cleverly gets tied up.  And even several characters are
hanging in thin air, because they don't know what is going on.  And of
course the DEUX EX MACHINA works very well, and cleans up the whole
thing.......ohh well.
It's a funny film at various moments, and it is at times really poor,
reminding me of some really bad soap operas found on the Mexican stations.
This film by Pedro Aldomovar is a good film and it has its bits of fun.  And
it is kind of fun not knowing what is going to happen.
It's worth seeing when you are curious about something else which you have
not seen.   The Spanish surrealism, and political in jokes may leave you
cold, but they are funny.  Typical Spanish offering.  You can't make out
weather it is serious or just fun.

Title
Review for Henry & June (1990)
If you are not a literature person, skip this film.  And if you don't care
about what freedom meant at the time when prohibition went beyond your doors
to tell you everything from behavior, to belief, then skip this film.
This film is about the anarchy of mind and body, which releases all tensions
and ideas, into an area of free thinking, and creative mind/body exercises
which in this case, became what today is considered literature.  Anais Nin
does not have her name in history of literature, as well placed as Henry
Miller's does, but her ability to chronicle the life of those around her,
and describe her own personal experiences, sexual, sensual, or otherwise,
set her apart, as a writer who could easily rival the seasoned material of
someone like LAWRENCE DURRELL ( the ALEXANDRIA QUARTET ) and D. L. LAWRENCE,
whose work we have read in school.  And more than likely, her position is
not established because she is a woman, in a world of publishers and artists
that was, and still is, ruled by men whose intent still may be questioned.
This is not a film about Henry Miller, June and Anais.  This is a film which
spends its time lovingly exploring that which becomes the writer's muse, and
as such, it is an excellent, and truly beautiful piece of work.
Henry Miller was depressed with the state of the affairs of art and
literature in New York, in the twenties and thirties, and decided to move to
Paris, to join a group of many writers and artists, and near the hot
cultural center which produced some of the most important and influential
artists of this century.  It was the SURREALISTS under the manifesto
published by Andre Bresson, who decided that art should be free of all
constraints, which gave us the likes of Salvador Dali, Luis Bunuel, Jean
Cocteau, and later the  generation of Jean Paul Sartre, Albert Camus, Jean
Genet, Samuel Beckett,
and too many others to mention.  And it was in the many sidewalk cafes and
the many nights of sharing ideas, and visions, where many met, and entwined
their life's work into a sweet mesh of creativity, which still burns
brightly today.
In Paris, Henry Miller met Anais Nin, a happily married society woman, who
had a penchant for diary writings.  Henry enticed her to create a bit of
erotic literature.  Their affairs became one of true erotic adventures,
which added a different dimension to Anais' life and marriage, while also
helping Henry forget the ghosts of a failed marriage, and a failed writer,
which he considered himself to be until the fifties, when his writings begun
to be noticed full scale.
Phillip Kaufman's film of this period, and its development on two literary
persons, really expresses the best and the worst of the scene.  The best was
the excitement of the affairs, and the resulting little short story, or set
of lines in the diary.   The worst was that there wasn't a place where these
things could be published.  The happy medium was that it could be read out
loud and enjoyed in a sidewalk cafe, and not be torn down to shreds by a
literary critic, before it was helped by another writer.
Personally, I have never been a great fan of Henry Miller.  But he is a very
clever, and well thought out writer, who happens to know what he is writing
about.  In other words he is not lost in his ideas, and his works are not a
set of organized ideas and thoughts.  His works are the lives of many, and
their anatomical ways in every sense.   Anais Nin, I have just recently
read, and while it is nice, it has not aged well.  Victorian Literature, and
its indecent companion pornographic genre, had tested the erotic space, but
had not affected anything new.  Anais Nin did, by interjecting the erotic
feeling of thought behind the actual happening in a descriptive mode which
has a sleepy side to it, if not a dreamy sensuality to it.  Next to much
unpolished garbage in film, television and literature today, it is excellent
stuff.  By itself, it pales a little, and has a sort of eighteen year old
diary feel to it.  The film does too.  Compared to the blatantly distasteful
stuff one sees in Madonna these days, Anais Nin is fabulous, in that the
women and men in her works are not toys, they have feelings, and they live
those feelings, from Henry, to June, to any lover that Anais spends her time
with.  Madonna's expressions are that of a lack of appreciation for a good
person, and a desire to hurt, or protect the hurt person, who no longer
looks for redemption on self, but by preying on others weaknesses.
THIS IS A MAGNIFICENT FILM.
THERE AREN'T VERY MANY FILMS THAT DEPICT THE HIGHS AND LOWS OF A CREATIVE
ARTIST, AND HOW THEY FUNCTION.

Title
Review for Nadja (1994)
As vampire films go, this is nothing new, and it lacks the styling that have
made the genre famous in the movies the past 20 years. But as a new style,
this is a different film, more like watching the old Bela Lugosi classic
than anything else.
The thing which makes it comparable to that early standard, is its tonality,
and near black and white filming, which adds an eery intent to the who
thing, in serious playing around with shadows, and movements, something that
we take for granted nowadays in any kind of film, and even consider boring
by most standards.
Nadja, like the original it seems to copy, is slow, and the accent is on the
movement and the acting of each particular person, rather than the vampire
story film, where we know that the vampire has to be done away with.
But unlike the religious doodaas that usually permeate those films, this one
does not touch that area, and instead concentrates on the relationships that
Nadja has, and can, or can not maintain, and her desire to control her
urges, so she can have a longer relationship.
I suppose that the best thing in this film is the directing and the shooting
style.... you would be surprised how a well  designed pose, makes the
actor/actress look better and stronger. But all in all, this is not a very
strong film, though it has that quality that reminds me of the style that
used to be around the Warhols and such.
The film is a bit on the nightmarish's/trippy/weird side, but this is its
strength.  It makes sure that nothing is like
any other vampire film.  It spends time with its main character and her
feelings, towards someone, or in general. And if forces us to come to like
this person, whose need is different than others.
In the midst of all this is a crazy looking and acting Van Helsing, the
ultimate commentary on the heroic stance that has been the trademark for
that character. In this case he is almost satirical and a lunatic. The film
does not glorify him, and makes him  look crazy and off the wall, as someone
that has little respect for relationships, specially those that last into
other ages, and generations.  All of a sudden, this doctor is no different
a vampire than those he wants to destroy... he is on a mission that recalls
the same urges as the vampires he chases.  While this is not exactly new,
Peter Fonda's drugged out style stands out, as either out of place, or a
very clever move by the directing and writing crews.
Not a great film, but one that might be interesting for those that enjoy
vampire films... no morals here.. just a story.

Title
Review for Beautiful Dreamers (1990)
AWAKENINGS, with Robin Williams, gave us a side to a part of the world that
is a bit on the sordid side, and almost always not helpful to the few that
are a bit on the needy side.  Where AWAKENINGS leaves us feeling sad, and
unable to live with the consequences, BEAUTIFUL DREAMERS comes through.  And
it comes through  showing that there are many ways to deal with the human
condition,
love being the single most important factor of all....and experimenting with
elements which science almost never considers being the other.
All in all, the late nineteenth century is shown as the century where
medicine begins to study its more sordid side for curing people by cutting
more into them, instead of the option of trying different things and
processes which have been used for many ages, by many different cultures.
And the film begins with just that.  The disabled, physically and otherwise,
are the test rats upon whose bodies all forms of experiments are conducted,
and at a famous conference a certain R. M. Buck goes to detail his own
ideas, only to quit before he gets started because almost all the serious
doctors are veritable doctor Frankenstein's, rather than healers.  And in
the audience is an elder gentleman with a large beard and temperament, who
makes fun of a few of the experiments, much to the chagrin of the audience
of doctors.  And this elder man as it turns out is the free thinker Walt
Whitman, in a time when this type
of thinking is not considered to be in vogue, although he seems to do very
well.
Mr. Buck's wife, who is having doubts about her husband's ways, as is the
institution that employs him, is also planning on ending a relationship,
because she herself does not understand what is going on, and how the free
thinking poet is actually interfering with her relationship.  But in her
solitude and despair it is the few words of the poet which bring her around,
to realize that what is happening is more than meet the eye, and in
actuality, it is the correct and best thing....and the humane thing to do.
Amidst all this, is the poet who refuses to be pegged down to a definition,
and comes up with a line or two at a party which alienates the crowd
somewhat.....certainly not the classical style of words they wanted to hear.
As time goes by, and with the suggestion of the poet, the doctor begins to
lead his motley crew into exercises of fun, and socializing with the
affluent which in the end leads to success and the fall of the priest and
mayor whose attitudes are more conformist than they are positive and
spiritually guided.
Of all the films I have seen this year, few stand out as true victories of
the human spirit, and it takes one story of a free thinker, or two, to bring
out a sense of beauty in the human spirit which is not always found in many
films.  The winners are the disabled, that are now considered better people
instead of test animals.  And unlike the film AWAKENINGS, this film makes
other doctors turn their minds to what is happening, and how it is going to
be.
All in all, it also shows the desire that a few countries have for finding
new cures for the most disabling things, rather than the strict medical
style that tends to be de-humanizing.  In England, there still are
experiments being carried out which also involve arts and totally different
ways of dealing with society's disabilities.  R. M. Buck's ways was but one
of them.
With an excellent cast, and an ability to show something which is poignant
and at times unpleasant, this film is truly beautiful and stands out as one
of the few.

Title
Review for Haut bas fragile (1995)

FILM TITLE:         HAUT BAS FRAGILE (Up,Down,Fragile)
DIRECTOR:        JACQUES RIVETTE
COUNTRY:          FRANCE 1995
CINEMATOGRAPHY: CHRISTOPHE POLLOCK
MUSIC:                FRANCOIS BREANT
CAST:                  Laurence Cote, Marianne Denicourt, Anna Karina, Andre
Marcon, Nathalie Richard, Bruno Todeschini, Christine Vezinet
SUPER FEATURES: The acting, as usual. Nice, dreamy, dance sequences.
 It's been said, in a few reviews of Jacques Rivette's work, that he has a
serious admiration for the American musical film. Whether this is true or
not, may be of inconsequence to the fact that this film has some song and
dance routines in it, and that one can just about tell when they are going
to break into it .... well, we knew that in the Hollywood musicals, too, so
that's not a surprise.
 But the difference here, may be how it is used. In most of the famed
Hollywood musicals, the world stops for the song, and then it continues
again. The way Jacques Rivette uses this is more subtle, and kind makes each
person and character have their own identification with the Hollywood
musical, by breaking into it when the situation brings it about. The next
question is, is this a musical? No. Then what is it?
 A more subtle answer comes in the way that Jacques Rivette does his films,
and shows us his characters. Basically, these are people that have grown up
seeing Hollywood musicals on the telly, and their inspiration comes across
various times, for three of the women. The fourth one, is apparently too
worried about a song she likes, to be able to dance, although her moves in
her own bedroom, are totally dance like, and appear choreographed.
 Story .... story .... a bit more difficult of a proposition. Basically this
is a day in the lives of four women, some of which connect, and some who
don't, but they all share a liking for musicals, and on occasion break into
singing. Even though, this appears rather mechanical like Hollywood
musicals, there are times, when the apparent intent, is not to sing and
dance, as we would expect, at all, but merely to go through the motions to
show that this is something that the character likes. If something like this
is the intent, this is a magnificent film for the actors. They get a chance
to live out their character;s fantasies and inspirations, which more often
than not have to be left behind to a set of words, or a minimal action. Here
they are shown. One could easily say that Ninon likes things that come to
the age of FAME, SATURDAY NIGHT LIVE, and that Louise is a great fan of Gene
Kelly, but this might be to degrade the film of its own personality. The two
girls interpret many of their feelings through a song, or dance.
 The odd thing, is that it takes nearly one third of the film for the first
dance sequence to break through, and it is Ninon, who has bumped into
someone she is beginning to like, even if he, at first, proves elusive and
not trustworthy. Their routine is actually very sensuous and they spend the
rest of the film looking for that spark through which to make their
relationship get a start. Louise, by comparison, is recovering from a coma
she has been in for several years, and though she does not exactly look
healthy ( awfully skinny and bony ), she appears to be improving through the
film, and it is in the end, when we really find that she is actually the
strongest of the characters, and can make decisions faster than the others.
She decides in one moment if her relationship to a pursuer is going to start
it is going to begin at that very point, when he has to tell her the whole
story surrounding her father's whatever, and then they will make love right
there on the spot. By contrast, Ninon, is moody and spacey, and too much
into her own dancing craze to lounge music. And Ida, is also moody, and
volatile, spending her time trying to find a song she heard many years
before, which a local singer appears to have done.
 Acting. This whole film, like all Rivette endeavors, is nothing but acting,
at its best. It's really hard to fault anyone in the film, and the
continuity is actually impressive considering the film is so long, and that
all of a sudden, we are at the end. The women, have a very impressive sense
of self through out the film, and this adds to the movement of the film.
Nothing seems to be out of place, and the continuity does not waver from its
very own form. Which would seem to render it to be a very good film. It is.
But not for American audiences, who are used to fast moving films that have
no character depth at all. By contrast, then, this is a director that deals
strictly with character depth.
 The only annoying thing about Jacques Rivette's work, is that the general
perception is that there is some sort of intellectual exercise in action,
some metaphysics, that the director is engaging in, which for the most part
is hogwash. There is no way, from an actor or director's point of view that
anyone can contrive a scale of order for the actor to deliver all the lines
and be perfect and clean all the time. No one would be able to afford those
kinds of endeavors, and the time it takes to make them. The film then, is a
result of magnificent studying by the actors, of each character's role in
their own world, much similar to how Mike Leigh works, something that is
very important to French Experimental Theatres, with the likes of Peter
Brook doing their thing in Paris. But this is not so much "studying" as it
is "doing", thus creating a physical environment for each character to work
in. As such, then, the result are characters that we can relate to, that do
not appear out of place, and disconnected with their world, even if they are
thinking... well, it helps that they think out loud, in so many ways, and
the director creates situations so none of the characters have to think by
themselves.. this is the chance they have to open up, and they do, even if
it is a song, or a dance.
 Very nice film, although, sadly, if it were left to American audiences, it
would have long been buried by now. This director deserves recognition for
the magnificent work he does with actors, which is second to none.

Title
Review for Bach et bottine (1986)
This is more of a children's story and film than it is an adult film.
However, it is capable of coming through as a victory for all the children
who are capable of teaching their superiors a little more about life than
would otherwise be noticed, and as such, this film wins.
A child is left orphaned, and has been living with an aging grand mother who
has to move to a rest home in order to get the care she needs.  And for this
to happen, the child has to move into the house of the granny's son, who is
a musician, who is studying for a contest of Bach's work.  When the child
moves into the house of the son, he is an introvert, whose only refuge is
the music he adores.  His own life is a pathetic affair of shyness, and a
lack of  inability to tell people how he feels, the fact he loved the girl's
mother but never had the guts to ask her to marry, or share space with her,
being
the most important of all.
The little girl has a pet skunk named Broccoli, who happens to create a
little uproar in the house, until a room is found in the basement for him,
and where she proceeds to start a zoo for all stray animals.  During this
whole time, the son is trying to find a home for the child, and finally
succeeds.  It happens at the same time when the competition is on, and she
walks out just  when it is obvious he is about to win it all.  But his win
will be an empty  one as he happens to see the little girl walk out of the
room.
Amidst all this, the little girl tries to set him up with a woman who has a
liking for him, but isn't capable of cracking his shell.  And when the
little girl walks, so does the lady.  The child checks out the sad, and
pathetic, new home she has been chosen to go to.  He discovers his mistake,
and lack of
care for anyone, and sets about putting it all in order.  The film ends with
the couple together, with an adopted child, and of course a skunk.
Excellent acting, and the children are great, not to mention the skunk who
manages to find itself in the oddest places.
Copyright (c) Pedro Sena 1994
Reviewer and Moderator of the CENTIPEDE's THE FILM.

Title
Review for My Father the Hero (1994)
This is probably a film for Gerard Depardieu fans only.  It isn't great, it
isn't bad, and it has a few gags, and moments to keep us having some fun.
It is the story of a man and his daughter that go on a holiday, so he can
figure out what the hell he wants to do.  He is a hopeless romantic, and can
not make up his mind about the woman that loves him.
In the process, he ends up learning about his teenage daughter, who is
growing up ( literally ) and is having the time of her life, with her dad in
tow.  She ends up getting a few dates, and is in the way of learning
something, but she is having a terrible time, since she has started a habit
of lies, lies, lies, and stories, to make up for what she feels are her
inadequacies.
While not the funniest film around, it does have its good moments, and weird
bits.  But it is enjoyable, if not an ego acting showcase for Gerard
Depardieu, who is good.

Title
Review for Marusa no onna (1987)
Juzo Itami, has been doing films, which, on the surface are comedies.  But
in every aspect, they are deadly serious.  A TAXING WOMAN, is a story about
a auditor for the local IRS system, which the Japanese have.  She has the
task of sniffing out the whole situation, and then get the law enforcement
agents to take over the corrupt companies.  And she gains respect, and a
promotion, on the way to doing her job well.
This time, her target is a Mr.. Gondo, who is laundering money, to avoid
taxes.  And her efforts are endless, and they almost fail, were it not for
an accidental moment in the film.  Mr.. Gondo looks innocent indeed, but all
the purveyors he works with do not seem to show the bills correctly... they
all are mis-matched.  The large place, where men take on many mistresses
looks awfully busy ( and they are proud of doing such nice business ), but
their books do not reflect this.
Ms Itakura gets on the ball and finally begins cornering everyone, except
the elusive Mr.. Gondo.   They are about to quit, frustrated, when a slight
accident reveals the hidden room where many of the
artifacts and receipts she is looking for are hidden.  And the invalid Gondo
is finally caught.  An aging man, whose sole purpose in life has been to do
well, and succeed, as he was brought up to do.  And as the taxing woman
 nice pun on her job ), is ruthless enough to be considerate, but never
gives in to him, who wants to take her on as a mistress.  She has become
more modern ( I suppose ) and her view is less historic.  She is not about
to become a mistress to someone she does not have a reasonable respect
for.... and Gondo is in her way of succeeding as well, although, by all
intentions,
hers is honest, whereas Gondo's were not.
There are moments when the film breaks into a satire, which it is meant to
be.  And the film has gags a plenty to keep everyone satisfied.  But the
inevitable question is, where does the satire end, and the story start....
they both go together.
In between, the film has sight gags that are Monty-Python'esque... scenes
where a crowd walks by in front of the camera at a fast pace, too busy, and
the like.  The un-impressed Itakyra, knows darn well that if this happens
they are hiding something, and  they leave enough doors open for her to do
her job.... and she jumps on it.
A few things are showcased here.... the film is also an interesting comment
on the rise of women in Japanese society.  Their work is being noticed as
being worthy of much more than a mere mistress, something which Gondo is
fond of, but is incapable of correcting.  And it is a woman, that undresses
him one more time, for taxes.  The only thing that Gondo does not see, a
throwback to the old times, is that he could very easily hire this woman to
do his books, and accomplish the same thing....
Fun film to watch.  Clever photography, which tends to corner people with a
camera when they are caught, and leave them in wide open spaces, when they
can not be reached.... well thought out, and,
FUNNY.
Copyright (c) Pedro Sena 1994
Reviewer and Moderator of the CENTIPEDE's THE FILM.

Title
Review for Brazil (1985)
I think that Monty Python, for the most part was an over indulgent group of
comedians, that lacked a solid direction.  This was quite apparent in most
of their work, in that it was ever changing and rarely took on a different
tone from their usual dialogue oriented sketches.  There are some bits which
were always pleasing, but all in all, while they produced a very good amount
of work, they never could reach the beauty of their predecessors, like THE
GOONS [ Peter Sellers, Spike Milligan and Harry Secombe, a BBC serial of
radio comedy sketches with various ( same ) characters going through
different adventures. ]; or even Peter Cook and Dudley Moore [ with their
off the wall Derek & Clive albums ], whose material was beautifully written
and acted out.
But Monty Python did have one thing that most of these didn't have. Where
the Goons were a radio cartoon, Monty Python mixed in a series of cartoons
to  their work,... thanks in part to their only American member,  Terry
Gilliam.
>From the opening sequence of their show ( the news caster is wheeled off
thru the streets of London until he is dumped off the peer ), in between
their theatrical moments, and on occasion mixed in their films, perhaps this
man's work was, consistently, the part which added a little more laissez
faire  attitude of the spirit to the otherwise quasi intellectual dialogue.
It was no wonder that Terry Gilliam became a film maker, because his work
was all visual, and above all, a bit weird, perfect chemistry for the
celluloid.
There were a handful of films done by HANDMADE FILMS ( George Harrison's
group ) which Terry participated in, I believe the early Python films, Time
Bandits, culminating with The Life of Brian, when it was obvious that a
small studio wouldn't be able to handle the proportion of growth which these
guys were developing.  Terry Gilliam designed the settings for THE LIFE OF
BRIAN and put together a slick cartoon in the middle of it ( the small
spaceship that goes for a trip in the galaxy before crashing next to Reg and
the boys ) that set the tone for his later work.
BRAZIL is the first Terry Gilliam film that marked he was on the way to
becoming a major director and writer.  It was a futuristic tale of a gross
computer mistake that did away with the wrong man as a revolutionary, in a
society which spends much of its time eliminating those who do not agree or
live by the rules,.... a little of agilicism, anyone ...??? ... And amidst
all this rumble, is a loner of a guy, who lives his visionary space, and has
hopes of leaving the place he inhabits.  He fantasizes in an over exuberant
fashion, which comes alive in the screen, making it that much bigger,... and
a come down when he has to continue on with the daily chores.
His fantasy girl is not only a revolutionary ( he is tired of the senseless
system ), but also beautiful, and dreamy, if not a bit too violent at first,
until later she relents and becomes .... a woman.  Compared to the rest of
the women in the film who are mostly vain and totaly overdone with make up.
All in all, it is hard not to appreciate this film, although its pace is too
fast for most film go'ers.  You have barely figured out what has happened
and the next bit is on the way.  And if you don't listen carefully, all the
lines get wasted.  In between, is a beauty of enjoyment and a harsh
statement on the modern systems of today, where people do not mean anything,
unless they have to be eliminated because they do not fit.
Jonathan Pryce is absolutely excellent.  And the endless cast of characters
that comes in and out of the film is fun to keep up with.  Everyone has a
bit part somewhere.
There are few futuristic films that discuss the paranoia, and the fears that
we have regarding it.  The lack of human-ness is what this film is really
about.  The ending is most satisfying in that for once the FANTASY has won,
and the social order does not stand a chance. Sam Lowry has a smile, and
that's all that matters to both you and I.  The vision has won, the social
beast has lost.

Title
Review for Mitt liv som hund (1985)
Growing up is not easy.... of fun, for Ingmar and his older brother.  The
mother is sick and won't make it for very long so he is shuffled off to his
uncle's.... where his mis-adventures continue.
And the only friend he has made in during these tough years for him are
another young girl he has met while at his uncle's. Their way of meeting is
with a pair of gloves and a little boxing.  It seems to be the rage at the
time in the fifties, when these kids are growing up.
The children are having a hard time with their mother, whose sickness the
family is trying to hide.  And the fact that for some reason, the older
children are always picking on the young Ingmar, and their noise and
emotional brouhaha's are something that the ill mother can no longer deal
with, or survive.  She needs the quiet space.
And the young Ingmar is forced to come to grips with the other kids around
him.  He is always considered a failure and is picked on by his elders.  He
seems to crave a little respect and care, if not understanding.  And he
finds it, in another young girl that also has a similar chip on her
shoulder.  She also has a mean pair of fists.  But their fights, while they
seem to be the fiercest of them all, seem to always end up in each other's
arms, hugging and appreciating each other.
Ahhh, pre-teen days look better for Ingmar.  The young girl has become his
best friend, and she is someone he can hug, and lay his head down on, since
his mother is now almost dead, and he has finally accepted it.
A loving film, that very much displays a lifestyle that appears to be sad
and hopeless for many children, boxing gives this film an inch of freedom,
and a way to make friends, in a life style that has the makings for a
boring, no meaning lifestyle at all.  It is a kid's film, in the sense that
it is all about Ingmar's plight and story, but by doing so, it also adds a
larger picture.... in an isolated country place, there is almost nothing for
these children to get inspired by, except in this case, a pair of gloves,
for which one famous night a Swedish boxers broke through and showed the
world that dreams can come true.

Title
Review for Johnny Stecchino (1991)
I had not seen roberto Benigni, when I was told that I should see this film.
I had been debating seeing the latest Pink Panther film, specially when I
happen to be a Peter Sellers fanatic.  Well, who cares about the panther
film, anyway..... this is more like it, and better.
Johnny Stecchino is one of those films that one gets sucked into without
knowing why, and eventually, it is because of the double role which the lead
actor plays, and even though the acting could be considered a bit campy, it
is nice, and a good shift of space.
A lonely guy, happens upon a woman, and falls in love with her, and he
thinks she is in love with him.  And he finds her ( or she keeps track of
him, which is more likely ) a few times, until he is invited to her place in
Malta.  Lo and behold, as it turns out, he is a carbon copy of the girl's
husband who happens to be a Mafia guy who has fallen on
hard times and is being chased around.  And the plot is to try and get the
double shot so the other two can run off.
And the rest is an array of misadventures, that are funny and off the wall,
with very subtle gags, and unusual situations.  And a tour de force for
Roberto Benigni, who also directed the film.
While it isn't the world's best comedy, it does have some very odd comedy
bits, that directly say something about both the church and the state, and
of course the Mafia.... it seems that if you are in the right side you are
government, and if you are in the wrong side you are Mafia..... Ohh
well.....

Title
Review for Rob Roy (1995)
This is a much better film than most people expect. And unlike many films
that show a lot of class, this film also adds a tremendous
showcase of acting, that is exceptional.  One need only watch Tim Roth, in
an exceptional performance as the bad guy in this film,
to recognize that indeed this is an Oscar level performance, and extremely
well deserving of its nomination.  Winning it will
depend on the amount of favoritism for home town actors.
ROB ROY is the story of an Irish man, who became a folk hero and leader of a
large group of Irish people, with whom various kings
had some problems.  And as is usually the case, there were many instances
where there are political interests that interfere
with the people's plans, if not the king's.  In this case, one of the king's
best men, has become a bit of an enemy, and
spends the whole film chasing, and finally getting a chance to  meet his
nemesis.
In between, we get all the intrigues that make this story worth while, and
special. Rob Roy's wife gets raped, and most of his
village gets destroyed.  But in the long run the honest prevail in this tale
between good ad evil, and whose side is the right
one, the law, or the people.
This is a very well directed film, at least it is done with much care and
attention to detail, and while the main character, played
by Liam Neeson, does not display much of the definition and attention to
detail that all others do, he at least tries to hold his own.
A lot of it may just be a struggle with the dialect, but all in all he does
alright.... it might have been easier to have cast
someone local, with a better handle on the language to get a stronger film.
But Liam is not bad, although one gets the
feeling that he is struggling with his lines at times. By comparison, the
work of Tim Roth as the villain, and John Hurt
as the king, are much smoother and well done.
In many ways this is the way Hollywood likes it. A good looking man to
attract the ladies, and the rest a cast of magnificent loons
that can hold just about any script they are given. Tim Roth's work, is just
way above and beyond all others, and stands out as
the single element that moves this film as far as it does, and creates a
more powerful conclusion to the epic.
With some magnificent cinematography, displaying the virgin country sides,
this is a very pretty film to see, although it
has its moments where the violence is a bit too strong.  But, the director
keeps these moments to the minimum.
Excellent film all around. Worth seeing.  Well directed.
One word.... Tim Roth.

Title
Review for Babettes gćstebud (1987)
Babette has been the wife ( or mistress, the film does not clarify it ) of a
noble in France, whose life is in trouble due to the political situation
that ever changed during the 1850's.  And a famous musician takes a doctor
mandated vacation to Sweden to get away from  the pressures of the music
scene, or to get away from the new government.  In the place where he is, he
meets two twin sisters that are the daughters of an old line minister whose
work still lives on.  One of the sisters has a magnificent voice,
and the singer takes her on as a student, to try and develop her talent. But
when she denies his request to travel with him, and tour with that wonderful
voice, he lives back to France.  A few years later, a woman is taken to the
doorstep of the two sisters, with a message from the singer to take her own
as she is a victim of another revolution.  She becomes the maid of the house
and does all the cooking.
As is befitting all hopefuls, she buys an occasional lottery ticket, and one
day finds out that she has won.  And she proceeds to set up a feast for
everyone around.  Her feast involves some of the delights
which are afforded by an upper class, and the resident family and friends
are somewhat anguished by what is being served.  A special guest, a minister
of something or other happens to come by.  And he
partakes in the meal.  He is astounded at the service and the quality, which
all the other members of the family are trying so hard to ignore, and avoid,
but are eating so not to offend the cook, and the special moment which
celebrates the spirit of the father of the twins.
For a simple film, with no great pretentious, to come off so well, and show
up many others, is an accomplishment in itself.  The film carries some
outstanding acting, even if subdued by the sisters and the town residents so
firmly entranced in their religious fervor. And they partake in the meal,
probably enjoying it, but not admitting it out in the open, lest they feel
that they are offending the
humble leader which taught them.
Babette spends all of her earnings to acquire the food, all fresh, and the
special wines and desserts that go with it.  The special guest, the
minister, is astounded that he is eating such incredible food,
which he had only tasted once in a particular restaurant in Paris, the
suggestion being that Babette was the chef in that place.
An excellent film, with some rather profound moments, and sayings, to keep
us entwined in its ideas, it is a bit slow, but it provides an exceptional
showcase for all the actors.  The film is softly directed, with no sweeping
angles, or fast camera movement, in order to display the slow lifestyle
which these people enjoy all year round.
This film won an Oscar for Best Foreign Film, and deservedly so.  It has
some very well done musical moments, showcasing some period music which was
played in the French courts for the amusement of the kings, and the upper
class, thanks to the lively Mr. Pappon, who is so happy to have found a
wonderful voice to duet with, but saddened when he  can not partake in the
enjoyment of sharing that voice with another audience, other than a living
room.  In many ways, it is a statement that the best work is done in the
privacy of our own spiritual work, rather than in the clubs, saloons, and
concert halls.  And it takes a special type of people not to share it with
anyone else but their own kin.  In an industrial society, we might say that
this is foolish.
But, even in the worst of times, in the wrong place, some wonderful things
can happen.....
Copyright (c) Pedro Sena 1994
Reviewer and Moderator of the CENTIPEDE's THE FILM.

Title
Review for Jing ke ci qin wang (1999)
FILM TITLE:  The Emperor and the Assassin
Failed love stories, are something else. When told in ways that make it even
bigger, it's another. And then there are lines like "the face that launched
a thousand ships to sea", which the story of this film closely resembles.It
is a time when soothsayers, and many others have predicted, and expected,
that what is today China should become one nation, one empire. But there
were five or six major provinces that were extremely independent and they
would fight many an alliance, or such an act, if they themselves did not
feel that they had the right to unite the whole area. Ying Zheng, is now the
emperor of Qin, and he is making an attempt to unite the rest of the
provinces into one empire.
What one did not expect, or have any idea of, is that this film maker has
turned himself into a veritable David Lean, with incredibly well designed
shot sequences, and artistic outlooks that are not always, if ever, found in
films at all. The sumptuousness and carefully detailed shooting sequences,
and cutting of this film, along with its grandeur, is an amazing thing to
see. This is a great film, at when it comes to the technical side of things.
As mentioned in a previous review of another Chen Kaige film, I felt that
the daring shooting style that Christopher Doyle employed in Kaige's
previous film was going to take what was predominantly an acting exercise,
into another area. The film stakes were being raised then, and films like
"The Emperor's Shadow", "Temptress Moon" were exercises in that direction.
What I did not imagine when I said that, was that it was not only about the
acting, but just about everything else in the film. It comes to mind
immediately the one thing that I believe really stands out in this work, and
it is the music of Zhao Jiping. Like those that glorified the great films of
Cecil B. De Mille and David Lean, this man has been allowed a chance to let
the music also add to the mix, and the results are fascinating. In "The
Emperor's Shadow", this was quite evident, and the director Chen Kaige had
no qualms about allowing the music to take over the film and lead us, when
needed. In this film, the continuity is sacrificed some, into chapters,
because the story elements jump so much, but the music allows us to forget
all that and blends the various sections beautifully ... I am inclined to
think that the directorial direction to use fades between sequences was not
exactly needed, but the film works as it is. Still the same story, but the
other view points and opinions need to come into play to make sure that we
have a whole film in the end. The end result is a five part story, that
takes a look at the very first Emperor in China, and what he had to do to
get there. it was a magnanimous ideal then for the Emperor ... likewise for
the film.
 The young Emperor and Lady Zhao had been friends for some time. He ahs
always loved her, but she has always been very independent and there are no
indications in this film that there had been anything between them beyond
friendship. At the start, Lady Zhao wants to simply be worthy of being a
part of the court ... no doubt getting a lot of flack from other nobles as
to why she is there in the first place. What turns out to be her attempt to
make herself a valuable part of the Emperor's life, all of a sudden turns
into a one sided love story, that helps Qin become the Emperor, but at the
same time lose his beloved, whom he wants for a Queen. But this is not
really her wish, and apparently has never been. And this is the quandary
that the young Emperor faces from day one, until he eventually is able to
accomplish his assigned task ... whatever the price. The price may be that
he had to become a ruthless murderer to do it, and that this was not what
the woman he loves wanted. She is a foreigner in his court after all, but as
children, these things do not matter.
 Eventually an assassin is found, and this man, is the one that Lady Zhao
takes a liking to. he has pretty much renounced the part of his life that
once had made him a great killer. It only took a young blind girl to show
him what he could not see. And he could not save her from herself. Her
courage alone stands out, and forces a change in his life. This change, as a
recluse and worker at various odd jobs, eventually leads him to a local hang
out where he shows his strength -- and is noticed by Lady Zhao who happened
to be coming by at the moment. Jing Ke, eventually becomes the man hired to
kill the Emperor Qin, but the irony of it all, is that he has made up his
mind not to kill the Emperor with a sword at all, but merely to show him
something that the Emperor has hid from for a long time, which has been
hinted at, and is finally shown in the end ... he may not even be the
legitimate owner to the power he has. Even as Jing Ke makes his attempts in
the end to kill the Emperor, they seem theatrical and not intentional, and
he finally gives in and allows the Emperor a moment of hollow victory ...
something that he has experienced already with Lady Zhao. What he doesn't
know is that Jing Ke and Lady Zhao have been friends/lovers (not clear), and
when she finally comes to claim the body of her hero Jing Ke, the Emperor is
now shown as a man that has killed to get to the top, and lost everything
else that his heart could ever want, specially his only love. Above all,
these people have held on to the secret that he may not be the legitimate
ruler, now that he is the Emperor.
 Stunning films usually balance out the acting, the sets, the music, and
everything that they have, that will show in the screen. The acting free for
all that was evident in "Temptress Moon" is visible here in that it is now
controlled and beautifully worked with. No longer are the main characters
strictly a symbol of an old Noh styled theater and tradition that had marled
the earlier Chinese and Japanese art forms. These are now full fledged,
solid actors and actresses that really explode in your screen and help make
a good film great. And it takes a director with a vision, and a desire to
accomplish this, to be able to unite such a conglomeration of forces. Chen
Kaige has dome that and then some.
 Magnificent film, while also a bit of a historical facet on China. While I
am of the opinion that it is sad that the only films that can be made in
China are these historical pieces, the over all tone to this reviewer is
that this film is showing undertones that the government in China is brutal
and obviously lacks the "love" to be a beloved person. The Emperor may
become the Emperor, but he will no longer be remembered for his deeds and
his works. Take notice Chinese leaders, and allow these artists to speak
their minds freely, instead of under the breath of a history long past and
gone. These arts will be remembered and foster more about ... sadly, all we
can do with this history is create a film. In this case a magnificent film,
with the qualities that most of us really appreciate.
4 of 5 GIBLOONS
Reviewed by Pedro Sena, Copyright (c) Pedro Sena 2000. All Rights Reserved.

Title
Review for Tous les matins du monde (1991)
There is so little known about the life of composer SAINTE COLOMBE, that it
took a novel to get some attention.  And a director who loves music, because
if you didn't, this film might not have been worth it.
This is not the CLIFF NOTES of music appreciation.  This is the real
thing....... and it is done so carefully, and meticulously, that one is
probably going to go out and buy a lot of this music.............
Sainte Colombe, became a historical composer, and creative musician because
he disdained the music business more than for his own music, although it is
intensely private, and extremely beautiful.
He was more famous for having created a scandal when he refused the favors
of the courts of Louis XIV in France.  He was less interested in the
popular, or court attentions, than he was in being lost in his own grief,
for a wife he truly loved, and if it is an indication, the first person that
showed to him that his music not only made sense, but was good.  However,
Sainte Colombe's prowess with the instrument
he devised ( the precursor to today's cello -- he added a 7th string to the
viola to add more lower notes ) was clear, and the desire of many who hoped
to get him as a teacher.  Most were refused, and it
is possible than none actually got any teaching.  But Marin Marais has in
his memoirs some moments to tell, and the film's writer devised a novel
about the tragic life of a man, who was truly lost
in his own creation.
Opening with an extreme close up of the sad Marais, in grief, for he too has
been bit by his inability to deal with the guilt he has for having left
Sainte Colombe's daughter, who went on to hang herself,
the elder Marais tells his story to an audience of young musicians that are
trying to rehearse, but have no touch, no feel for any music.   And the film
ends with the elder Sainte Colombe entering
and saying the final line of the film.  " I am proud to have taught a
student like you " ... A submission, that he has finally seen what he has
felt and preached to himself all his life.  The music has
won out.  And the feelings have been elevated to a new high.
With a superb cast, both Depardieus ( father and son ), J-P Marielle as
Sainte Colombe, and Anne Brochet and Carole Richert as the daughters of the
composer, just smooth their way through the whole
film, which appears long, but isn't..... but pleas that you listen and live
the feelings of the music... which is not something Hollywood likes to
do..... they would have cut half hour out of this  film........
Copyright (c) Pedro Sena 1994
Reviewer and Moderator of the CENTIPEDE's THE FILM.

Title
Review for In weiter Ferne, so nah! (1993)
I really wanted to like this film.  And like its predecessor, WINGS OF
DESIRE, it has some nice touches, which one wonders where is going to lead,
and what is the film doing.
But, alas, it seems that every film exercise has to end up in some sort of
theme, or idea, for it to have meaning, so it seems.  It is my opinion, that
this film deteriorates, as soon as it becomes a story, instead of
maintaining the idea that it had created.
That's not to say that the film isn't as good, when that happens.  To me,
the illusory part was a bit more interesting, than the eventual story about
an angel wanting to find out what it is like to be a human, and having to go
and find out what it is like.
The film starts with the usual style that made the other film so
interesting. In this one Cassiel, Rafaela spend much of their time looking
at things and making observations about people.  As before, they can hear,
and see things before they actually happen, and most often when they are
happening.  Where their attention goes, they connect
and hear that person's lament, or questions.
Cassiel, however, longs to find out what it is like to be human, and
eventually gets to try it.  And innocently enough he gets to find out that
not everyone around is honest, and has good reasons to boot.  His first
connection, is in all actuality another member of his
group ( a baker named Daniel ), and they all go about their business until
Cassiel gets involved with some not so good affairs.  And the film becomes a
bit of an over ripe fig for my tastes.  To me the wonder of the previous
half, is now becoming the symbolic path that the film has to take.  A sort
of Christian concept now has to take over, complete with sacrificial lamb,
and pointed theme.  This, to this reviewer, ate the film up.
But, it isn't all as bad as I make it sound.  I suppose, for a regular art
film go'er, we may have liked to see something stick to it, and really make
a case.  The premise was great, but since we are humans, our resources into
that space are limited, and this film is no different.  It really is not the
film's fault.  But it could have been more interesting
to me to see the stream of consciousness that it was working with instead of
a thematic story, so overly laden with symbols that do not really add
anything to the whole film.
The best part of the film, and also the oddest, is Wim Wenders use of
various musicians and their songs to highlight several things here and
there.  Right out in the open, are Lou Reed, Nick Cave, Jane Sieberry,
Laurie Anderson, House of Love and other unusual musicians, which give the
film a basic art house style.  To me, though, it is a shame that the film
departs from it too soon.  But these artists, become a sort of
inspiration for the now earth bound angel, which adds a nice touch to the
material.  While what these artists do say is interesting, it is not as good
as what is around, but the analogy is good enough. And Lou Reed is specially
interesting, as he happens not to be a vain artist, and knows very well what
he is doing.
Another of Wim Wenders' curiosity shop items, is his use, and handling of
Michael Gorbachov, of the recently broken up Soviet Union.  As he  works on
a book, he wonders about certain things, and then writes, and of course, we
already knew that these things were happening.  But the charismatic leader,
did come off, like the other characters in the film, for the most part, as
honest, and caring, something that not many of us has the feeling for in
many politicians, specially one of Gorbachov's stature.
Not a great film, but easier to watch than its predecessor Wings of Desire.
Watch the really well thought out camera angles to allow you to see a
different point of view.  The technical side of this film  is probably its
very best asset.
3 GIBLOONS
Copyright (c) Pedro Sena 1995. All Rights Reserved.
Member of the Internet Movie Critics Association

Title
Review for Rosencrantz and Guildenstern Are Dead (1990)
This is a play more for Shakespeare aficionados than it is for film go-ers
specially anyone who is into entertainment and escape.
But this play, were it not for its famous 'mother', is an excellent exercise
in having a little fun, and see two goons get gooned around until they
themselves get done away with it.   The two actors, much like the
requirement for the stage production, are extremelly good and very tight,
meaning that  there is a smoothness of interplay which is very enjoyable
throughout the  whole production.
And unlike the original play, this story is not locked into a theatre stage
and has much more freedom to move around and show another side of the
characters and players than we otherwise could really get.  While travelling
to Denmark we see the rough terrain, and the forests which help the two
characters play word games to while away the travelling time.  All of a
sudden, the play is not a fun, wordy, game for two actors, but an
entertaining exercise in filling in the boring spaces in one's life.
The story concerns the two characters which Claudius hires to go kill Hamlet
in Denmark, during the latter's exile.  Shakespeare makes these two
characters look like a pair of little kids, playing a deadly game in an
adult world, which I tend to think that Tom Stoppard wanted to change.  In
this film, they are not so much two kids as they are a pair of pawns caught
up in a much larger chess game than they could imagine, and they do not
realize that they are getting involved in a game which is not specially
friendly or fun.
I have been involved in one production of this play, and like it a lot, not
only because of its avant-garde style, but also because it always invokes
settings for a stage which are very colorful and 'symbolic' if not totally
based on a 'visual' image.  The play works very well within the confines of
the absurdist theatre, with a stage that could be almost all too empty.  And
the film answers all the questions and problems which it might have on the
stage.
This film is worth seeing.....but a requirement is necessary that you allow
for time to let events shape up.....thus the story will become a bit clearer
to you.  Excellent acting and very good, sometimes funny, directing.

Title
Review for Restoration (1995)
There are films that grab one's attention, and then there are films where
one just doesn't know if our attention is supposed to be gotten or not. Many
of these films fall into the artsy category, and tend to disappear and not
be
noticed for much of anything. But every now and then, a film comes by that
is actually pretty good, although as far as action goes, it doesn't make
the grade.
The period that the story takes place, has a complete theatre dedicated to
it, and its affectations. It is called Restoration Theatre, and it is very
difficult to do well, unless one is well versed in the manners and styles of
the age. The film takes its cue from the its settings, and never lets it go.
And this is rare in film making. One could easily fall for the sentimental
story, or the period's affectations and its silly ways.  Instead one keeps
finding out more about the time and what went on.
Unfortunately ( for the main character ) in the middle of all this, a story
is born and he has to live with it.
This is the story of the period, before it really is the story of a  certain
Meryvel, who does not care for his job and work in the medical  field. He
finds it boring, and not pleasing, not to mention that it ruins  much of his
social life. As it happens, he develops a new style of  healing based on his
intuition, and this gets him to the king's chambers.  Here he is asked to
cure one of the king's favorite pets, a dog.  And of  course, Meryvel, has
no idea what he did, but somehow his way ( not  bleeding the patient )
happens to help cure the animal which places  Meryvel in the king's favor.
As time goes by, the king decides to use Meryvel. He will marry him off  to
his mistress, with the agreement that he will not bother her, spend  time
with her, and so on. But there is a larger sub-plot, that will  eventually
change the course of the film from where it is to another  place. It is the
plague that is beginning to foster in London, and  Charles II has not
figured out how to deal with it. He was too worried  about his new city
instead of taking the advise of his inferiors to  create sewers and water
mains.
Meryvel, finds that he is attracted to the King's mistress, even if she  is
not interested in him at all. And a court painter is brought in to  paint
the lady, and he is held up so that Meryvel can try to convince  the
mistress. Alas, the painter is also one of the king's stool pigeons,  and
eventually the little story is found out, and Meryvel has to leave,  and
does.
He ends up in a Quaker convent, where his brother is the medic. But his
brother's ways are the old ones and his efficiency is not evident.  Meryvel
promptly suggests a few changes, and in the course of affecting  one of
them, he ends up meeting a woman that is there. She appears crazy,  but
apparently is not, and he does not see the point in bleeding any  patients.
Eventually they come together and she gets pregnant. This is not good for
the convent and they both have to leave. And they are both  in the middle of
the London plague. During the nasty birth, the child  is saved, but the
mother dies. And from here, the story takes on some  rather sad, and
different moods. All of a sudden, we do not see the  court life, we see the
street deaths, and the court falling apart as  well.
The rest I won't spoil for you... but suffice it to say that some  poetic
justice does come about, even though the court's style of  justice could be
thought to be rather boring, and not dependable...  but as Charles says,
it's the best he can do as long as he is king.  But Meryvel's reputation as
a doctor is restored, and he is now a
valuable member of society, and one that is important in the recovery  that
London will have to undergo.
Perhaps the very best thing about this film, is that we do not really know
who is who, and what parts they are playing. There are no credits  at the
beginning, and I find that this is great. It takes you directly into the
"play" and makes the statement that the situation and the  story is the
point, not the actors, and the people that created the  film, which, REALLY,
is the way it should be.
And later we find out that Sam Neill is the king, Robert Downey Jr. is
Meryvel, and that Meg Ryan is the crazy woman. Should one remember this
before hand, the effect may have not been the same. All the performances are
excellent, and the film seems to be really well focused on its themes.
Worth seeing. Beautiful film, and won a couple of Oscars, the costumes
being one of them.

Title
Review for Kavkazskij plennik (1996)
Like another film from last year, BURNT BY THE SUN, this one has to travel
through an area where sentiments are not comfortable to get its point
across. But unlike BURNT BY THE SUN which has irresistible charm in the form
of a young girl, this film has to live and die by how well it can convey a
sense of humanity in what otherwise is really a bad conflict, in an area
where the outsiders can rarely win in the first place.
But the price, the locals have to pay, is real sad, and terribly destructive
for all the parties concerned.
A group of Russian soldiers are ambushed in the Chenchen region, and two men
survive. The apparent reason for the attack seems to be a certain
Abdul-Mourant, who has decided to take the war in his own hands, since the
Russians are keeping his son in jail. He hopes to trade the two prisoners
for his son.  And the Russian contingent, does not seem interested in
parlaying a peace, and neither does it seem interested in seeing that the
older man gets to see his son.  By now, the Russian men in charge have
become complacent and couldn't careless about the war. They have the guns
and the power, and they probably figure that they can clean house at any
moment they feel like.
The two prisoners seem to do well, despite having a bad start. One is
aggressive, and the other a young one who failed to fire a shot in the
ambush. They befriend a young girl, Dina - Abdul's daughter, who takes care
of them and brings them food and water. And it is in the end Dina who really
has helped create the only level headed decision, going into the last minute
of the film. The hope is that her plight and goal will last and survive, for
Dina is much better centered than all of them.
In the middle of the film, one of the prisoners, the aggressive captain,
decides that he wants to escape, and he does so, and they survive, with the
exception that they do not know where they are going. He makes the mistake
of killing a shepherd, and this brings about a change in the film's
direction and a serious problem for Abdul. The town wants the prisoners
killed, or gotten rid of, as they are a walking problem.  But others have
better ideas. The rebels want to use the two Russians to find the field
mines and disarm them, which they do.
And in between, one comes to find that some locals are not happy either. One
has a son in the Russian army, stationed in town. And this elder is ashamed
that his own son is turning against the town's own people. And the old man's
indiscretion gets Abdul's son killed, and places the film in a terrible
dilemma.
The villagers have gotten even with the prisoner that killed the shepherd.
They killed him in the same spot. But the young soldier, has been a man of
peace, for the most part and has not displayed anything violent... he has
befriended Dina nicely, and he probably wishes that they would have had a
chance though she is young, but as Dina says, "around here they marry off
very young". Abdul, takes his last prisoner to the top of a mountain where
he will kill him... and in the film's turnabout ending, Abdul misses the
shot on purpose and goes home. His own personal war is over. He has lost his
son, but this young man is not the cause or the reason for the conflict. And
a new reason has been uplifted. But sadly, the film hints that the Russian
military leaders have other reasons in mind, as we see four bombing
helicopters fly over their very own, and not pick him up.
The innocent get screwed, in a puzzle and game, that in the end is
meaningless, and can only bring about hate and destruction..... story has it
that Boris Yeltsin saw this movie and immediately signed a pact to end the
war and help the region..
Based on a Tolstoy novel, this adaptation came around at the right time, and
brought about a point.
The film is very good, and has some very beautiful moments, specially in the
way that it displays the cultures through its own music. The Russian styles
are almost, by comparison, stupid and are seen through the prisoners minds
when they hear their Russian songs. But right after it, we often hear the
Moslem tinged musical style that the region has, and its power is much more
evident than the words in the Russian songs.
Full of beautiful cinematography, and moments, this is a very good film, and
really deserving of an Oscar nomination. But it fits into the category of
the films like Burnt by the Sun, as an anti war film, that really destroys
innocent lives needlessly. Still, it is strong, and well done.
Nice performances, and magnificent moments. Dina is excellent. As are Abdul
and Hassan's characters. The two soldiers come off as childish next to them.
But it is clear that this is just the way it is.

Title
Review for Bedazzled (1967)
English comedy has been around for a very long time. And unlike much of the
American stand up and living room comedy styles the past 50 years, it
translates well to the screen.  Perhaps it is that English comedy appears to
have to stand up to its massive literary tradition, whereas the American
style is still searching for a character of its own. In the 50's there were
the Goons. After the Goons came Pete and Dud.And after them, comes Monty
Python. And they have lasted. American comedians suffer terribly because the
medium here is centered around the business end of it all.
After their college days, Peter Cook and Dudley Moore, continued together
and this time they went into films. Unlike the Goons, who were good actors
but not very good writers, Peter Cook and Dudley Moore were more disciplined
in their writing, and they took their material into the film area.  Peter
Cook, at that time, was already famous for a satirical "Mad"-like magazine
in the high circles of Cambridge and Oxford, where Pete and Dud, Jonathan
Millar, and many others used to not only make fun of their schooling, but
also anything else that walked in front of them, from a brew to any idea.
One of their first films, was Bedazzled, which is not a fantastic comedy by
any means, but very few comedies stand up to the cleverness that this one
seems to have.
It is a clever twist on the story of Faust, and though the film does not
have the usual quantity of gags, it does have its very clever side in the
writing and the way things are carried out. George Spiggott as the devil,
spends his time doing his batch of trickery and bad deeds to everyone in his
path.  And tricking the young Stanley Moon into using up his seven wishes.
The story centers around a young fry cook who is in love with one of the
waitresses he works with, but he is too shy to ask her out, or say anything.
In appears Mr. Spiggott and Stanley is given a chance many times, but there
is always a catch, as Stanley just isn't clever enough, or detailed enough
about what he wants with his wishes.  So one wish is wasted on a marriage,
where the waitress is always with someone else.  Or later, she is married to
Stanley, or is it Peter, or the many other hints.
In between the devil performs many of his clever tricks, and he makes sure
that Stanley sticks around. And the funny thing, is that when seeing this
film almost 30 years later, just about everything and anything that George
says, fits, and still holds up, which just about says it all about some of
the work that Peter Cook and Dudley Moore were writing... it may have taken
Dud's attitude and drunken-ness to help make it, but the focal point was the
fact that Peter Cook knew what he was writing abut. Most writers just want
to get their point across... Pete made sure that you remembered it.
But Stanley is getting disenchanted with the whole thing, since he can never
get the satisfaction out of the whole thing that he would like.  Eventually,
George comes to the end of the line, getting a certain number of souls in a
contest with God, and he returns to St. Peter's place to reclaim his
rightful spot next to God.  Unfortunately for him, he fails the entrance
examination, because he did a good deed by returning Stanley's soul to him,
and felt good about it, which was recognized as a selfish motive.
The film ends as St. Peter is laughing, and the devil goes out and tries
again to create as much hackling as he can come up with, so that God can,
once again, test the faith of mankind.  But this time, the devil is doing it
because he is angry, not because it was a job that he was asked to do.
This incredibly sharp, and well focused satire, written with a rapier
tongue, and spoken just fast enough to make most of anyone not used to
English comedy tied up, maintains its amazing standard, and
reversed role psychology alive.  The devil and his business associates, for
example, are terribly worried about a couple of lunatics signing a peace
treaty and sending his business into a disaster.  The American thinking, all
of a sudden is loud and clear. If one can not see this happening in
corporate scales, one must be ignorant of realities around us....
In between are several characters that enliven the whole act. The seven
deadly sins appear, with Raquel Welch doing the honors as Lust, who is
married to Sloth. This clever film never fails to deliver on its clever
plans, and in the end, Stanley gets his just means. He has learned something
which has made him less greedy, less gullible, and a more interesting
person. Peter Cook is excellent in his role as the self important devil,
doing his duty so people can show God that they believe in him.  Dudley
Moore is good, until the film gets soapy and tired, when he can not maintain
his seriousness, or abilities as an actor, which have never been that good
anyway. He makes up for it by being sharp witted and fast when he has to,
and this helps his abilities.
The film has stood up rather well almost thirty years, and its comedy values
and thoughtful writing, seems today, so clever, and so well done.  The late
Peter Cook deserves some credit for his ability in writing, which has always
been grossly underrated and not well known enough... he was one of the major
satirists of this century
Funny film, where the ideas about God are twisted around cleverly.
Funny send up of the old Faust story.  Directed by Stanley Donen, who was
well known for his funny film stories, where things always went wrong until
the end. This film follows that path. The other kudos should be given to
Dudley Moore, though, who also wrote the music for this film, which is
actually quite
good.
4 of 5 GIBLOONS
Reviewed by Pedro Sena. Moderator of Ygdrasil's Film Newsgroup
Copyright (c) Pedro Sena 1996. All Rights Reserved.

Title
Review for Pixote: A Lei do Mais Fraco (1981)
This film reminds me of LUIS BUNUEL's LOS OLVIDADOS.  it has a similar
opening, with an editorial, that leads us into the story of the people, with
actual people in the roles.  Where BUNUEL used, some 30 years before real
actors in Mexico city, Hector Babenco, uses the actual children that are a
part of this life and have very little chance to get out of it.
The real story is a law in the state of Sao Paolo ( Brazil ) that does not
allow children under 18 to be put through the penal system.  And for this,
many children are hired by thugs to do many of the dirty deeds
and work, from killing, to mere drug deals.  The children are, when caught,
placed in an institution, where they are hoped to be reformed, and the film
makes the point that this does not help very much at all.
And in the process, Pixote ( a nickname that means little bastard )  becomes
a part of a group that is involved in various things, one of which is to
make a few deals in drugs, involving a prostitute that lives in Rio de
Janeiro.  These deals fall through, but Pixote, who is  more adapt at
dealing than his friends, becomes a partner of sorts for a while with a
woman that pretty much becomes his mother, until they accidentaly kill a
customer of hers that they want to rob, an american.
While the film is not a great one, it does have some very nifty performances
by some kids that are actual menbers of these groups and they shine.  I
suppose that we could hope that this film helps them become everyday useful
menbers of the society.... but in an industry that uses luck for sales, this
is unlickely to happen.
The surety is that these people will continue being the same as they have
been all their lives, and with a sllight chance, at best, to recover.  The
inevitable result is that they will become real live menbers of the hardcore
group that does not reform.
Pixote makes friends with a gay man and they go to Rio, where life still has
a bit of a dream for some of them.  Lilica, wants a lover that will help his
life be alive, and Pixote, still young, just wants to survive, without
having to put up with the many insults which his older friends afford him.
While this is not a pleasant film, there is nothing visual that is actually
unpleasant, other than the ideas themselves.  In the process, the train trip
from Sao Paolo to Rio, becomes a nice escape from the
over crowded situation that the boys must share in their quarters before
they go out into the world.  Sao Paolo, is over populated, and too many of
the street children are left behind.  These children are the victims of the
society, and its valiant efforts to correct these kids into worthy menbers
of society.  But the real problem
may just be that what Pixote finds, is also a lot of corruption right above
his head, which undermines the efforts of anyone around him.  The reform
school's leaders are also people whose motives  could be questioned, and
they often lie to get the results they want, or they strive to hide the
truth, just so that the government and the
press will leave them alone to do their job.
With some performances that really shine, Fernando Ramos da Silva as Pixote
and Jorge Juliao as the gay friend, this film ends up being very attractive,
and one that made the circles in the art houses for film in the early 80's.
One just can't help feeling sorry for those kids, and the sad life they
lead, and the attempts ( by all parties ) to improve, be it justified or
not.
This film signaled the entry of HECTOR BABENCO as a major director of film
in Brasil, and later in the world stage.  If there is a trial going on,
however, the real question is, did this film help the social  plight on
behalf of these children.... this remains to be seen.  As opposed to LOS
OLVIDADOS, which became a bitter, and satiric, look on those who surrounded
the children, this film does make an effort to present a solution.... but
where does it end.??? It doesn't.... and the film can not end, since we know
the participants are "out there"
and still a part of that system.  LOS OLVIDADOS became a story of an
individual or two, who had moments where his visions, or interpretations, of
what happened in front of him, dominated the stage.... here, the
outside world dominates the space.... and the children are manipulated
throughout... I suppose that Pixote wants a break from all this, and his
scene, where he merely wants to suckle, rather than make love to the
prostitute that has becoome his mother of sorts, becomes the focal point,
and the lack of understanding that these children suffer from. A moment when
absolution is at hand, becomes a moment of destruction. And the prostitute,
who probably came from the same circles does not understand any better the
needs... she can only think of herself as a product, with a mission in
mind... to earn money to make a living.
The film is careful not to make a judgement here, although the prostitutes
plight, is scary to her.  She is afraid of getting pregnant, because it
prevents her from paying rent.
Very good film, although it could be considered sordid, and sad.

Title
Review for Siesta (1987)
Very similar in style to the film WILD ORCHID ( the first ), it deals with a
woman's adventures in Spain, where she basically comes to grips with her
femininity, if not her real womanhood.
However, what makes this film difficult to follow is the fact that much of
it takes place in the woman's mind, if the ending is any indication
whatsoever.  The whole thing may have not happened at all, although much of
it definitely did happen.
With an outstanding cast, and great music all over, this film moves along
exploring a woman's ability to relate physically to a world
that doesn't think about the physical part of themselves at all, in the
sense that they are not self conscious about it.  And the
American tourist is very self conscious, and many times denies herself
adventures, though her mind allows her to fantasize about
them.
All of the actors in this film look like they are on vacation and enjoying
their roles, which is very much the attitude we usually
pick up of the Spanish people.  The sex is up front, and honest, rather than
discussed in words, or in the mind.  One falls for the
feeling rather than wait for the mind to come along.  And in the end,
although it is clear that this woman's mind has learned much, it
still shows that she is partially trapped in her ideas, and is not capable
of true enjoyment.  The suggestion is that she will
return to America and continue playing games, rather than enjoy herself.
A very good film, and fun to watch, because many times we are not really
sure of what is really happening, only to find that
she was dreaming.  The cutting of the film is fast, and very suggestive, and
the dreamy music helps that mood.

Title
Review for Woman's Tale, A (1991)
Every once in a while, we get to see a film which just simply knocks your
socks off.
This is the story of an old woman, who is spending the last years of her
life attended by a nurse, who has a special liking to the feisty old lady.
The old lady is independent, a true lover of nature, despite
her really sad story in the middle of the war.  And as usual, the old lady
has her squabbles with the landlord, and the son, until he realizes that the
old lady is right.
In the meantime, the old lady is up to her enjoyable adventures during the
day, which as it really turns out, are her escapes from the horrible events
which she has endured.  But it doesn't matter, she has a liking for helping
people, and even has a boyfriend, and wants the nurse to make sure they make
love in her bed after she dies.  And of all the oddities, she smokes, not
because she is nervous, but because she loves it, and a restaurant owner
gets the brunt of her opinion on the matter and that is that.
One day she falls, is taken to the hospital, and found out to have cancer,
with a very probable chance of survival three months at best.  She promises
a young nurse to be out of the hospital, and does get out, because she can
do all the exercises in the ward, and has earned the nickname of rabbit.
She wants to go back to her  apartment, but the landlord is playing jerk.
But he has to give in because the old lady has something over him, a certain
ability to put him in the right place.  And there she does die, with one
last shot of morphine..... you must keep the love alive.....
What the film does not say afterwards, is that this old lady, Sheila
Florance, won the Australian Oscar last year, and a week later died of
cancer.  The film was her crowning achievement in a lifelong dedication to
an artform that she believed to the very end.  Even in the process of
playing a character, this old woman still sits naked on a bathtub, where she
has her memories of the horrible past.
And if you don't come out of this film with a tear in your eye, shame on you
is what Sheila is going to say.  There are some truly funny moments...
talking about aging, and how the bird is seven years
old ( quite old for a bird ) and the sucker doesn't have a single grey
feather..... and many other moments which really shake one's heart.  In the
meantime she tries to save someone else from suicide
over the radio, and even manage to help many of her aged friends, who really
have lost the desire to live, which she definitely has not.
It is not only difficult to do something like this, it is also a magnanimous
gesture, and the director should be commended for this very beautiful film.
It's hard to tell where the film ends and the real Sheila starts, but it
doesn't matter.  It all fits in together so tightly woven, so pretty, that
there aren't enough tapestries in life that look this good and cry the creed
of love so clearly, as this film does....................

Title
Review for Speechless (1994)
Speechless might have been a better film if it weren't just an acting
showcase, and had more to do with the two characters in question.  But it
tries to get political, and full of ideals and desires, and the ending is a
mess of bad design and writing.  But the rest is entertaining, at least.
Specially if you like to see a good actor going through his motions.
Michael Keaton is a has been Hollywood writer that has just about quit what
he does best, and has been taken on as a writer, for a campaign for public
office.  And he is, at first, clever, a good writer, and gets the results.
But his competition is no slouch in the process and has a history of good
works, but lacks in the other areas, like a little influence, and being able
to get things done efficiently enough to be effective.  And Geena Davis, is
the other writer.
And they meet.  Of course.  And they happen to decide that they like each
other, only to find out that they are in the opposite camps, writing against
each other.  This does no favors to any relationship at all, but it does add
its moments.  The whole thing becomes a war of  attrition of words and
nerves, to see who is cleverest of all, and who  is able to manage the goods
better.  And the scoop is not cleared up until we see it to keep us
surprised.  In between these events, some materials get stolen and borrowed,
and each campaign works to be better than the other to help the candidate in
question.  It doesn't matter that she is the pro who has done this before,
or that the writer's ex-wife is the one that got him involved in this new
role, thus providing a bit of more chaos to the whole thing. All of a sudden
it isn't just a writing campaign, but a personal vendetta.
Speechless has funny moments, and they may be on the shoulders of Michael
Keaton and his acting ability to keep us busy and entertained. Without it,
the film nay have been too drab and boring.  And Geena Davis, gets a chance
to be next to someone who is good and will be better, and that is good for
her character.  The question is if it will work out in the end.
Well, it does, and it doesn't.  The ending feels like a throwaway. I think
that the outcome of the election should have been ignored and not a matter
in question.  Instead they make a mess of it by implicating bad political
precedent onto the running parties, whose behind the back dealings are as
dishonest as the relationship between the two writers has become.  And even
more so, because the public is unaware  of it.  The film doe snot resolve
this, and instead makes sure that the two characters get together.
And in the middle of it is a drab reporter that has some new designs on his
past flame, Geena Davis.
Well, it is nice to watch, but someone will have to remind me what it was
that was nice.  I enjoy solid acting jobs, and the only person that gets his
kudos for an evening's work here is Michael Keaton.  The rest, you'll have
to decide for yourself.

Title
Review for Angels and Insects (1995)
If someone wants to make a point, they will take you the length of
something, anything, and then spring it on you. This film, is such an
adventure.
However, this film just has one of those understated feelings, none of the
acting stands out, probably because it might give the film away, and for the
majority of the film, it has moments that are just trying to "break out"
this rather monotonous film, into something else.
To his credit, and the actors, the director does not allow any of the film
to fall into anything except his complete story. The insect is friendly,
until the tide changes, and then it attacks. This film does the same. The
story centers around a man that has just come back from the Amazon, in what
has been found out to be a disastrous mission for a group of scientists.
This one managed to survive, and has found his way back home to England. He
ends up taking up a stay with a rather generous rich man, who has similar
interests, and who decides to sponsor this scientist of insects.
All is fine, until the younger brother gets upset because this outsider, a
commoner at that, has found his way into the family. As time continues, we
find that the scientist has an interest in one of the family's daughters,
one who apparently has suffered a rather unfortunate fate. She was married
and her husband promptly dies, in what may be considered odd circumstances,
which we never learn about. It's the upper class.... they get away with a
lot of things. What these might be is another question. But a hint does show
itself one time when the younger brother challenges the scientist to a duel,
which is refused.
Eventually, this marriage takes place. The scientist continues his studies,
and his helper is none other than his wife's sister, whose interest in his
profession is uncannily similar to his. She is an astute observer. And with
her help, a book gets published, and a successful working agreement starts.
The marriage lasts. And after a few hints, and moments here and there, and
an inordinate amount of children, the damn finally breaks. In the form of a
child that may have been some sort of revenge on the younger brother, by a
previous maid.
And the film takes on the vicious attitude that ant colonies can take with
each other. All of a sudden, the civilized are the real insects, and the
film comes to a quick resolution and ending.
This is an acting showcase. The people in it have to maintain their space as
well as they can, and never hint at anything. Of course, this was the way in
the Victorian age anyway, where everything happened behind closed doors and
the maids and everyone else in the house was not exactly not a part of it.
A very well directed film, although slow, the lines are delivered with the
same deliberateness that the ant colonies work. It seems to be its main
theme. And as such, the film ends up developing a statement about who is the
real savage and the angel. The innocent whose live it is anyway, or those
who ought to know better, and do nothing about it. Very few films will do
this correctly without giving it away. There are hints, yes... looking back
on it. But they are so subtle that we really make nothing of it... the film
really makes no reason for us to pay attention to those moments. They seem
so natural, a part of the
natural evolution of things... until we find out what was really behind it
all.
Excellent film, very well directed and beautifully thought out. But the
ending may really shake one up. It is brutal in ways more than one.
Reviewed by Pedro Sena. Copyright (c) Pedro Sena 1997. All Rights Reserved.

Title
Review for Map of the Human Heart (1992)
I have seen three Vincent Ward films, and while this one is the cleanest of
them all ( looks like he had a slight budget for a change ), it really isn't
up to par of the previous two, although it has interesting bits and pieces.
It is the story of an eskimo boy, who grows up to become a sad man, drunk in
his shoes.  In between are all the adventures he goes through, and the one
love in his life, whom he wanted, but could not keep.
His inability to stay with his loved one causing him to go to the drink,
which eventually leads him to his end.  In between the film has its nice
touches, the young man making love to the woman atop a weather balloon, and
some other unusual bits which make the film very enjoyable.
THE VIGIL, dealt almost with unseen forces that one could not change.  THE
NAVIGATOR dealt with an ability to hold faith in the harshest of conditions.
MAP OF THE HUMAN HEART deals with people's abilities to stay within their
own desire and love.  The girl Arik ( Jason Scott Lee ) loves, happens to
like him, but she ( Anne Galipeau ) is concerned with her Indian background
and the acceptance of their mixed relationship in a white world.  And even
though his ability to be crazy and courageous gets to win her for periods of
time that appear to be coincidental ( the story indicates that there will
always be a kharmic connection between these two -- thus they will
always meet regardless of where ), but in actuality are each person's
choices at the time.
It is a nice film, but it is rather sad and brutal on the cross cultured
opinions that most people have about each other.  And it really explains why
many cultures, even the eskimo, is probably going to face extinction in the
future.... ( we need food, not books... )
 3 1/2 GIBLOONS

Title
Review for Amadeus (1984)
Of all the films about the arts that have ever been made, I can think of
only three that stand out, for its sheer ability to display the art of its
creator, so well, and with such vigor.  AMADEUS was the first, that I can
remember, and much later, and only in 1993, films like TOUS LES MATINS DU
MONDE and LA BELLE NOISEUSSE.  These films are more about the art of
visualization, than they are about anything else.  And through their work,
we get an idea how a person sees what they see, and they describe what they
see, in notes, or paints.  TOUS LES MATINS, is a painstakingly beautiful
course in music appreciation.  NOISEUSSE, is an outstanding expose of what
the hands of an artist actually see in a model, from the first line to a
finished product.
In between, there is a little of the artist wondering what his own work is
worth, and how it is meaningful to him.  On occasion, it helps for us to see
these images.  And at times, the images are events which are locked up
inside the creative person, and our seeing them is not very helpful at all.
But somehow the work survives, because people see other things in them.
And this we have learned to love and appreciate through much of these
artist's works.
AMADEUS, is one of those films that stands out, not because of its
outstanding cast, and excellent interplay of very well thought out and
written dialogue by the playwright himself ( what a difference a playwright
makes... ) but also because the story of the young man who became a genius,
also had his moments of self doubt, and several personal failures amidst the
great successes he enjoyed.
Wofgang Amadeus Mozart, is a wiz with a piano (it wasn't called that then,
but it's close enough for us today) under his fingertips, and he set many
parties on fire in his younger days of much carousing and womanizing by
practicing what was then considered a healthy disrespect for music.  But
while he had the talent for creating pop events with his dexterity, he also
developed several petty jealousies which nearly destroyed him.  One of them,
was a composer called Salieri, who had the ability to write good music, but
his talent was not as free as Mozart's was wild. And the film sets about to
show us how Mozart managed to stay away from the vultures that chased him in
the world of music, until his body finally gave out.  Salieri, had enough
ability to recognize the good music, and becomes a good friend by making
sure the young man composes, before he destroys himself, which he predicts.
And to this effect, he undertakes several charades to make sure the
frightened young man is doing the work instead of drinking and carousing.
The film is told in retrospect through the older Salieri, who really misses
the music of the young prodigy, and the wonderful moments it created for him
as well.
At times, the film takes on the tongue in cheek approach, to make fun of the
stodgy music lovers in the court, whom Mozart does not dislike, but the
competitive for the king's favorite does make the young man stay on the
outside.  Instead the young man creates fun stuff for the street audiences,
and accomplishes some success, though he is not gaining financially.  But
still it impresses the older Salieri.
With a superb cast, and lovingly directed to explain, and appreciate the
mind of a genius and its destruction, this film stands out as one of  the
best, and very special ones at that...
Peter Shaeffer, is known for his quality of theatre, and his presence in
this work of his, is really one of the few times when a play actually fits
the screen better than it could a stage.

Title
Review for Monster in a Box (1991)
Spalding Gray should be considered a very good actor, even if the only
material he has done ( the most work that we can find, anyway ) is his own.
Starting with SWIMMING IN CAMBODIA, and continuing with MONSTER IN A BOX,
it is his life story, and telling of his experiences.  SWIMMING told us
about the adventures on the set of the film THE KILLING FIELDS, when even
the actors seemed to have become prey to the war, and events of the day.
MONSTER is the follow up, and ( to me ) it isn't as funny as the previous
work, but it does stand out as a very good piece of
work.
After the release of SWIMMING, Spalding had several offers for much work.
These included HBO, who wanted to have him do a documentary in Hollywood on
the non film people.  And then another studio wanted
him to go to El Salvador with a few other journalists to create a story
which had the actual suffering people as the main theme.  And of course,
Spalding does not spare us any detail of the events, including how he got
there.  Later, there are some films which were to be shown in Russia, and
his is one of them, which he can not
figure out why, but he is going to discuss the film and event.   Everything
goes fine, with the translation, until he gets to St. Petersburg, when all
of a sudden all has been lost, and the public can not figure out what is so
funny or what is going on.  The new translator does not have a script, and
translates at the rate of 100 words in exchange for 2.
In the meantime, Spalding has been writing his memoirs in the big MONSTER,
which he keeps in a box.  It is 1900 pages long.  And so must be his
dialogue.
It is an incredible show, in that there is very little one can do except
follow this man's story telling to its conclusion, which may turn out to be
a funny book.  He is funny, but is moving along so fast, that it is
difficult to stop and laugh at anything at all.  It isn't a bunch of gags.
It is a serial event of his life.
It is hard enough for a man to do a show all by himself, but few people can
carry it off as well, and as lively, as Spalding Gray does in this film.
With funny directing bits to enliven the action of the words, and very
timely music by the artist Laurie Andersen, this film is worth seeing....
but please think of it as a theatre show ( it is ) and not as a Hollywood
adventure.

Title
Review for Felice... Felice... (1998)
(Seen at the 22nd Portland International Film Festival, in Portland, Oregon)
 You know the film is a tribute to a bygone era when the whole thing is done
with pictures for backgrounds, and will not take but a handful of external
shots for the duration of the whole film.
 This story is based on pioneering photographer Felice Beato, who went to
Japan to do his work before the 20th century arrived. While there, he took a
woman as a geisha and wife, but as the story develops we find that things
did not work out very well. Several years later, he decides to go back to
Japan to try and see if he can mend things with his wife, O-Kiku, and he
starts his search where they lived. His voyage takes him through many of the
friends that were near him, and some of the subjects that he had
photographed, as well as one student of his. And in the end he gets the
chance to meet his ex-wife, but he has finally realized that  this world,
that may have been so romantic at one time is not for him, and in fact not
for foreigners. They do not help him find her much, and he is getting near
the end of his rope and ready to return home, when a friend's wife comes up
to him and lectures him on his romantic notions, and then tells him where he
can see her one last time.
 What is truly beautiful in this film is the way that is done. Almost
totally done with the photographs that master Beato left behind, it is a
study in an art form that has lost its beauty, an art form that at one time
held much promise. The sets for Nagasaki, and all the cities that he visits
are all seen through the photographs, and the glass prints (positives, today
known as transparencies) a memory of a bygone era and time, when things
appeared so much better than now.
 As we meet people that were once a part of his past, we are also coming to
grips with the fact that Beato has to let go of his past. An older fisherman
he liked, was actually the father of the woman he married, and Beato never
recognized him. The old man tells his story, and it is a sad one, but to no
avail. His loneliness and sadness only increases as Beato fails to recognize
that this man was the father of the woman he married. And later we meet a
prostitute that he had photographed many times, who had always loved him,
but her syphilis is eating her apart and she is nearing the end of her rope.
And here, appears the one series of external shots. A young girl, presumably
this geisha's daughter, wants to leave with him, but he can not take her
with him. For all  the moments in the story, this one sits in our stomachs
the hardest, as the young girl is doomed to become the very same thing that
are all the others in the same house that he is visiting.
 In many ways this is not a film. It really is a sort of slide show, or
photography show, with the people in it secondary to the real picture. The
beauty is in the pictures, no matter how romantic they may be, the reality
is becoming more and more sordid and sad for everyone he had known in his
past. The situation between him and his wife, then, never materialized,
probably because of this westernized notions about love, something that may
have been totally foreign in those days to many girls in Japan.
 A really well directed film, extremely well thought out, and done with such
care and love that it is hard to think of it as bad, or not worthy of
attention. It is not one of those films that has to hit you over the head to
do its thing. It just does it, and you will fall for it along the way.
perhaps a bit slow, but intentionally so, as it gives the major characters a
real nice tone of characterization, so rarely found in many films. Of
special mention is the excellent touch that the old man played by Yoshi
Oida, who turns out to be his ex-wife's father, and Beato never realized it.
 Great conceptual design and attention to detail in this film. Excellent
acting.

Title
Review for Amazon (1990)
The unfortunate thing about most rain forest films, is that there can be no
poetic justice done to that world. The fortunate thing, is that the jungle
has staying power, and puts up a good fight, and hopefully will survive the
battles, and win the war.
And the odd thing, is that some film maker in Finland, cares about it much
more than we might like to admit, and create a film that is unusual, not at
all sentimental, and besides a little positiveness, there still is a force
that has to be dealt with.
It is the story of a man and his two daughters, running away from his wife's
accidental death, ending up in Rio de Janeiro, in the hope of a new life.
His new hope ends up in despair, and takes him towards the Amazon, where
there is a rush for diamonds, and precious stones, in a few parts, specially
in the  higher plains, near the Peruvian, Colombian, and Venezuelan borders.
And there, on the barren Trans-Atlantic road, he meets an American pilot,
who does much running of anything between villages to pay for his habit,
cachaca and women, and of course, a hope of finding some diamonds in order
to get himself a living.
In the course of making a new friend, he gets caught up in the gold rush,
and with the American set off to fix a caterpillar tractor, which they hope
would help the mining of the precious stones, where they want to go.  The
problem is that the dead tractor is abandoned some 300 kilometers away.  On
their last trip, the plane crashes in the middle of nowhere, and the
American dies.  The finish man, is found by the Indians, and nursed back to
reasonable health, until he decides to leave.  On his trip up river on a
small canoe, he happens to eventually meet up with the village where his
daughters are still being cared by the woman he has befriended.  As the film
ends, he is thankful for the miraculous ways, and decides that to live in
that paradise is good enough for him...... as the sound of a helicopter
thunders away and it rises to bring into the area a brand new tractor.
It's a strong image, and one which the film shows, as starting out of
individual dreams of grandeur and riches.  This man has survived the rigors
of an old life and jungle.  Can he survive the rigors of the society he left
behind???
With music by the Brazilian percussionist NANA VASCONCELLOS, whose music is
well known in that area of Europe, due to his work with Jan Garbarek, Kjell
Johansen, and several other jazz world names, this film has an air of
Brazilian-ness which many other slick productions do not.  Unlike some
productions, the Indians here are strict by standers, and interact as they
feel, without a script, thus stripping away the usual cinematic styled
stereotype.  It is as authentic as it comes.

Title
Review for Black Robe (1991)
I liked THE LAST OF THE MOHICANS, and couldn't resist checking out this
film, since I am a bit of a history buff, in film anyway.
The BLACK ROBE is about the first Christian soul drivers to hit Canada in
the 16th and 17th Centuries.  Some of them made it, because they were honest
and cared, but others suffered because they were more forceful and were not
used to the way of the Indians in the area.
The main character comes to the new continent and is going to be assigned a
tribe that his predecessor could not succeed, and lost an ear because of it.
In the process, as he travels to the area where he must go, he makes friends
with a thief, who becomes his helper many times.  And this thief also gains
an affection from an Indian girl, which doesn't sit too well with a few
Indians, but she goes her way because she is intelligent, and makes her own
decisions.  And here the first fault of the Indian is shown, in that he
tends to OWN, and dominate the women, and this girl has become westernized
in that  she has changed.
Through out the film, a few Indians tease the black robed Jesuit priest, who
has secretly fallen in love with the same Indian girl, only to find out he
has no chance, for which he flogs himself.  Another sore point with him is
the diminutive medicine man who keeps making fun of the black robed man's
beliefs and his moods, only to prove true in the end.  The medicine man is
harping all the time, and gets out voted once, about the Indians coming to
believe another god, or set of beliefs, which will destroy him.  In the end,
the tribe that wished to be baptized by the black robe, believed that it
would absolve them of their 'sins'.....and the film's final caption states
that they lived ten more years and were annihilated by their enemies after
that, without a fight.  This was the point of the little man.  He said that
the new beliefs would make them lesser men, and that they would lose sight
of themselves........and they did.
The film is odd, in that it sticks by the western man's thinking, until it
knows that the cause is almost lost, and that the only chance for survival
is to join forces as a stronger force.  But belief in the westernized God
did not make the Indians stronger men, or women, it made them weak, and
less of a 'hunter' and 'survivor' in an area where the terrain, the weather,
and the opportunities are few to survive by one self.
Aside from being a sad film about the fall of the Indian folklore, belief
system, and the rise of the western man in Canada, it is a very well
directed, and faithfully represented film, that does not say where the fault
lies.  A bit on both sides, I guess.  The Indians could have learned a few
new tricks, but didn't need to change their very own beliefs in life and
living, whereas the European counter part accepted nothing but total
acceptance,  which may have been the real problem.

Title
Review for Buena estrella, La (1997)
(Seen at the 22nd Portland International Film Festival in Portland, Oregon)
 It is good that when seeing this film, we finally get the impression that
Spanish film makers can do much more than just a farce, or a satire, or some
sort of surrealistic picture that defies description. Might make one think
that all Spaniards are crazy. Well, we don't really care for all those
Kleenex fantasies, either.  If anything, LA BUENA ESTRELLA, is a film with
some sort of normalcy, in the human spirit that we can actually believe and
come to grips with. The question is, will the film also do it?.
 Well, yes it does. Then again, it doesn't, as it makes the film appear to
close to us, and too human for us to be able to buy into it. We've seen
hundreds of these stories, few of them do we discuss, and many of them were
literary works that we consider them best discussed in class rooms, rather
than accept that our own neighbors may be living a similar life. Reality is
always so far away for us to accept and live with. But the sad thing about
the film is that it makes women look stupid and secondary to many male
wishes and desires, which is simply not true, or a valid point in these
modern times. There maybe many of us old fashioned ones, but modern day
Spain is not too far off the rest of us all.
 Rafael, owns a meat market, and there he has been able to make a living. On
a fateful day, he is driving home and finds someone being attacked. Actually
she is not being attacked, she is being molested by her boyfriend. Rafael
stops and runs him off. He takes Marina to the Hospital and then home, where
he proceeds to offer her shelter. She is pregnant. Simple enough. However,
it appears that Marina has been forced to into prostitution, or equivalent
so that she could make some money for herself and the boyfriend. As it turns
out, the boyfriend gets himself in jail for a few years, which helps things.
Marina has settled in with Rafael, and her daughter is growing.
Unfortunately, Rafael has had a childhood accident that has prevented him
from becoming a full man, and this may eat apart at Marina's fiber. As the
film wears on, she can never let go of her boyfriend.
 He gets out of jail with his pride intact. And eventually finds his way to
Rafael's house where Marina has been. And Rafael, being the good Samaritan
that he is,lets him in. And in no time, Dani is also having sex with Rafael,
even though she warns him that she doesn't trust herself. She is still in
love with Dani. Rafael may be her family now, but there is one unresolved
thing that she has not been able to deal with.
 She leaves, she returns. He leaves, he returns. Dani leaves, he returns.
The triangle is in full bloom. Rafael does not know what to do. Marina says
that Dani will leave sooner or later as he always has. An opportunity arises
to get Dani out of the house. But this only gets Dani in jail again, and
this time his pride is broken. And it kills him. And in the end, it also has
killed Marina.
 Actually, this reviewer hates these stories. Makes everyone seem stupid and
not able to resolve their short comings, in order to lead a reasonably happy
and appreciative life. But, this opinion fails on one thing. It does not
take in consideration the human spirit and the way that we are. A little
animal, and a lot human. The film right off the bat, gives us that
impression, unfortunately,  it is badly juxtaposed to the story and
unnecessary. Is this a comment about us all being animals just because
Rafael is a butcher? That we have no sense or care about people and
relationships like a butcher would have for a piece of meat? Rafael is
certainly well defined in this area, even if the part of him that could
easily make him an "animal" is no longer operational. But if the film were
to make that point a little further in the end, a Butcher truck would have
driven by in the background and made it clear that the animals are dead, and
the humans have lived on. Maybe this would have offended many of us. As it
is it ends in a respectful  manner, and a rather positive one considering
the situation. Rafael is too human and too caring, and will raise the two
daughters and take care of them.
 Acting is what this film is really about, at least for three characters.
Maribel Verdu (La Belle Epoque, Amantes), is really good, as the emotionally
frail Marina. Antonio Resines is really fine, subdued way too much but still
very fine. A nice contrast. And Jordi Molla (the Flower of My Secret, Jamon
Jamon) is over the top, and crazy, as his character really is. His manhood
is not measured in his love, or in his ability to provide for the one woman
that he can not let go of. And all three of them could have really done this
film in at any moment were it not for the caring sequences that maintain the
story going. It never blows its cool, and it manages to solve things, never
"animalizes" the situation. The characters have their desire to contend with
and even Rafael tries to outdo Dani, but the love Marina has for him has
less to do with that, and she reminds him of that.
 But what is really fine in this film is the ending sequences, that are
excellently directed and filmed. When Rafael goes to visit Dani in jail, the
way it is photographed is magnificent and the expressions couldn't be more
perfect. Total juxtaposition. Basically two broken men, differently so, yet
they have something so much in common, which has to end in some sort of sad
resolution. However, that resolution is not a resolution but an end.
A very nice film, acting and directing wise. A love triangle that has a
fateful resolution, but not in a negative way. The offsprings will be well
taken care of.
4 of 5 GIBLOONS
Reviewed by Pedro Sena, Copyright (c) Pedro Sena 1999. All Rights Reserved.

Title
Review for Naked Lunch (1991)
The sad thing is that such a great novel, with so many unusual elementals in
it, is very difficult to translate into a film.
The good part, is that this film is fun to watch, despite, it not being able
to follow the book as closely as one would like to see.  I happen to like
the spirit of the work, which William S. Burroughs, creates in almost all
of his writings, stage work, and even in the original stuff he has done for
artist and musician LAURIE ANDERSON. (Sadder yet that she did not appear to
be a part of the film!)
And the neatest part, is that many good actors, just couldn't help
themselves when they had a chance to be a part of such fun and unusual work
to deal with.
The novel is not the easiest thing to bring to a screen.  It is very quick
in that it moves freely between various forms of a stream of consciousness
and narrative moments, or another set of events which the main character
can't quite keep up with, or has to go get himself a fix, disguised, or at
least so he thinks, while his alter ego is having fun with him.  For all
intents and purposes, this is a drug experience piece of work, and when it
is placed on the screen as a formal story, where the character has problems
dealing with his feelings, it quite doesn't come off.  Or Terry Gilliam
should have directed this whole thing, to help blend the inner and outer
aspects of the book.
But it is a rather depressing film, and not specially upbeat, although we
could enjoy all the weird goings on, as a bit of New York surrealism, if not
gutter New York naturalism.  I had enjoyed the book quite a few years
ago, when the Grove Press was making sure all the eclectic writers around
were getting their due.  I have to admit, that while the actors try very
hard and do very well, and nicely with what they have, the film is not as
lively
and jumpy as the novel is.  The novel keeps you interested.  In this film,
it  seems that everything is so casual, and not important....I like the
book.
The movie is good, but the book is better....if you like Burroughs, this
movie will not be your bag.  If you like surrealists, and odd 60's stuff,
this is actually interesting.

Title
Review for Nell (1994)
Some films take you by surprise, and just tear you apart.  And then some
films make you feel guilty that you didn't enjoy them sooner. NELL is such
an example.
This is an excellent, loving, and caring film about .... well, about ....
Nell, who has been raised in the woods away from all contact, except her own
corners of the world.  And she has created her own language, based on the
sounds of her grandmother who brought her up.  Nell had been afraid of the
daylight since her young days, when she was scared.
And two people have come to discover Nell, and have different opinions about
how to study her and re-introduce her to society.  Jerome is a bit of an
anthropologist, and he does things his own way.  And Paula
is representing an academic side that takes what it can at whatever price
for the sake of its own ego.
And Jerome manages to get a three month observation period, to find out what
they will do with Nell, now that she is by herself.  They find that Nell
comes out at night, and sleeps most of the day.  During the night she lives
her imagination, and the memories of her childhood, with what appears to be
a twin sister who died, in unclear situations, and was buried by Nell amidst
the rocks and caves in the area.
Nell manages to survive the eventual court proceedings, and she has  grown
to cope very well with everything around her.  She eventually  joins the
family of the local sheriff, whose wife has a similar  physical condition to
that of Nell.   Nell may have grown some, and her innocence is now
translating into womanhood, but she has not lost any of the feel she has for
the child within, as the last scene  indicates.
There are some wonderful things in this film, and most of them center around
Jodie Foster, and the design of the film.  It is a visual showcase, and well
designed in the evening and night scenes that it creates to display the
child within this grown woman.  In the evenings Nell goes to the lake in
front of the house and relives in
her mind, the happy days with a twin sister, and the way this is directed
and photographed leaves no doubt as to what is the prettiest and best part
of this film and story, and what we, the audience, are supposed to defend.
This is a film with excellent performances, even if Liam Neeson is probably
the weaker of the three leads.  He seems to gasp to keep up with two ladies
that have lived theatre and film all their lives and know how to be and
unload at any minute.  His character is good but not as strong as the other
two.  The other two stand out,  and Liam's characterization only stands out
because he is in the way between the outside and Nell, and just about
everyone has to go through him.  But he manages to hold himself well, even
if the acting has to descend into the level of mechanics to be able to get
something across.  One never feels this lack of ability and confidence in
the other two ladies.  But it is not fair to say that Liam is not good.  He
is very good.
This is an excellent film, well designed all around, with excellent music
and cinematography for anyone who is capable of enjoying these things.  It
is not only a strong film, but one that will linger for some time in one's
mind.  Quite an achievement in design and creativity.

Title
Review for Reine Margot, La (1994)
Not since Ken Russell's THE DEVILS has a film come up so brutal, and yet so
well pointed in its purpose.  Generally, brutality is used as a literal
example of the viciousness which people tend to have towards each other.
More often than not, it comes out as selfish, meaningless and rather
pathetic.  Like THE DEVILS, this film, does have its share of carnage and
intoxicating images, which could easily make the very church sick, knowing
the image that it has carried for many years.
But I suppose that it is the fact that this film easily attacks the
religious sense behind it, that makes it stand out as THE DEVILS  did.  As
such, it is not a film for just about anyone.  But aside from its carnal
instinct, it is a marvelous film, that tells its story very well.  It also,
clearly, shows why the French had so many internal problems, one of which
could be excused so easily on the church and the faith that was accepted by
the throne and the royalty.
It was 1572, when the French crown is making an attempt to extend itself,
and find a way to make the country stronger.  And for it to do that, it  had
to set up several marriages of convenience.  And some of these
marriages were not perfect, although others worked.  This one involved the
King's sister, who was to marry Henri of Navarre, with the idea of bringing
the independent area with long ties to the Spanish crown under wraps. But to
make matters difficult, the Navarre area, had embraced the Protestant faith,
which did not sit well with the Queen mother Catherine, and the jealous
brothers.
And the unhappy marriage is not consummated for quite sometime, as they seem
to be having their own problems of acceptance of each other.  Margot,
independent of spirit and body, still, on occasion takes to the streets to
pick up a man for a few strokes.  And one day, she comes across one that is
far better of a lover than others. La Mole becomes a dream for her, and, as
is everything else that she likes, he also happens to be sided with the
Protestants.
The revenging brother tries to kill the king, and Henri de Navarre, so he
himself can become king.  And eventually, be it one of his mother's ploys or
his own, they finally succeed in killing the king. And a puppet is set up.
La Mole becomes the perfect case.  With one swing, the new king will have
gotten rid of two tormentors.
And Margot will have been destroyed.
The end states that Margot exiled herself to Navarre and though she divorced
Henri, they remained friends for a long time.  The new king of France, got
there by the death of his own brother who may have  been accidentally
poisoned by one of the mother's ploys to get rid of Henri.
The film is incredibly well photographed, and like THE DEVILS, it also
brings across the serenity after the terrible destruction. It also uses
music very nicely.  But the serenity only lasts a while until another charge
takes place.
While the film may not quite be a great expose of the French history, it
does show, clearly, the corruption that was around these courts, and how
many got to where they were.  As long as they are in favor, they went along
with the courts.  And as soon as they were out of favor, they were dead.
That simple.  And at all turns, the new
king is thanking God for his good fortunes, which were quite good, even if
he had to protect himself.
Isabelle Adjani is excellent, in an impossible role, as is Vincent Perez as
her lover.  The rest of the cast is well suited, and all the visible
characters are well rehearsed and well designed.  It's hard to find
something out of place.
A great film, though the brutality will turn many people off.  But it is
very well done.

Title
Review for Comédia Infantil (1998)
(Seen at the 22nd Portland International Film Festival, in Portland, Oregon)
FILM TITLE:     COMEDIA INFANTIL
DIRECTOR:       SOLVEIG NORDLUND
COUNTRY:        MOZAMBIQUE 1998
CINEMATOGRAPHY: LISA HAGSTRAND
MUSIC:          JOHAN ZACHRISSON
CAST:           Adelinho Branquito, Ajoo Manja, Sergio Titos (Nelio)
SUPER FEATURES: The children are very good. Excellent story, well told.
 Sadly enough, and lost in a world with so many entertainment pictures, a
film like this will rarely get a chance to shine and do its thing. It will
also not get a chance at some financing, which this director certainly
deserves for her work, if this film is any indication. But it takes brave
Film Festivals, like this one here in Portland, to show these films and not
worry about what they really mean. It's the film that matters, not whether
you had some petite fun for a couple of hours and walked away with romantic
notions, or some inebriated feeling. Films like this are so much more
important, but as Doris Lessing once stated, " ... in a democratic country,
few will care, since everyone has an opinion, ... nothing to fight for,
nothing to agree on, no needs to do anything important, ...".
 COMEDIA INFANTIL, is a beautiful exercise of the type that we do not like
to see in the west, probably because the true spirit only is alive when it
is needed at its most, be it in Bosnia, or in this case Mozambique, or some
other place that we have heard has a civil war going on. It is the spirit of
the young one that survives, and MUST, though we may not want to accept that
idea, lest we feel that we are diminishing our own value in front of our
peers. But a titanic spectacle seems to be more important, than real life.
 Although the film appears to script the young ones, that do not appear to
be totally comfortable with the language Portuguese, still it has enough
punch to kick and deliver. It's much too difficult not to like Nelio, whose
story the film is centered on, and it only makes this reviewer wonder, how
many other stories are there like that out there, that deserve to be filmed.
 Nelio's village and family have been decimated by the civil War in
Mozambique, for reasons that are not clear in this film at all, which is
rather nice really. It doesn't matter whose war it is, it only matters that
it kills and destroys what it should have respect for. But these wars do not
know what people mean, or are. Nelio manages to escape, and as soon as he is
alone, his vision allows him to see things, that tend to guide him. An
appearance, of a healer that disappears and only leaves a lizard behind, is
his signal, and he works with this as much as he can. In town, he becomes
better known, because he has an ability to help a few heal, even if it might
be the power of suggestion, or in his case, a true need for a "family", or
some "love" which the war has taken away. All I can think at this moment in
the film is, .. so this is what the colonial powers left behind ...
 Nelio, as the film starts, has been shot, and it is the baker in a theater,
who has been trying to save him. But the medicine that he has acquired is
coming to an end, and Nelio has not finished his story. Nelio's fame also
brings him the man whom he has hurt, and we won't spoil the film for you.
The film is then run in flashbacks, as Nelio tells his story to the baker.
 If there is a sad thing about this film, is that Solveig Nordlund, must
have been running on empty shooting this film. There are moments when things
appear unfinished, and one gets the feeling that either the film stock
changed, or there was not enough of anything to pay anyone to get the
results, even though the film has a feel that is not unlike emsemble acting
for the most part. Various external scenes have different qualities of film,
even though they are in the same place and time. But if anything, this
directors' ability in cutting and mounting a story is so good, that she can
manage to piece together a truly wonderful film that delivers where many
popular faire films could never even try. The shooting style is intimate,
but not intrusive. The angles are natural, and not Hollywood. The characters
are "real" not acting induced.
 But it is nice to see that a film maker is not afraid to make the
statements that Solveig Nordlund does in this film, and still go out and be
able to make another film. Her incredibly large history in film, should be
an indication that there are many like her out there that deserve to have a
camera on their hands and a chance at a large budget. One wonders, why the
Swedish industry has not given this woman much more favor ... or perhaps
Bergman is the only type of film that we will ever see out of Sweden. Well
done, Solveig, well done.
4.5 of 5 GIBLOONS
Reviewed by Pedro Sena, Copyright (c) Pedro Sena 1999. All Rights Reserved.

Title
Review for Pat Garrett and Billy the Kid (1973)
When this film came out it was panned as a bad western, in the days when
John Wayne was still alive and a hero.  Today, this film merits another
release.  It is, so ahead of its time, and so different from any other
western, and such an innovatively designed film that it is hard to fault it,
even if many of the actors in the production were not actors at all, but
musicians.  This production is well thought out and not at all a slipshod
production.  It does have, however, a hard dose of Sam Peckingpah, and his
human approach to the western.
This western is more feasible, than the cardboard set wonders in the history
of the celluloid.
It is the story of Pat Garrett, who was paid to chase down Billy the Kid,
and finally does.  But this is not what makes the film what it is, and what
makes it a good film to see.
The story, here, is devoid of the grandeur of the western, and the hype of
good guys versus the bad guys.  The film makes its point, time and again,
that the bad guys are never really that bad, and that one day, they would be
good guys instead... funny how times change, states Billy one time amidst a
drink.  The law changes
with a different rich man in charge of the town, or bank.  Billy becomes the
victim of revenge, rather than a victim to Pat Garrett in a duel, or a
heroic stance which many cowboy heroes always find in the haven of the
movies.  And not even the revenge of the law.
But what stands out in this story is that it is raw, and personal and it
makes the point of being sleazy and ugly where it needs to and pretty and
respectful where it must.  The contrast is almost too much.  Pat, in the
end, allows Billy to enjoy his night with the woman he has come to love,
knowing that there had been few nights
when loving meant anything to him, or anyone else around him. There were no
loyalties, and he knows it.  And one day, he too will fall victim to many
others who can be bought, just as he was.
The language in the film is not the prettiest, and has some pretty foul
language, which is to be expected in a place where education is basically
non existent, and people only seem to live and hate each other depending on
how much they can gain from it.
And the most obvious touch, that makes this western one of those that appear
so close to the way things might have been then, is the music by Bob Dylan.
Unlike the Hollywood standard of the big sound and romanticized music to
help us along, the passages are illustrated by songs by Bob Dylan, who sings
in his inimitable style, bad voice, and seemingly out of tune guitar.... so
much like the music probably was in those days.... it creates an eerie
effect, that immediately seems to tell us that things are bad, and going
wrong.  In those days, this singer would have sung and played, exactly the
way this was done, and thought out.
And then, there are the way that people dress and behave.  Sam Peckingpah
had no qualms about a woman being naked or loved in the screen, and in this
film, the women are exactly what they might have been, as
opposed to always looking like defrocked dames.  It's nice to see real women
in these things, as opposed to images.  Just like it's nice to see real men,
or better said, real humans, telling a story about the human corruption, and
how favors can change that corruption into something that is called,
wrongly, the law, or the arms of the law.
Superb film.  For all western enthusiasts, this is the eccentric film, that
fits along the lines of Clint Eastwood's Unforgiven, by taking the glamorous
style out of the film altogether.... it creates a stunning effect to
describe a time, when men could behave like real sadists and animals, in
spite of their humanity.
Such is the valor, and value of most of Sam Peckingpah's work.

Title
Review for De eso no se habla (1993)
This is not a bad film.  It's just that it isn't that good either.  But, one
great actor, does make it a little interesting. It's not always boring.  And
I suppose that the story is a bit to blame.
An elder man, whose life is as mysterious as his stories comes and goes.
And he makes the acquaintance, of a lady who has a midget for a daughter.
It is never explained, but the daughter may have been born out of wedlock,
and during a time when the lady had an  affair during a circus visit.
And as D'andrea gets closer to the family, his feelings are turned into the
young lady, who is not specially attractive, but is charming and nice.  In a
social sort of way, she is never going to be appreciated even if her talents
are above normal.  She has become a rather nice pianist, for example.   But
all of this is a reflection of the mother's point of view, and her desire to
make the daughter fit in at any price, without her daughter's own needs and
desires.
D'andrea, is a ladies man, called a "perfect lover" by a woman in a watering
hole, and their loss of this man doesn't go by un-noticed.  They lose a
great lover.  He loses some fun, or so it seems.  But the elder D'andrea,
finally gets his chance, and marries the young lady. And by all accounts,
Charlotte is doing very well in the upper class structure that she lives
with D'andrea.  And one day, a circus comes to town, and the
worried mother tries hard to make sure that her daughter does not get to see
it.
And the film basically ends.  The daughter finds her milieu, and disappears
with the troupe.  D'andrea, is apparently left behind, or just like his
stories, nothing is explained, just gossiped about.  And the film throws the
story away, just like a circus throws life away for an evening.
The film is nice. The women are the attraction through out the whole story,
and when they finally do not become the attraction, it seems that the film
loses its guard.  Charlotte has won out the attention  of the story, and our
attraction span has changed.  We have to decide between the women, or a
life.  And D'andrea chooses for a life and living, which the women like, of
course, but can not sustain day and night, or he would have been married to
one of them.
Not a great film, it is a rather odd one, actually.  Marcello Mastroianni is
very good, and some of the actors are nice, amidst a bunch of card board
women parading around.  At times, one feels we are watching a bad soap
opera.  But the film is better than that.

Title
Review for Yume (1990)
Akira Kurosawa, has been accused of being a rat, because he will not do a
film for the greedy Japanese studios who want him to make them millions of
yen.  Instead, Akira goes around the world to find funding for whatever work
he has finished writing, and gets it done with very little fuss, and with a
lot of international good will, for his trully
beautiful and colorful work.
And while this type of work may not be indicative of the trend of  Japanese
money making films, it is a love offering for the world of film enthusiasts
which Akira Kurosawa has gained over fifty years of film making.  His work
is staunchly personal, and totally against the 'public' faire, which
Hollywood prefers, as does Tokyo.  In the  process, he makes use of his best
friends around the world, who always produce his work, and make sure it gets
released, despite the man being blacklisted in his own country as a renegade
director.  At least he knows he will be remenbered and revered as an artist,
something that the money makers never will get.  What they get in money,
Akira will
get in years of being remenbered as a stupendous film maker, who deserves
it.
DREAMS is a personal set of short stories on film.  And while they are
unusual, they still stand out.  The three best stories ( gosh I don't even
remenber if there were more in the film ) were the first one which dealt
with a child who sees the spirit of the peach trees ( the deva is the
accurate description ) tell him  that he should keep these trees alive
forever, instead of cutting them down for a development, which seems to be
the obvious outcome as Japan grows and prospers into the industrial world.
The hint is
that all the beauty of these visions will disappear.  An odd piece, in that
things tend to appear and disappear in a dance ritual that is dazzling, and
hipnotic at the same time.
The second one has to do with another young man, who is ready for war, in
his military outfit.  They all march into a tunnel, and on the other end of
the tunnel, only the young man shows up, the rest presumably all dead.  It
is a beautiful metaphor about how
war treats people.  The young man is scared, and immediatelly  lonesome, and
having to deal with his own perceptions and emotions.
Another story is about Van Gogh, and how he worked, played by the director
Martin Scorcese ( a special friend to Akira ), a tribute not so much to the
artist, but to Akira himself, who must consider himself a Van Gogh, in an
age where they do not appreciate the real art of the spirit, much less the
country.
As usual, the film is beautifully filmed, with startling color, and so alive
as to make us quite a part of it.  In the field of flowers, where the
painter works, the camera rarely lifts itself above the level of the flowers
who touch the camera lovingly.  A startling commentary about what art is,
rather than what a movie is.  While the actual 'copy' is not what Van Gogh
does, the camera does the same, by providing us with the real inspiration,
rather than money.
A MUST SEE FILM FOR AKIRA KUROSAWA FANS.
BEAUTIFUL CINEMATOGRAPHY.
PERSONAL FILM, IN THAT IT HAS ELEMENTS WHICH COULD BE THOUGHT OF AS
FANCIFUL FLIGHTS OF THE IMAGINATION.

Title
Review for Un héros trčs discret (1996)
The French have a knack for unusual stories. This one is another one of
those.  And, while its subject matter is serious in many ways, at a bad time
in their history, somehow they manage to get some humor and intelligence
added to it, and we end up enjoying it. Such is French film. It can be dark
comedy, and often this is vicious and vitriolic that it renders the work
rather obtuse and left behind.
Or it may be a comedy making fun of comedies, in which case the humor often
comes off as obscure and no one understands it.
This film could easily fit anywhere between comedy and tragedy. Somewhere,
in the middle are the films that try to tell stories about France's
involvement in WWII, which often is considered a non-involvement, in hope of
preventing itself from being totaly destroyed by the Germans, or anyone
else. To help with these efforts, the French organized "La Resistance" which
co-operated with the western anythings for a long period of time. The
question is, the film brings about by accident, where does it start and end?
But the obvious reason for it is clear. Survival of the fittest and the
cleverest, if not for themselves, at least for their families.
Albert Dehousse has an advantage over some people. He does his homework, and
rehearses his act, and prepares himself for many eventualities, which is not
quite the case in others examples. We are learning by the various interviews
in the film, that there were many people that lived this kind of life, and
that enjoyed some success in these things. Some were not so obvious, but
others were pretty obvious. But Albert's case, if not any different from any
one else, shows that he has the gift of staying cool under fire, and
eventually finds himself working for the French resistance, in the later
stages of the war, when their greatest job was to flush out those who had
defected to the German German side. He does very well in this job, because
he has the steel nerves of any superior officer, at least on the outside,
and displays the intelligence and efficiency that brings about some respect
and support within his own ranks, where many are upset that this outsider,
with no visible record has passed them all for a post.
One day, though, he has to perform the ugly duty of ordering the killing of
his own country men, who have been caught in German uniforms. And this sets
about his "resignation" from his post, and admittance that he was a fake.
The French authorities are embarrassed, but realized the amount of work this
man apparently has done for them, and decide to let him go.
But another impropriety, the smaller one he overlooked, is the one that
lands him in jail. He had married before he disappeared in the middle of the
war. And in Baden-Baden, he married again. And a judge saw fit to throw him
in jail for three years.... of all things.
While the film, not any kind of spectacular production per se, is
fascinating, as a study of the times in France, it also shows how confusing
the whole thing was. And this combination, can be frightening for the simple
minded film goer that is not used to thinking ahead, or suspending any
belief long enough to find their way out of any situation. The dialogue in
this film is critical and it is magnificently written and designed to
display what it has taken for these people to survive.  Cunning, clever,
answers, vague, and reversed, the actual answer is never given, and this
seems to be a slightly intellectual attitude that many French love to take
in the sidewalk cafes, and evening discussions. But it works, for them, and
they were capable of using it for their own survival.
This is a very good film. It is very talky, and dependant on the quality of
the translation of the sub-titles, because there are nuances in the wording
of it that change the meanings all around. These are difficult for foreign
audiences, and yet, even with the subtitles, this makes it through. But,
nevertheless, it makes for an ok exercise, because likewise the characters,
in the film, who are being "swindled" by the changing of the truth and the
reversal of the questions, so is the audience. We are watching something,
that we do not know how to take at all.... except as another story, being
told in retrospect, by an elder Dehousse ( Trintignant ), with some
interviews by many people who may have been around at the time as public
figures of some sort. The film tries to use some of the "facts" from these
findings, but they are shady at best.
So people like Albert Dehousse, survived, and even did their duty for the
country in a bad time. Wether they were part of the Resistance or not, if
this film is any indication, one could say that Albert was. This had been
one of the most important questions, since it became the definition of a
hero, or not. But, the whole thing does not take away from the fact that
Dehousse could make up stories based on truth and whatnot. What made his
special, is that he took the hint from a writer in the beginning, he borrows
the story and then "blends" in. In many cases, in one that helped him
display his ability to command, was one that pretty much summarized where
many failed. A group of people, all memorized the same story. And Dehousse
realizes that it is a story, and arrests these people, because the same
story was in a magazine that they all read, right in front of them. And
Dehousse, takes hi scue, and immediately adds the support of someone under
his command, as a way to distract the obvious attention on him, as a person
that did not deserve the post in the first place. As it turns out, the
French authorities, probably had the right man at the post, because all the
others were fighting each other for points and superiormanship, which at
times, seems to have undermined their own work.
With some very good acting by Mathieu Kassovitz,  and a very good supporting
cast, this film does in a small anount of time, what most films really can
not do. It tells a story and then some.
Very good film, with some very entertaining exchanges, and stories. It is
also, a look at a very peculiar time in France's history.
Reviewed by Pedro Sena. Copyright (c) Pedro Sena 1997. All Rights Reserved.

Title
Review for Mediterraneo (1991)
While there were many people that were involved in World War II, many dies,
many also survived by a stroke of luck, the type of luck that  they did not
imagine until much later in life, or even right after the end of the war.
A battle ship is set to go to a Greek Island, on a mission to either help
others, or search for enemy outposts.  When they get there, it appears that
the island is empty.  They go in, and set up camp.  And the story begins.
Their boat is destroyed, and it isn't clear what really did it, though their
is a suggestion ( not caught on the subtitles ) that it was a German ( ? )
boat that did in this one.  And in their emotional upheaval state, they get
scared during the night, and also damage their radio.  And now they are all
alone, with little communication with the outside world, and can't figure
out what to do.
As time passes by the town populace begins to appear.  First appear the
elderly, and soon a Greek Orthodox priest.  And all of a sudden they are the
town.  And after the elderly begin appearing children and soon the women.
One is a prostitute, that immediately sets up shop with all the soldiers.
As time goes by, they all have tried her
except one.  And when he does, he wants to marry her, and take out a bit of
the fun that the others had.  But it didn't seem to matter to much.  By this
time, they have mellowed out some, and are no longer neurotic about the
romantic side of battling the enemy.
The war ends, time goes by, no one notices it.  One day an English boat
appears and takes back to Italy who ever wishes to leave.  The married one
hides and does not leave.
The film jumps ahead, and the other old ones return to the island. The
captain had wanted to go and change Italy for the better.  He comes back
disgusted saying that Italy was not interested in getting better, or
changing.
While it isn't a great film, it is nice to see the characters change from
the young guns to the older, nicer men that they become.  And their view of
the island and the world has changed. No longer do they have a view which is
distorted by the idealism of youth.
Well directed film, that plods along nicely, with some funny moments.
4 GIBLOONS

Title
Review for Belle noiseuse, La (1991)
I can only think of two countries where film is treated as pure literature,
and very often allowed to live as such.  RUSSIA has a history of film that
is always in the neighborhood of three hours long.  And FRANCE.
And the reason why these films are long, is because both of these countries
have a fascination with the artist's thoughts at its deepest....what drives
them, to create.  Or, as is the case in many Russian films, the character
studies always have to live out their
life, be it in pain, or in sweetness.  A little of the Dostoyevsky  style to
their film, if you will.
Jacques Rivette, has never made it as big as Francois Truffaut, or Jean Luc
Godard, or Claude Chabrol, or Eric Rohmer, but if LA BELLE  NOISEUSE is any
indication, he is better than those ever were.  To be  perfectly honest with
you, LA BELLE NOISEUSE is not a film, but really a special work in progress,
and you should only sit through the four hours, if you enjoy the suspension
of disbelief ( and belief ) to watch a film maker that allows the hand to
paint at its own pace, and an artist ( and model ) to go through their inner
changes... with the inevitable result at the end as a finished
piece.  THE FILM IS JUST THAT.  And even as the aging Frenhofer says
himself, it has no meaning, it just lives, there are no rights or wrongs,
just moments, where the sparks fly and the canvas is on fire, or nothing
happens.
And there is more open moments for ad libbing in this film than Godard ever
created.  It strikes me that the dialogue was set amid ideas, and the actors
were allowed to flow with it until a result was achieved.  And the director,
of course, has the same dilemma as Fronhofer, because he has to find those
moments. And indeed, HE DOES.
The story is really simple, and has nothing to tell us.  An aging artist
named Frenhofer ( Piccoli ) who has been living with Liz ( Jane Birkin ),
has stagnated for ten years since his relationship to Liz either has
softened, or lost its spark.  Before that he painted with wild abandon, and
spent much time with her.  And in many ways, the film immediately suggests
that it is the fact that they were involved which hurt his art, since now it
is
personal, intimate, and there is a tendency to be protective  so not to hurt
it ( which could have happened before ) along the way.  In comes a 'student'
who wants to learn, but it is his girlfriend  ( Emmanuelle Beart ) that ends
up being asked  to pose for the aging painter, much to the chagrin of her
lover.
And the film starts the process in motion.  We follow the hand as it draws
its very first lines in years, and it is shy, and unsure of itself.  And the
next two and a half hours are an incredible array of images of painter at
work, and resetting his model, in search of a special moment in time.  Just
about intermission time, the real battle shows up.   There is a certain
point where many artists have been, that can be a bit dangerous. And that is
called the 'point of no return' with a model, and the effect can be
invasive, and uncertain, and often extremely un-nerving to those involved.
Here, either the two continue the  work, or they get involved.  And the
consequences can destroy the work in progress.  The emotional bond
diminishes the work, or so it seems, and Frenhofer makes a point of saying.
It isn't her body he is after, and neither her ideas.  When he admits that
he is afraid of hurting his model, the young woman immediately jumps out and
demands that he continue.  She is not enamored with the job, but has come to
allow, and appreciate a little of his nature.  And in the end, when he has
found something, the model takes a look at it.  And she doesn't like it.
Here it could be
inferred that it showed the real 'her', and that she didn't like it at all.
He has succeeded.  But she is an internal mess. And totally unsure of
herself, not because she does not know anything, but because she has to
evaluate herself.  And she proceeds to do so.  She dissolves her
relationship with the student, the young man who wanted to learn from
Frenhofer, but didn't have the courage to go beyond a certain point in his
work.  The happy artist has done his job.  The frustrated artist ( the young
one ) , still can't figure out his job, or his relationship to it.
Using the hand of a real artist ( Frenchman Bernard Dufour ), doing  work in
real time, the life in the canvas begins to grow, from mere sketches to a
real piece of work.
STUNNING FILM.
IT WILL KEEP YOU THINKING THE WHOLE TIME.
BEAUTIFULL ART, and a chance to see an artist at it.
( If you get bored easily, forget this film ... )

Title
Review for Yin shi nan nu (1994)
Like Ang Lee's previous film, this one is funny, sad, wonderful, boring,
interesting, all wrapped up into one package.  As ususal, the story is about
the chinese in a new place and time, in America, and their  adjustments to
life, in general.
But, unlike, THE WEDDING BANQUET, this one is funnier for many reasons. The
word is eccentric.  And the bottom line is that we will never understand one
man's thinking, let alone one woman's. And the inevitable suggestion is that
a misplaced national of any kind, makes even more irrational decisions.  And
EAT DRINK MAN WOMAN, gives us just such a wonderful twist.
Chu, has been a master chef for a long time.  And since his wife died, his
way of enjoying life has been to cook up feasts for his three daughters at
least once a week on Sundays.  But the meal is overdone, in that there is
too much which the daughters can not even eat or touch anymore.  For chu,
burying himself in work life this is easier than facing the world, or his
daughters, with their ever present love life.  His is nil.
And one day, he has finaly gotten tired of the lack of appreciation by his
family.  He decides to make a little time for himself, and even comes up
with a girlfriend.  But, here the surprise is unwrapped, like a sumptuous
meal.  And, like a great chef, another dish is served.  But this time it is
not in the restaurant or the home.  It is his feeling, that has finaly been
defined enough, that he does something about.
With some nice touches here and there, the cinamatography around the food is
rather interesting.  It uses a fast cutting style, to show the fast way that
a chef thinks and acts in most cases.  But, in life, it is all slow.  The
daughters can never make up their minds, and Chu can't decide between
retirement, or hiding.  Well, he ends up doing neither.
A fun film to enjoy, it does stand out.  Ang Lee is letting us see a side of
the chinese life, that we never had anticipated in the  movies.  And for
once, the characters are not card board, or stereo types.  And it has some
nice touches.  The food is just amazing.  Makes your mouth water.  The film
isn't quite that good, but it sure teases enough.

Title
Review for All Stars (1997)
    The recent wave of films from the Netherlands, and some other parts of
Europe, shows one thing that Hollywood has yet to learn. That one does not
need massive budgets to make films, and that with some clever work, and well
thought out acting, a small film can look much better than many high budget
productions that show more gloss than dedication. ALL STARS is one such
film. For all its obvious lack of a large budget, the film incorporates many
funny moments into a very nice package, and manages to make the film very
entertaining for anyone.
    It is the story of a bunch of guys that have been together for many
years playing soccer as a team. As they approach their 500th game, and they
are having a harder time fielding a complete team, we come to see that there
are other problems that they all have individually. Many of them go way back
to their days as youngsters. Others are results of not to early experiences.
    The film, more than anything else, is a nice, gentle study of
friendship, and what it has taken to keep these guys together for so long,
despite their many directions, and work. But the film, while being sensitive
to many of the characters never loses sight of its funny moments, and makes
sure that everyone of the guys has a laugh, or enjoys a funny moment.
Meanwhile, all this stuff is not fun for some, but it is not enough for all
of them to break up each other's friendships, even when it may be adding
some terrible stress to a few families that have gotten here along the way.
    One mother is upset because her husband lies about his Sunday outings.
One other has a "father" who used to be their coach. It turns out that he
was adopted, and couldn't exactly leave the old man to go to games but had
to. His girl friend is not any more inclined to understand their
relationship, which is not revealed until the old man is dead. And then
there is Bram, who has been gay all this time, and no one knew it, but he
has not had the courage to tell any of them. His plight comes alive when he
does not respond to a girl that likes him, but can not get a response out of
him... it is one of the films finer moments, and so gently filmed, that it
is hard for us, to dislike the film, its direction and style. And of course,
one of the guys is unfaithful, etc, etc, and nearly ruins his own
relationship to a woman that is pregnant and whom Bram happened to have
liked when he was a kid.
    There are few films that pack such a wallop of a story, that is, so many
things to go after, and manages to keep things going for a long time, and
never really bore the audience. It does so, at times, by crossing to moments
of comedy .. like three of four of the guys have an awful time making it to
the game, it is raining cats and dogs, and the referee drops the ball on the
muddy pitch, and declares the game suspended. After all the trouble, justice
is served by the weather. Like can be trying sometimes. But amidst the funny
stuff of the away game at the "farm", one of the guys manages to get his
mouth in trouble, and then some. All the stuff that we always look back and
find funny and amusing when we look at it all later in life.
    ALL STARS is far from a film that demands attention from the audience,
but it has a sudden charm that attracts you to its story and plight of each
character easily enough. it is shot with ease, nothing slick, or fancy here,
just plain good camera work, and well designed use of the film, which might
have suggested that these people had to do their work under the direst of
needs and consequences, and the result is a charming film, that is very
enjoyable.
    The acting is rather nice, and each character is actually pretty well
defined giving the idea that an ensemble has been developed and designed to
prepare this thing for shooting. it's hard to tell if there are any stock
characters here, as they are all different and have their own agendas.
Reviewed by Pedro Sena.
Copyright (c) Pedro Sena 1998. All Rights Reserved.

Title
Review for Mui du du xanh (1993)
There is one very nice thing in this film, which reminds me of the care that
Akira Kurosawa has in filming his material.  It is the subtle attention to
detail, and the deliberate, and quiet, shooting style.  The camera kind of
poses in one place, and the action slowly develops in front of it, as if we
were hidden in the bushes and caught the sights.
Like many of the films out of China, the most distinctive style in these
films is the design which tends to look very meticulous, with the slow style
of camera movement.  The action in front of us has a look of a direction to
the actors that is carefully detailed and defined.  Somehow, it never hurts
these films. It, instead, enhances the characterizations.
The Scent of the Green Papaya, is the story of a young girl who is hired as
a maid in a reasonably well to do family, in the days of the French
occupation of Vietnam.  The young girl withstands the disrespectful attitude
of the young lad, who chooses every moment he can to do something
inappropriate.  She maintains her work, and does it well, while slowly
learning about the family and its reclusive members.  Grandma has been in
seclusion and prayer since the war days.  The father once in a while
grabs the money from his wife's business and runs off for weeks at a time.
The wife is accused of not being able to love her own man.  In turn, she
suggests that it wasn't her choice to marry him, or vice versa.  One of the
sons is a very good piano player, and is becoming a composer.
And several years go on.  Miu reaches into her later teen years and becomes
the family cook.  She does her work carefully, meticulously, and quietly.
But her mind already has a few hopes and ideas.  She has caught the eye of
the composer, though he is basically involved with a woman from an upper
class family, who doesn't respect the servants, or what they have and
appreciate.
And one day she is seen putting on a dress that makes her look very good,
and attractive.  And she is caught by the composer. And things change.  She
ends up being with the composer, and the story of the film is now ended as a
flashback, to a tale being told to a young one, in the form of poetry, a
reading which inspires the young man to compose more music.
The story is not complicated, and neither is anything about this film, but
the watching of it, makes one wonder in the early stages what is going to
happen.  It is never clear what will happen.  An aging man is still pursuing
the elderly woman in her loneliness.  But the maid, Miu, never loses  sight
of the things she cares about.  She still manages to take care of the
cricket she has kept in a small cage, and fed all along.  Her care is a nice
symbol for her style, and eventually she gets rewarded for it.
Really nice direction, with few wasted shots or fillers at all, this is a
film that also pays much attention to the music and how it fills the space.
At first it is heard as an
echo that runs through the house, the only symbol that this is really one of
the main themes in the story.  But the film does not give it away, and
neither does it suggest that this is one of the main parts.
With some very nice acting, and very carefully designed angles,  this is not
your average film.  It comes off as a study in movement and angle design by
what is a rather confined space for all the action to take place.  The only
changes are a  few new things added here and there as time goes by.
Worth seeing.  Very nice work.  Colorful.

Title
Review for Allegro non troppo (1976)
There are a few films that are all cartoons and they are often good, but
have had trouble finding an audience, specially if they are not quite for
children, or maybe they are for teenagers and adults.
ALLEGRO NON TROPPO is a beautiful series of cartoon spoofs set to classical
music, interspersed with some rather hmmm, hmmm, comedy bits in between the
sketches.  The sketches are between the cartoonist, the orchestra conductor
and the players of the music, which happens to be a group of elderly ladies.
The comedy sketches themselves are weak, although there are some very funny
moments.
Featuring the music of Debussy ( Prelude to an Afternoon of a Faun ), Dvorak
( Slavonic dance No. 7 ), Ravel ( Bolero ), Sibelius ( Valse Triste ),
Vivaldi ( Concerto in C Minor ) and a piece from Stravinsky ( The Firebird )
the visual interpretation of these musical classics is as good, if not
better, than Walt Disney's version.  At least, it is better because it isn't
just a fanciful, and spirited, attempt to attract the kiddies.  It is much
more sophisticated, and better thought out from a writing standpoint.  Of
course,
it is easier to say that when Mr.. Disney has already set a standard some
forty years prior to the release of this film.
Debussy .... This cartoon is about an aging satyr attempting to rekindle his
old flame, only to fall prey to his aging.
Dvorak ....  The funniest piece, a great attack on the morality, or
immorality
of the monkey copycats of the twentieth century.
Ravel ....  Rather difficult to explain, but it is about the creation, and
growth of man through out history from the prehistoric days to a modern
freeway.
Sibelius ...  A really sad, and magical piece about a kitty remembering his
better days before the war destroyed his home.
Vivaldi ...  Very funny cartoon about a very independent, and vindictive,
Mrs. Bee, trying to enjoy her gourmet breakfast.
Stravinsky .... A piece about a snake and its mistake when it ate Adam's
apple
and became cursed with the history of man and modern madness.
All in all, this is an exceptional film worth seeing, if it comes around or
is released in video ( I bought it ) to various stores. It really has a more
direct connection with the music than what Fantasia appeared to have for me.
The cartoonist actor, is Maurizio Nichetti, who went on to make THE ICICLE
THIEF which I have reviewed.  Maurizio made his fame by putting together
commercials with a comedy edge to them in Italy.
Copyright (c) Pedro Sena 1994
Reviewer and Moderator of the CENTIPEDE's THE FILM.

Title
Review for Indochine (1992)
This complicated story makes one heck of a film, thanks to the two actors
that pretty much carry it.  Between Catherine Deneuve, and Vincent Prez,
this film actually gets exciting.  The matriarch tries to keep a dream
alive, and the other tries to keep the politics moving forward, and as he
says in the end, the innocent go to jail, and the guilty go free... which is
as much as what the film is about as it is a love story that has become
impossible, and a political event on top of it.
Eliane ( Deneuve ) is a farm owner, who has been able to keep the workers
going, and do very well in the process, even if the communist movement is
beginning to get closer and closer to home.  Eventually, it does so, and the
war pretty much ravaged everything, not only the farms, but also the
personal lives of many people.  Camille is an adopted daughter, by Eliane,
and she is set to marry a nice kid that wants to break the bonds of rigidity
and change in his own family. And after an education in Paris, he returns,
to find that he is forced to marry Camille, and to uphold the family name
and aristocratic position.  It doesn't happen.  His stand is anti
establishment, and the communists are providing a better outlook than the
old system.  After the marriage he leaves.
And Camille, in the meantime gets accidentally involved with a French
officer who has been the mother's lover ( one of many she says ) for  some
time, which needless to say creates an impossible situation.
The officer gets reprimanded for his behavior at an upper class  gathering
by getting sent off to a far away outpost.  And the young and determined
Camille takes off after him on foot.  In the meantime the French are
beginning to lose control.  And Camille finally finds her young man, but he
makes a bad judgement and gets his own commanding officer killed in the
process.  The two young lovers leave, and try to survive for a period under
the blessings of a religious group, until their very own situation has
become also tenuous, and he is asked to leave.  Just then he also gets
captured with his own child in tow, and the story now gets serious.  The
child gets adopted by Eliane, and is raised by her in France.
Camille is captured by the communists, and as is her ability, and
determination, she also becomes one of their leaders, mainly  because she is
a heroine for having killed a French officer.
And in the end ( the story is told as a memory by the mother to the young
son, now both in Paris ).... a reminder how love can be both intense and
meaningful, as well as cruel.
It is an excellent film, very well carried out from beginning to end, and
although it is rather slow in parts, it only adds to the need to see it
resolved.
While the film steers away from the political opinions, it does make a point
of showing that it was the expensive attitudes of the colonialists, much
similar to the style of the older feudal, and religious, system that caused
the whole country to collapse, not necessarily the invading communists.  It
is evident in the film that the megalomaniac attitudes of the upper, and
ruling, classes is the real problem.  And that the new system is promising
an end to those regimes, which many are getting tired of.  In one scene a
group of farmers is destroying a whole family and their belongings by taking
back the land they deserve, rather than be owned by others.
It is a film that fits in the mold of THE LOVER, where a similar situation
also exists, but the process, or strength of the past still dominates.  Here
that structure is really seen to fall.... be it westernized or otherwise.
But the most important of the mercenaries
is the only one that has it all clear... while he has not enough  passion in
his body to be appreciated and loved by Eliane, he at  least has a better
command of his feelings, when he knows that  there is not much left to do,
but go home.
Excellent film, and really quite worth the nomination which Catherine
Deneuve received for the Oscar, and it is a shame that she did not get it,
in a very competitive year.  This film does deserves better fate than be a
forgotten exercise in film making.

Title
Review for Lunes de fiel (1992)
I seem to carry a love/hate relationship with Roman Polanski.  Just about
every time I promise not to see one of his films again, another one comes up
which gets one's curiosity flared up.  And eventually
one falls for it, and goes to see it.  The question is, if this one is going
to be as bad as the previous one.  Not bad in the sense that the film is
bad, but distasteful as Roman tends to be, despite his obviously superb
film, and story telling techniques.
BITTER MOON, is the story, well, let's see.... could be about a couple whose
fires have gone out a long time ago, and are always on the look out for a
new experience... or the story of another couple on a holiday trying to
figure out if their marriage is worth while saving.
One couple is a no win situation.  Oscar and Mimi have been lovers for a
long time, but since Oscar has been in a wheel chair, his ability to enjoy
sex has turned into a voyeuristic event, watching his wife try to enjoy
herself.  And while she is attractive, and a very good tease, it still bores
Oscar to death.  And he tells his story in flashbacks.  Nigel and Fiona have
been married for a while but their ways have gotten boring, and not quite as
exciting as either would like.  She is looking for the word exciting, and
he is looking for whatever it might be that he refuses to grow into.  Maybe
his reluctance is a bit of the stand offish way that his class brings him up
into in his native country.  Pleasures are meant to be kept buried and not
discussed type of thing.
And Oscar and Mimi play on this weakness to the hilt.  It is never quite
clear if Mimi and Nigel do get mixed together and do anything, but in a wild
night of drinking and fun, Fiona and Mimi do have some fun.  While it opens
up some horizons for Fiona, it now leaves her and her husband together to
find
out what they really want from each other, and how to enjoy it.
Roman Polansky is a master of film angles and the visual style that teases
us to no end.  Mimi gets to strut everything she's got, and makes us want
her as much as Nigel.  And Oscar is never oblivious to that look, or
comment.  The question, then, is how is all this going to come to a halt, or
end.  And to me, this is where Roman Polansky usually tends to fail as a
story teller. He's very good at it all, except the endings, which do not all
have to be that tragic, or despondent.  Although, in this case, Nigel and
Fiona do get a chance to start over.  But sadly, the two that helped them
resolve their differences will not.  Their style is, either, dead, or on the
way out.
But, I wonder if much of this is really a reflection of a lifestyle that
borders on the hypocritical, and boring.  The people involved, are on a
cruise of well to do peoples whose best times tend to be how much sexual fun
and partying they can get, if not a business deal here and there.  And Roman
allows us to see this elitist group to destroy itself, and almost take an
innocent couple with them.  It doesn't happen, as the foundation of the
couple is better than what the decadent side might have to offer.
The film has incidental music by Vangelis, badly used by the way ( why
doesn't HE make a film.? ), but as usual the cinematography is what makes
this film so attractive.  It is beautifully designed and thought out.  Few
directors will ever look at things in a style so well defined as Roman
Polansky does instinctively.
BITTER MOON is not a great film, but the performances of Peter Coyote and
Emmanuelle Seigner are excellent.  Both Hugh Grant and Kristin Scott Thomas
come off a bit foppish but nevertheless they are good.  The ending almost
appears as a soap opera. Nice film.  Technically excellent.
3 GIBLOONS
Reviewed by Pedro Sena. Ygdrasil's Film Newsgroup
Copyright (c) Pedro Sena 1995. All Rights Reserved.

Title
Review for Stargate (1994)
Not being a science fiction fan, I was taken along to go see this film, even
though reviews around me had panned this as overweight
garbage.
Well, it isn't garbage, and it has a nice premise, and thought it suffers
from the goddamned military over tones ( will anyone ever
get rid of this crap.? ), it is a nice film, that is fun to watch and for a
few brief moments exciting to be a part of.
Being a person that indulges in the arts of meditation and time travelling,
it is easy to see why I like certain parts of this
film.  The time travelling, hits you so fast that your sucked into it before
you know what hits you.  Nothing like it is expected,
or can you possibly envision, and like the several minutes in the older
2001, A SPACE ODYSSEY, leaves you wanting to try it some more, because of
its exciting possibilities.
STARGATE is the story of an Egyptian artifact, that seems to have several
symbols of the magical kind that connect into something else that most
anyone can not figure out.  The army has been able to steal the thing and
kept it under wraps, and tested the hell out of it, until if finally, comes
around to connect with a down and out scientist and explorer, whose name
amidst his peers is best known as a comedy of errors and ridicule.
The scientist ( James Spader ), amidst his grief and lack of  attention to
his theories, is invited to check something out
by the government, something that they have enjoyed, but have not  able to
crack, though they already know what it does.  Their
experiments have already displayed that there is more to this artifact that
it appears, but the symbols in it, are not clear
enough for them to try something with it.  There are suggestions that some
people have died in trying to figure out this thing.
And they all agree that this thing is most likely, some sort of gateway to
another time.  The question is where is the key, and
which symbols match, in what order, to create the situation.
In comes our man, to whom the symbols appear to be a minor part of the real
exploration, and a suggestion that there is much more to work with.  And as
soon as it is discovered how it functions the inevitable military expedition
is created, to destroy it
if it appears that it is not friendly, or helpful.  Kurt Russell is the
military leader chosen to lead the expedition, and the group enters the
space.  Our scientist is the last to go in, and naturally he is curious, but
cautious. And as soon as he enters the film takes off on its own moment of
shining glory, the part that is just absorbing everyone without them knowing
it.  And there are more symbols in that minute than the film could possibly
ever show, but the trip is worth the price of admission, and at least an
amusement ride.
As the group arrives in another time and place, they eventually find a place
that is in a desert atmosphere, and is ruled by
a demonic being, who has designs on doing some more conquering, which
includes the earth, and other places to which it can time  travel through
the magical properties of the gate itself.
And our heroes take on the roles of leaders and help break down the evil,
and free the land from the oppressing rulers ( oh, wow !! )
and then the real story has to come into play.  It seems that the military
expedition was to destroy this other place, because it
was thought to be a potential problem.  And with the ruler now destroyed,
the mission is over and it is time to leave.  But the
scientist, whose efforts on the earth were laughed at has met a girl he
likes, and decides to stay.  End of story, but one more
trip before it ends.
James Spader is nice to watch, and so easy going amidst people that are so
uptight with their knowledge, that it makes for a
nice set of exchanges through out the film.  He doesn't panic, and is ever
the curious scholar in search of his knowledge, where
everyone else is basically worried about their ideas and plans. The
scientist has no plan.
Jaye Davidson plays the evil ruler that is intent on taking advantage of the
Stargate for his own needs and greedy desires.  And very
good he is, with the help of some magnificent design effects of the
electronic kind that shine in the movie.  The guards are
an electronic version of the real person, and have a power that most people
do not.  And a mask that is right out of the comic
book variety of heroes that we do not often find, in film.
Well designed, pretty to watch, and enjoyable, even if this is not a
masterpiece, it does have moments that are just too nice
to pass up.  The best of them is the trip.  Now, if we could get rid of the
military exclusions ..... will anyone ever write
a Heyerdhal in space.???

Title
Review for Setouchi munraito serenade (1997)
 MOONLIGHT SERENADE, is one of those films that just could not be made in
America.
 Japan, suffered with the advent of the bomb, and its position in the World
War II, but if anything, its artists and writers have never let the world
forget what this change really meant. For many, it was a good riddance of an
old system that had out lived its usefulness anyway. But for a handful, who
had been a part of the system, it now has created a catharses, that they
have to go through... what to do, and how to live, and how to respond to it.
 And the film does a couple of things that are truly magnificent directing
ideas, and make this a special outing for the few viewers that get to see
it. In America, we have no idea how a generation felt, and lived, really,
since it has all been buried behind a Walt Disney like story, and denial
that anything happened. It is good to look to the future, but is it wise to
ignore the past and what people went through.... maybe living in a situation
that you are better off not knowing what happened, is not such a blessing
after all. The Hollywood controlled "fantasy" took away from people
admitting to themselves that they were unhappy, and could not deal with
their unhappiness, unless they were drunk, or took on a fantasy film that
meant nothing but escape. As close as one comes to realities of war, seemed
to be films like Casablanca, which, on their own, were also escapist, in
that while these people were victims of war, they really didn't care if they
were or not, because of their personal agendas.
 The film starts out with the Kobe earthquake accident in 1995, as a trigger
for past connection. All of a sudden we see the past, during the end of the
WW II, and his family's trip to Kyushu, to bury his older brother's ashes,
who had died in combat. And many of the children friends of his, joked that
the family was going to commit suicide, since it had been the honorable
thing to do at the time, for many government officials, and their
subordinates. He undertakes to go visit his family burial site, just like
his father had done when he took the whole family on this journey 50 years
ago.
 And the misadventures begin. They have to take various methods of
transportation to get to the location they intend to visit. The longest of
which is a ferry ride overnight, amidst a bunch of people that they
obviously are not exactly used to be around. All of a sudden, what had been
a slight upper class family, is reduced to being next to all the others. The
father, a policeman, is now reduced to being a man, like all the others. He
has to refrain from doing "his" duties, and although he speaks at times in
favor of the ideals of his duties, by the time he speaks in the ship, it is
obvious that he is waking up to the fact that this is another world, and
that he will have to change. But there are a few adventures in the voyage.
He meets an odd cast of characters, a couple of black marketers, one of whom
has a few movies in his bag, and he makes a few monies by showing these
things for a fee. Or a drug addict appears, and one never really understands
what he is running from, or for, but as they leave the ship it appears that
this man had been wanted as a criminal. The film, in one sequence, shows an
old black and white film, and it appears that the actor is this man, now on
drugs, with little respect, or cares about much of anything. In any case, he
seems to be a criminal of some sort, just as he was in the previous snipet
of film that we saw.
 The story itself has a lot of topsy turvy turns, that at times make it
difficult to follow, but it has a couple of nice moments... the man, now
older and wiser, turns in a tunnel and watches a family walk by... it is his
family some 50 years before. This side bit of a psychic nature, is the only
one ever used, but it does not detract from the nature of the film, and the
possibility that 50 years later, Keita himself, has never really left that
past world that he had a glimpse of through a few films. But it is a nice
touch, amounting to a very strong suggestion as to what all the people in
Japan went through at the end of the War... they were all cleansed of the
past, old films dealing with ancient samurai traditions were forbidden, and
most films that were shown were American, and of a completely different
nature at the time, showing a much more westernized society that Japan had
not seen at all. We know that these things do not disappear over night.
Fifty years later, it appears that he is still thinking of that past world
some, even if for him it is a film image of sorts, rather than a reality.
 The one thing that this film won't let go of, which makes it enjoyable, is
the young one's innocence. Keyta, now a writer, never lets go of the moments
that made his life enjoyable. His younger sister's innocence, and his older
brother's desire to follow a young girl he met. These things, at the time,
may have been funny to him, but now appear a bit larger than life, and the
impetus for a story, that has enough moments for us to be able to really
enjoy it, without getting side tracked by understanding. His father had a
terrible time with his changes. The wife was resisting, probably much more
than he cared to accept or admit, his older brother is tired of the stern
father, and wants to leave, and his young sister who believes that they are
all going to commit suicide, which the first time the father hears, is not
funny. But by the time he hears it on the train, towards the end of the
film, it is clear that it is now a joke. And it is here, that things start
taking a turn. The jar of the eldest son that Keita has to guard until it is
in the family's burial ground, accidentally falls on a moment when Keita
actually did something heroic. In the hurry, the jar falls, and breaks in
the train tracks. To everyone's surprise, there are no ashes in it,
something that the young girl had joked about one time when she shook it.
And all we find was inside the urn, was a tooth brush. Keita's ashes had not
been recovered, so his mother made do, with a toothbrush. It is funny, but
really signals the end of a tradition. It almost seems like the family trip
ends there, like they do not have anywhere to go from this point on, or that
the whole thing is pointless..... an excellent time to make a statement
about the cultural changes.... things are different now, and the father
Kokichi now knows it.
 The special part of this film is the filming of all old stuff in a yellow
filter, giving it a bit of the sepia toned color style, reminiscent of
photographs, something the film starts with fifty years before. And it only
has a few moments of pure color, when Keita remembers things, or is on his
way to Kyushu.
 A very nice film, well directed, with some very nice touches. It really
shows a culture in disarray and change, not knowing how to deal with itself,
in its very new roles. The film deals with it magnificently. It is well
thought out and touching in many places. The performances are very nice and
the children are excellent all the way through it.

Title
Review for Three Seasons (1999)
(Seen at the 22nd Portland International Film Festival, in Portland, Oregon)
 Some films have glitz. Some have actors. And we rarely tire of seeing these
things. And then there are some films that just "are" and are not trying to
be anything symbolic or meaningful, except to "exist". This is one of those
films.
 THREE SEASONS has a series of threads, or stories, that do resolve
themselves rather well. However, if this film is a sign, this is about the
way that Vietnam has grown since the end of the war, and how it has become a
more modern country, while also showing us what it has not left behind. I am
not convinced that the film is really trying to bring across anything of a
statement, since the film maker is obviously well defined in terms of what
his vision is, and these kinds of films, one goes to see for its vision, not
its gut wrenching story. This is here also, but in many ways, it is a sort
of poetic justice, that the Vietnamese culture may be starting to create for
itself.
 Of the four stories, one can hardly separate what this is leading to. They
do cross each other's paths here and there in rather subtle ways, but never
to interfere with each other's path. So one could easily define this as a
"day in the life", and a photographic style that is so caring and
understanding that it helps us really fall for the beauty of the film. It
has heart and then some. One could hardly expect any more from a film.
 One story centers around a young girl who has joined a group of women to
pick up lotus flowers and then go sell them in the streets. Unlike the older
women, she decides to sing a different song one day, and she attracts the
religious leader, who is very ill and has stayed away from the public for
some time. Even though there is no hint of it, I suppose that we could think
of him as a war casualty. The young man has lost his fingers and can not
write poetry which he used to in his younger days. His face, and no doubt
his body, are terribly disfigured. And the young girl is allowed to visit
him. She has a liking for poetry and words and takes on the job of writing
down the stuff that he recites. As he dies in the end, she takes it upon
himself to put into action one of his visions, or dreams. A really beautiful
little story that gives us at least one thing that we take for granted in
life, that we rarely work with. Make a poem out of life, and live it
through. The second story is the one that seems slightly out of place, but
must have been added to the whole, and it does not take anything away from
the film. An American comes back to Vietnam to see if he can meet up with
the woman he had lived with (or married - not clear), and had fathered a
child. His campaign is hitting dead ends until the day before he is to leave
when he meets a young girl that looks like is the one he is looking for.
Apparently it is, and he ends up in a restaurant talking to her. He had sat
in front of the restaurant the whole time in the film,  probably as some
sort of memory that this was not a restaurant way back then, and was the
location that got him what he has come to realize was a gift. The third
involves a small child who walks the streets selling small items for his
boss. One day he meets the American and his box of goodies is stolen. He
gets punished by his master, and continues his journey looking for the box.
Eventually he finds it, and along side comes another young girl, who will be
his companion. This is the story that hits us the strongest, and in of
itself may be the one that has the largest point to make about anything.
 And the fourth story is the one that we can not get away from. A young
prostitute is making a living and has high hopes and dreams that one day she
will not have to walk the streets again. A cyclo driver decides to help her
as much as he can and drive her whenever she needs. But her dates do not
seem to be picking her up, as much as they dump her. Her hopes are dashed
and this is something that she does not wish to face. The cyclo driver gets
a chance to make some money and fortune is on his side. He buys her for the
night, and gives her a dress, that is rather old fashioned compared to the
clothes that she wears. And instead of him wanting to make love to her, he
wants to watch her sleep. He leaves her breakfast in the morning.
Unfortunately, he has made displayed the very thing she has hoped for, but
can not get from the men she picks up, and this brings out a crisis for her.
In the end, it appears that she has given in to this man, who genuinely
cares for her, above all else, something that she has not been able to
appreciate yet.
 Of all the films in the 22nd Portland International Film Festival I have
seen, this one stands out as the premiere one. It's one of those films that
is difficult to let go and not appreciate. The direction all through out is
so clean and well done, using different styles for each story, to create a
wonderful tapestry that is rare in many films. This is a film that is not
trying to impose anything on our minds, not trying to say anything, and yet,
the one thing it teaches us is that poetic justice does exist, and perhaps
this is the one thing that Vietnam has grown to become that we have not yet
seen, or learned about.
 With some magnificent music along the way, this is a truly stupendous film
that deserves a wider audience, were Vietnam not a sore point for too many
Americans. Here is a country that has grown out of the war, and is making
something of itself, if the film has its only point that it is making.
 Outstanding acting, and work through out, it is without a doubt one of the
nicest films this reviewer has seen in a long time.  Few films feel this
good, and show you the "good" come out ahead. If anything, this is as
positive and hopeful as anyone can look at anything, be it a country, or the
very people that make up that country. And it takes a very special film
maker to do something like this, one that has the courage to dare see the
good side of things, and find the good people.
5 of 5 GIBLOONS
Reviewed by Pedro Sena, Copyright (c) Pedro Sena 1999. All Rights Reserved.

Title
Review for Seul contre tous (1998)

FILM TITLE:       SEUL CONTRE NOUS (I STAND ALONE)
DIRECTOR:       GASPAR NOE
COUNTRY:        FRANCE 1998
CINEMATOGRAPHY:  DOMINIQUE COLIN
CAST:                Philippe Nahon, Blandine Lenoir
SUPER FEATURES:  Is this reality, or neo-realism? Is a live butcher shop on
the stage in the theater the only way we will wake up to "reality"?
(Seen at the 22nd Portland International Film Festival in Portland, Oregon)
 Several years ago, another film maker came around, and went to work doing
things that no one else did, in a manner that no one else did, with little
regard for how we felt, or how we would react to the picture that he had
made. He became the darling of sur-neo-realism, if there is such a thing, in
that his films were always strange, obscure, but always managed to make a
point by the way things appeared in the film. Not at all because he wanted
to create a philosophy, or a thinking, about anything he did. But his
intuitive side of things, created a harrowing reality for movie go'ers. How
is one supposed to feel about these things?
 No sooner had the director heard us discussing his stuff and us believing
he was making a film because ... , he concluded that he didn't want "...to
make a film about politics. He just wanted to make a political film...",
where the situations and people took on themselves, be them actors or not.
Not a story, not a foolish Hollywood fantasy, but something that might get a
solid reaction out of us. In other words, he DID NOT make film to tell us
how he felt, or how we are supposed to feel. To this day, I believe that
this film really helped define something in film the world over, that few of
us may really understand. This may be the same mentality that gave us the
Reign of Terror, but 30 years later, what has it arrived to? The same, and
more. The film maker was Jean-Luc Godard. This film delivers a Reign of
Terror, but one that we may not wish to deal with.
 I would imagine that for anyone unfamiliar with these kinds of things, a
film like this is a massive shocker. This film never stops at the words, or
just a symbol or an idea. It plunges right ahead, in front of us, and
brutally so. It's hard to fathom that anyone would be this bitter, or
disappointed in life, to create such a film, and such an experience for any
audience to sit through. But it will get your attention if you can sit
through it.
 In the fifties, it took the acting of those now known as giants in the
Acting Studio, and the English Angry Young Men to express the displeasure
that many of us have in the society we live in. In the sixties, it seemed
that drugs and music were the channels for the same thing, of which Godard
also took part, although differently so. The seventies and eighties were
sedate by comparison. Then in the nineties, one sees something like this and
it makes one wonder, if things in France are in such a stupor and such an
edge, that another revolution may be in the offing. A film like this, is a
vicious attack on the social mold that has pretty much destroyed the worker,
or at least this man. It's hard to imagine that this is just a "film", and
that its power stops at "film". How real is all this? How close to reality
is it really? How much of this is the man's imagination? One can hear
psychologists blaming the man's problems on his inability to blah, blah,
blah. And society as a whole can not be at fault. Or one can hear film
critics attacking these things as not films, or the favorite American word
(heaven forbid) - Entertainment.
 The story is simple enough, as if there were any need for a story to be
there at all when one thinks about it. A man that had grown up being a
butcher, all of a sudden finds himself out of work, and not in favor with
anyone. He has just finished serving jail time for an incident, when he
thought that a man had raped his daughter, when in fact it had been her time
of the month. His return from jail to society, was not favorable. He takes
on a mistress, and one day leaves her and her mother, after making an awful
mess of things. As his anger builds, he finds the need in himself to go
visit his daughter and perhaps reclaim her from the institution that she is
in. And the film kinda stops here, though the man's mind doesn't.
 And here is the astounding part of this film, the most difficult thing to
deal with as it is totally uncensored in any way, shape or form -- a film
that would get a guaranteed X rating in this country if it went beyond the
portals of Film Festivals. It's a wonder that it got that far unnoticed,
that's for sure. Right from the start, we are treated to the man's story and
his opinions. The question is where is his temper and mind going to take
him. The inevitable suggestion, is that he is strong and capable of doing
something horrible, and the film seems to make it clear that he does just
that with his mistress, but in the end, it gives us the total opposite.
Maybe he did not do what the film showed he did to the mistress since he
could just as easily have done a similar thing here to his daughter.
 So, in the end, all we can think is that most of it has taken place in his
mind, or at least we hope so, because it is hard to believe that he could
not control himself well enough to learn the harsh lessons that life has to
offer ... well, I imagine that we in the audience want to think so, because
seeing something that brutal usually merits very stiff penalties in the
societies that we live in. He is visibly angry, but it is not like he does
not remember the silly affair that got him in jail. Or that he would be
stupid enough to follow through on his murderous vision and mind.
 Few films, ever, are so powerful, and do not stop pulling their punches for
a minute, so the audience can take a deep breath. It is difficult to think
of this film as bad, since the design and concept is well thought out, and
extremelly well done. It may not be our favorite theme, or film, but it is
very hard to dismiss its obvious points. Most films can only give "opinions"
by comparison. This one punches your gut with it with its realism.
 This is one of those films that is best seen by those that have a stomach
for harsh stuff. This film is harsh and then some. Sort of like the day we
saw Sam Peckinpah do the killing spree in slow motion, so we could witness
the mass orgy of madness that we take ourselves into - that we refuse to
learn, or accept and continually repeat in so many countries the world over.
Our love affair with hate, and destruction. Or our belief that something is
more important than another, to the point where human life is secondary to
the cause. And maybe this is the point that Gaspar Noe wants to make, which
the character mentions. We have become too weak and have no courage to do
something about it as a country anymore. We have resigned, and are left with
nothing but an act of animalistic desire that allows us to cleanse ourselves
for a small period of time. But with all due respect, to this point of view,
could this be a sign of the serious dis-satisfaction with the way things are
shaping up in France? Or in many parts of the world, hidden by toys that we
think make us happier?
Very powerful film that is not for the weak stomach. Very brutal, mentally
and physically so. A film that really could be said speaks for our angers
much more than we care to admit.
4 of 5 GIBLOONS
Reviewed by Pedro Sena, Copyright (c) Pedro Sena 1999. All Rights Reserved.

Title
Review for Qin song (1996)
Seen at the 21st International Film Festival in Portland, Oregon
        Chinese films are not known for their sumptuousness in production, and
their extravagant design in film. In most cases, the films are produced by
the film organization, and the director has a film he wants to make. This
film, is a break from tradition. This is a major undertaking, and film, and
it shows it. It has all the magnificent things that make an Akira
Kurosawa's RAN, or a David Lean's LAWRENCE OF ARABIA, the two films that
one might say, it closely resembles in production style. It has the
cinematography and music to match, which makes this an absolute must see
film, and experience.
        THE EMPEROR'S SHADOW, is the story of one of the first attempts to unite
China, 200 years BC. But unlike another story that deals with merciless
rulers, this one has an edge. This leader thinks that the one thing that
might unite his kingdom, is "hearts and minds", rather than politics. And
the trigger for him, is a young man he had befriended in his earlier days,
when he himself was almost killed. He had been playing music at the site
where people were being punished with their lives. This friendship did not
continue easily. As the new leader slowly defeats the other kingdoms, and
makes a serious attempt at uniting China, he finaly comes to the last three
he has to face. Two of them are easily enough done. The third is tougher.
Gaio Jianli is now a well known musician and instrument maker, and the new
emperor wants him to be a part of the new Empire, as a composer. However,
there are serious oppositions to his choice of ambassadors for the public
campiagns. Most of the aristocratic party of his, is opposed to his naming
the musician to the court.
        As Gaio gets brought to the court, he undertakes a fast, and is finaly
taken out of it by the emperor's first daughter, who had been disabled and
could not walk. Their union, is dangerous, as the daughter has been offered
to one of the more important generals, who has been with the emperor from
the start. But Ying's desire is the musician, and their courtship is
outlawed. Which creates serious problems for every one around. In one
scene, the emperor has to undo the honor of his subjects by revealing that
they are not as clean and honorable as they make it sound. That their
concern is for all the things that they themselves are doing, instead of
the larger picture. This may have been right, but the political forces, are
trying like crazy to undermine the new emperor, and they are getting
stronger. Towards the end, the new Emperor is ready to be crowned, but he
has lost his important general, who was to be married off to Ying. The
general, it seems, decided that his new wife was a whore and killed her,
and the two servants of the crown killed him at that moment. All signs
point to the political adversaries as having gotten the victory here. And
that this victory is likely to be short lived since they do not really
support the new emperor in his quest to unite China in a meaningful way.
Many of them think that Gaio was the problem in the first place and should
have been done away with.
        A rather complicated story, and one that states that the kingdom lasted
only 15 years, but set the tone for the ones to come in the future. China
has had since then a rather complicated aristocracy, who has ruled the
masses, and is likely to fall into other hands, should this control
dissipate, or fall into competing interests, which at this time are not
exactly clear, or visible.
        What makes this film important, is its sumptuous nature, and beautiful
design, and care in so many details, as to make this a very important film,
and unlike any others that have come out of China in the past several
years. Up until now, many of the film makers have displayed a personal
story. This film is much less personal as a complete entity, although its
story is not. It deals with what might become of the future.
        The most outstanding thing in this film, and all of it is magnificent, is
undoubtedly the music of Zhao Jiping, who is demontrating his immense
ability, and shows that he is a major composer, not only for film, but all
of music as well. The soundtrack here is magnificent, and stands out
through out the whole film. Add careful visuals, and beautifully
photographed stuff, and you have the makings of a superb film.
        By all standards, the film is extremely modern. One always got the feel
that many other films from China were of lesser design, whereas this film
has a major studio like production and design, which China has not been
known for in film.
        With excellent perfomrances, this is a must see for true film lovers.
There are not many films that come off with such aplomb as this one does,
and it s directed with extreme care, and attention to detail.

Title
Review for Island on Bird Street, The (1997)
Seen at the 21st Portland International Film Festival
    For a film that is billed as a foreign entry, this is really one of
those films that transcend classifications. It does help, for American
audiences, that it does not have subtitles, and that what it does have in
foregin languages, is not really "necessary" at all.
    Europe has, over the years, issued many films that stand out as
testimonials to survival, from the many people that were oppressed during
World War II. This film, should be listed amidst some of the very best. Few
have such a nice story, amidst such awful consditions as those that are
presented in this film. And it is a tribute to the director that this film
is so beautifully polished and comes off so well.
    And if this is not enough, it also includes the beautiful music of
Zbigniew Preiner, so descriptive and ready to help the film along. It is not
a showy score, like a Hollywood mammoth picture show, but it is subtle, and
solid, and speaks many more volumes than otherwise.
    It is taken from Polish writer Uri Orlev's novel about his  survival
instinct and luck during a time when the Germans were segregating the Jews
and exterminating as many as they could. Alex manages to survive in the
rubble of the household where he had lived, with only one companion, a small
mouse, who was instrumental in helping him find food, the mainstay of his
survival for several months. And the main line in the film seems to be the
father's strong conviction and faith, that he will return and that they will
see each other again, if they come apart, which is likely.
    During this time. Alex manages to create himself a space, where he is
less likely to be found, or disturbed by anyone like the Germans, or
curiosity seekers, or thieves. From his spot, he can see across the street,
into a building, where a girl his age lives. As Alex becomes familiar with
the surroundings, he discovers that there are underground tunnels that help
him get out from under the brick walls and barricades. He also manages to
help the cause of these Jews, by finding a doctor once, and eventually
making friends with the young girl. But his act of heroism, may have been
the undoing for the helpful doctor one time, as the film suggests, but we
know is otherwise.
In time, the wall comes down, and the residents return, and in the film's
finest moments, the father returns. Although the lighting suggests that this
might be another dream, it is not, and the film comes to a close. The young
man has survived, with a little luck involved, and is doing well, although
he no longer has around the girl he had met, or his pet mouse, who had been
instrumental in finding his food.
    With some excellent performances, Jack Warden being one of the best,
this film marks what the value of many foreign films have that Hollywood has
rarely appreciated, and has failed to take to the American public. This is a
rare film, and beauty to watch all the way through.
    With some awesome sets, and designs, this film has very little that
could be said to be weak, or bad. It's "truth" is what makes it, and the
film does not complicate things.
Beautifully directed, and acted. Excellent film. MUST SEE.

Title
Review for Congo (1995)
CONGO is a story, and film, that wants to be appreciated.  But there may be
a problem with it, in that if it isn't the writer's fault, then it is the
director's, in that they can't make up its mind wether it wants to be an
adventure film into the heart of a jungle to find something mysterious, or
another story that uses the jungle as a  backdrop for its own motives, which
are pathetic, and boring.
It's hard to conceive that the writer, who has had many successful works
done into film, would not have considered this option, and stayed away from
the adventure film syndrome.
Basically, it is the story of a group of people that are hired to go after
some diamonds, clean and uncut, in an area in Congo that is historical and
is believed not to exist except in fairy tales, and local folklore.  But,
apparently, the main reason why it is considered to be so mysterious is
because it has,  somehow, kept every single person that has gone near its
spot, thus adding to  its misery.
And the group that is assembled is a variety of misfits that have different
agendas, and all vicious in their own way.  And the leader of the
expedition, is a black man who is actually a mercenary, who is involved in
several political intrigues, some of which involve all the chances he can to
make sure that his group also gets the treat they want. The corruption of
many African states and their government, is just a slight bit in this film.
But the film is no dummy, and the writer no less so. Basically all the
characters are corrupt in their own way.  They are all overly infatuated
with their own agendas. With
the exception of one man, who has come on the same plane to bring a gorilla
back to its own home.  This gorilla is special. It has learned to talk,
through a few instruments, and this communication helps many of them pass
their way through the jungle and into the place they are looking for, which
just
happens to be there unexplored by the human eye.!!!!!
But the expedition that is meant to take this gorilla back to its home, has
problems, and ends up getting added to another group that has different
objectives in the same place.
While CONGO, has its moments, it also has its drawbacks, even if, at the end
a form of justice is served and done.
The best acting work in this film is served by the gorillas ( David Anthony
is magnificent ), who are pretty darn good, and a few small roles here and
there, including Tim Curry.  Aside from that, CONGO is a well designed film,
and technically well done, were it not that all these resources get wasted
in the hands of someone whose direction is questionable, or the book itself
just isn't good enough.  Maybe if it was just another adventure story, it
might have been more interesting.... like reversing the roles, and going to
hire the gorilla trainer and its sidekick, to help along, instead of using
the pretext that
one man is returning this trained gorilla to its roots, which, to this
reviewer diminishes the character of the film.  One can't help wonder if the
Berkeley ( wouldn't you know it !!! ) student that is trying to return the
gorilla also has alterior motives of his own.
The jungle is full of surprises, and a different group of gorillas is also
involved, and they end up getting trampled, along with a complete
destruction of the whole area in general.... they do  archeologists a great
favor by burying the whole thing in the inner part of the mountain amidst an
exploding volcano..... how timely, too....
Use your money on something else, unless you like to see people acting as
gorillas, in which case this movie is excellent.  The gorillas are the show,
not the bad ones.....

Title
Review for Ran (1985)
Nowadays, the only real well known Japanese film maker ( unless you happen
to be in a film department in a major university ) in America, thanks in
part to Steven Spielberg and George Lucas, who went out of their way to make
sure  this man's best work was remenbered and revered.  Must sees include
THE SEVEN SAMURAI, THRONE OF BLOOD ( based on Macbeth ), YOJIMBO, DREAMS,
KAGEMUSHA,  and so many other films,... he is the scourge of Japanese
producers, who wish  to make billions ( not millions ) while this director
just wants to make  critically acclaimed work based on his vision.  Almost
all of his work has been 'stolen' by either Hollywood or Cinecita Roma, who
went out of their way to make garbage remakes of the same story.
Fortunately, the film copyright system forces the flattery makers to thank
the originators with some green
backs for their creativity.  It says a lot for the copycats, doesn't it.???
RAN is based on William Shakespeare's KING LEAR.  And instead of following
the story like Shakespeare, Kurosawa turns his three children loose until
they not only have destroyed themselves, but also everything in sight.  Like
LEAR,  where we actually feel sorry for the main character, this becomes a
tour the  force for the lead actors.  It's only weak spot, in my estimation,
is in the scenes with the FOOL, which tend to lag,... perhaps because his
voice is not specially attractive, or 'soft' enough to seduce you with 'his'
wisdom.  Here, he is a fool breaking down as well, which may explain the
awkwardness.
Much like THE SEVEN SAMURAI, the choreography of the battle scenes is so
intense, and well done, that you can't help feeling you are there.  And you
end up taking sides with the father, and thinking the children are full of
it.  I think this film is more of an 'expose' of the downfall of the feudal
lord system in Japanese society ( specially seen today with their economy
coming down to reality ... the rise of the middle, and fighting, and working
class ) than it is based on the story of King Lear, although the sequence of
'fillers' in between the action is decidedly Shakespeare flavored.  Unlike
the Shakespeare play, the women in this film ( one in particular ) are the
downfall of at least two of the sons.  Brutal too!!!
But it is beautifully filmed, and has country side shots which are breath
taking,... you can even hear the wind golliwog the mountains several times
 which is real folks,... ), has no music per se ( a compliment to Peter
Brook, ??? ), though Kurosawa doesn't always use music, a sore point with
his producers.  Kurosawa likes the silence, and the inherent sound  effects
found naturally.  Story goes that he bumped into the sound effects
accidentally,... and he has kept them.
Akira Kurosawa's other films are worth seeing, if you decide that you wish
to see something which tends to make you think a bit.  If your mode is not
art films, or curiosity in some one else's point of view, then save your
dollar.  But HE is GOOD.

Title
Review for Get Real (1998/I)
(Seen at the 22nd Portland International Film Festival, in Portland, Oregon)
Despite what might be considered a rather taboo subject for many people,
there is one ting that transcends it all, when it comes to the art of film
making. Some films just are so well made and directed that it is impossible
to even dislike it, in spite of the subject matter that nears the area where
every parent really hates to hear about it, much less deal with it.
Yet, in the capable hands of a director with a magnificent sense of purpose
and design, a film that could very easily have fallen into a melodramatic
and silly film, where the social points of view take precedence over the
quality of the spirit, and the desire to be honest with oneself and his
friends. This film stands up so very well, that it should teach us a lesson
in what is the meaning of love and understanding of self during those
moments. Rarely has a film deal with one subject, let alone two, and done it
so impressively.
GET REAL is the story of a young man, who realizes early that he is gay,
but he is not really sure what to do or go about it. And the other young man
he happens to come to like, is a bit of a jock, and has some serious
problems that he has a hard time dealing with. He may walk away with the
sports award for the year, but he does not get the top award which is his
knowledge and understanding of self, and therefore the ability to feel free
about his spirit and self amidst his classmates.
In between the first and last moments of the film are some rather
satisfying and pleasant lines and situations that help the film along. It is
funny, without being ridiculous and it is serious without being over the
top. Directed with care and attention to detail and balance, this simple
film, becomes a major staple and representative for a generation that is
having a hard time dealing with its films. And if this is not enough, it
takes a gutsy mother to accept things first, and help settle the crap down
once and for all.
if this is not enough, the performances are excellent, and specially strong
and helpful in this film are the three women that help the whole thing go
forward. Linda, a bit over weight, but a close friend to Steven, is a
special treat. and she provides the breaks when we need them, even if they
are at the funniest of moments, during a dance. And later, a girl that
starts to like Steven, but is not aware of his predicament, also help
forward the story rather nicely into its major conclusion and triumphant
end.
While many may be shocked by the content and some people did walk out of
the theater, the fact remains that these things are there and as much a part
of school life as they are a part of society. Were we better able to handle
it when it takes place in our younger days, we might have had a society that
is less guilt ridden and more accepting of those who have different feelings
of affection for members of the wrong sex. This film deals with these things
rather carefully but never gives up, and makes sure that the total honesty
and beauty survive to win.
Few people have that much in guts and honesty about themselves and their
lives. This film is not the answer, but it goes a long way in helping people
understand themselves and their personal feelings, at a time, when
repression and lies seems to be the one thing that most concern themselves
with. Kudos all around. Specially the magnificent casting and use of the
actors. Not for many moments do we get the feeling that we are dealing with
generic characters, and the script helps them all come through. It's hard to
believe that anyone can ask for more in a film.
The film also makes magnificent use of various music, and also has a very
well designed cinematographic stand, which is designed to help lighten up
the moments in such a way as for us to find them human, and not corny. How's
that for excellent design in direction?
4.5 of 5 GIBLOONS
Reviewed by Pedro Sena, Copyright (c) Pedro Sena 1999. All Rights Reserved.

Title
Review for Intervista (1987)
I would like to call this film the CINECITTA's version of Hollywood's THE
PLAYER.  We'll have to rename it THE DIRECTOR.
I think this film suffers from FILM INTERRUPTUS once too often, and while
Fellini's totally free shooting style, and outrageous ideas, as seen from
the very tall crane shots, pretty much sums up the whole thing.  No one, in
that major studio second only to Hollywood in number of films ever made, can
ever stand up and feel the  freedom of creativity which the aging master has
enjoyed.  And while in his earlier days, his films had a feeling of
necessity, a feeling of desire, and a feeling of wanting to create something
new and different, this time, it has dried up a little, and the film becomes
a series of moments, and events, during the filming of any work.  And in
between a Japanese crew is working diligently to try to interview the famous
director and try to get him to  discuss his ideas, which generally he does
not. He doesn't call them ideas, he calls them life.
And the difference is quite apparent, when he proceeds to show a house full
of guests ( Anita Ekberg's  ) a few moments of his best film, 8 1/2.  That
film had a dreamy nature which few have been able to re-capture, even
Fellini himself, though his attempts now appear very pale in comparison.
While still a fun film to watch, there are a lot of absurd bits and pieces
 the screaming director, the elephants, the Mel Brooks send up ), it also
undoes some of the magic which film creates.  The  scenery from the trolley
car which goes around the studio is obviously  canned, and we see the start
of it, and then the feeling disappears as we are inside the trolley and we
can no longer see the mechanical part of the work anymore.
But for watching a film master, whose ideas are not in his head, but in the
film itself ( GODARD once said he didn't want to make a film about politics,
he wanted to make a political film and statement ) and pretty much asking us
to figure it all out ourselves.  INTERVISTA, is not a film about figuring
out anything, but a simple film about how someone like Fellini actually
works.
Amidst the great mess, and mad ego studios, he manages to create his own
scenery and do it well.
FUN TO WATCH.
IT IS A GOOD FILM, THOUGH AMERICAN AUDIENCES MAY WONDER WHAT THE HECK...

Title
Review for Dragonheart (1996)
Of all the films that came out that week, this was one I wanted to see, just
for the fun of it. This is what I call REAL entertainment, if not a
"pointed" style of entertainment. And though it has well known actors for
its parts, they really are not necessary, because the film floats along
rather well, specially when it comes to the special effects and the nifty
little  stuff that we get to see.
Well, the kiddies might like it better than we do... we are supposed to be
adults and as adults we do not believe in faury tales and bs stories. This
is a bs story, but who cares, when it is fun to sit through anyway.
And it takes a dragon with an attitude to make it happen.  Well, the rest of
the film, I don't know.
But it is fun to sit through with all the flying and the friendship that a
dragonslayer develops with a beast, who know is able to get what it wants in
food and drink and have a knight to protect it as well. But it takes a few
battles between them for the slayer to realise that the real threat is not
the dragon, but the fear that people have developed which is taken to
political heights.
Is the story meaningful in this film... I don't know. If I find one, I will
rewrite this review. But in the meantime, it is fun just to watch a dragon
with an attitude and some rather nifty special effects to make things look
much better than they really are. Well, the acting is alright, nothing
fancy, and the slayer has an attitude as well. But without the dragon's
funny disposition, this film might not have been as much fun to sit through.

Title
Review for Aguirre, der Zorn Gottes (1972)
This is one of the earlier Werner Herzog films, and it put both himself, and
Klaus Kinski, in the knowing, that they were around to stay.
Klaus Kinski had done many B rated films through out Europe, and had never
been able to acquire the respect he might have liked to have for a half way
decent actor ( even if his life is not ) and the quality of work he could
do, when given the chance.  Werner Herzog was a perfect vehicle, because it
allowed Klaus to experiment and Werner to just shoot many rushes, when the
actors don't know it.  For this reason, many of Werner Herzog films, have
characters which are well developed, but also show an inclination to do one
or two things that don't seem to fit, but they work.  Such is the price for
improvisation on an expensive medium.  Add libbing is often a better answer
than a temperamental writer, or worse yet, a temperamental actor, which
Klaus is, if the special (shown occasionally on PBS) on Fitzcarraldo is any
indication.  However, the continuity of the character is better, thus
showing a side of the actor, which is not always found in the pre meditated
and over studied acting styles.
Aguirre, the Wrath of God  is a good film, if you happen to like to see an
endless jungle, full of green-ery, mystery, and secret noises, and spaces.
Accompanying this visual film is the music of the German group POPOL VUH,
whose music is moody, very well defined, and well applied.  The music for
this film was around, before the film was made, which suggests that the
director took the feel of the music and built a scene around it.  The
perfect example is the opening of the film, when the music has a sad
somberness to it, which is filled with an incredibly beautiful long shot of
the Amazon jungle from a distance, with its fog moving in slow portions
across a very large valley.  Underneath, is the river, and Aguirre on his
raft, running into the side of the river in the fog.  The mystery, may be
infused with blindness after all.
Aguirre is the story of the Spanish explorer who went up the Amazon river to
find Eldorado.  He never reached that far, and disappeared totally, nothing
of his voyage, raft, or belongings was ever found.  The myths and legends
say that the Indians killed him, which the film plays to the hilt.  By the
time Aguirre arrived in the deep Amazon, many of the tribes had already been
alerted to the evils of the 'white man in a hard robe' as the Guayacu
Indians described the old Spaniards in their armors.  However, there is also
a story that he did arrive at the higher plateaus of Peru and decided to
stay there forever,  for he found the area beautiful beyond belief, which
the film also plays on.
In between this slow moving, but beautifully shot film, Aguirre tries to
withstand the common ailments which befell those who tried to navigate an
incredibly difficult river to maneuver, due to its size, and chaotic waters.
He manages to survive until the end, when the arrows of the Indians finally
have done in all the menders of the raft.  The film ends with the raft
moving downriver, bumping into a few rocks, turning, and moving down another
slow stream, until it fades out of existence.  The camera pans upwards to
the sky and the film ends.
It isn't a great film, by any means, but it establishes what Werner Herzog
will perfect in the later film NOSFERATU , which is a cohesion of music and
visual style.  Aguirre, though a curious film, is not an enjoyable film,
though we may learn a line or two of history while watching it.
Only for film addicts, and art film students.
Still, it is a good film.  Has little dialogue, except for Aguirre's
meanderings and fantasies.  It is the study of one man's obsession.

Title
Review for Frankenstein (1994)
Copyright (c) Pedro Sena 1995. All Rights Reserved.
It is nice to know, that there is always one novel that no one, can ever
touch and make any better in a film.  This has been done many times, but, as
usual, the emotional stuff, and the showcase moments are always taken away
from the novel and presented as
great moments for the screen.  And a film looks good, but is not really
following the novel.
While Kenneth Branagh's version is very good, and very close to the novel,
it basically fails in the moments where the doctor has to defend himself.
Perhaps this film might have been better if the lead were given to another
actor, and Kenneth allowed himself
to direct it, and not have to show off the lines, as greater than the whole.
And this is the major complaint that this reviewer has of this film.
Dan Curtis's television version of this novel, still remains the best of all
versions of this film, and the main reason why, was that the film lacked
resources, and it had to make do with much care and dedication by the actors
and people involved.  The same is not quite true on this film, but it does
have its moments.
The best acting in this film is done by the bit parts that are important in
the novel, but come off as not very good in this film, because they are
overacted, or punctuated for meaning. John Cleese is magnificent, but is
wasted because his scene has to take one minute, when it should have been
better taken care of.  It might have set a tone of care for a great novel.
Instead it showed a Hollywood tradition of cutting several pages into a set
of lines.  Then, the  problem might arise that this story would be over
three
hours long.  Good.  The story is that good.  But the film can never be
unless it does the novel justice, even if it looks good.
Missing in this film is the period feel that the Hammer studios perfected so
well.  The moody spaces.  The superstitious public, which the novel uses so
well to trap the reader in its web of suspense and desire.  In Branagh's
version, one gets the
feeling that the whole thing has to hurry up to get to the end, which has
already been given us at the start.
The monster, played by Robert DeNiro is very good, although I tend to prefer
Michael Sarrazin's version in Dan Curtis's magnificent film, and I happen to
like Christopher Lee's  wonderful representation of the monster.  His is
very different, and makes an attempt at becoming a person, which happens in
the novel, but was ignored in all other versions, including Boris Karloff's.
Perhaps the difficulty here is weather the story should be about the
monster, or the doctor.  Kenneth Branagh's version is more about the doctor
than it is about the creation, though it uses the narration of the story.
While this is the right attitude of the whole thing, it never gets off the
ground as one would have liked, and once again my view is that Kenneth
Branagh was not as good as he might have been, had he not been directing, or
vice versa.  He is a good actor, but one gets the feeling that here, he just
is not prepared enough.
The film is good, don't get me wrong, but I do not feel it is as satisfying
as some of the others, specially Dan Curtis' magnificent one, which still is
the best of all the versions
of Mary Shelley's opus novel. Maybe not the most accurate of all the
versions, but certainly the most intuitive and touching of them all.

Title
Review for Ŕ nos amours (1983)
A dysfunctional family is falling apart.  And the ones that suffer the most
are the teenagers.  The father has been having an affair and has made plans
to leave the house.  The daughter has a  boyfriend and the mother does not
approve of her behavior.  And the son commits himself to keeping the
family's business running while the mother is going through her tantrums.
There really is no solution, just some acceptance of the fact that things
are far from perfect.  The mother has the hardest time accepting this, and
takes it out on her daughter, no doubt suggesting that she made the same
errors in her earlier days which have brought her to the current situation.
There is really no solution to the whole thing, and as is the case with
another film maker in France, this is just another day in the life of these
people.  No solutions or suggestions are made.
This reminds me of Godard's theme at one time that he would like to make a
political film instead of a film about politics.  So he tears down the
fourth wall, and let's us see the whole thing from all sides and angles.
The result, is a film that only allows you to follow the emotional
outbursts, and avoid any serious conclusions about any thing.  We do know
one thing.  This family is pretty much broken up and where it is going is
not something anyone knows, or expect to know very soon.
The acting, is the strong point in this film.  It manages to keep the
tempestuous people alive and fighting for their own space, amidst little
sub-plots here and there.  The son has to side with the mother, and really
does not dislike his sister, but he is forced to play dad, since he is not
around.  The father comes and goes when he pleases, since he is paying the
rent, which he is about to stop, probably because he is out of a job.
Where will it all lead is the question, and since we do not get these, and
any, answers, the film is likely to be a frustrating adventure for many.
But the acting is tough, and solid, and very well prepared.  There is no
lack of consistency between any of the parts in the film.  It takes no
sides.
Well directed, considering the small script.  It appears ad-libbed many
times, but this is to its advantage in this specific situation.

Title
Review for Gothic (1986)
The stories surrounding the Byrons's and Shelley's that abound, and have
been turned into many a myth, are looked at, here, as a link into the
creation of the novel of Frankenstein.  This film, is the  story of the
forces that created some literature, the best known of which is Mary
Shelley's opus work.
But looking at these romantic writers, in the mountains of the Swiss alps,
amidst many thunderstorms, is a bit more than one can really expect, under
the hands of the director Ken Russell.  The film starts and ends as a freak
show.  And in between, it REALLY
is a freak show.  But then, what price creativity, it seems...???
In a suggestive ambience, and amidst many creative binges, this acting
ensemble manages to bring forth a bit of the feeling, and lines, that are so
famous to many people in the world of literature. I doubt that anyone will
appreciate the context through which any of this is done, specially the
literati, but much of it has been documented, and told in many stories
regarding these romantic heroes and their women, and their jet set life
style.  The fact remains, that both Byron and Shelley became two of the best
poets of the 19th century, and that Mary Shelley's novel was magnanimous,
and scared the wits of all of those writers.
The story, that became within the story, is basically what this film is
about, and although the imagery is a bit on the weird side, it does kind
bring about the many sides of things.  Shelley is a bit of a flake, but
inspired.  Byron is serious, but his seriousness
creates some lovely rhymes.  Polidori, is a gay, disturbed person, a doctor
who decries not having been able to become an alchemist. And the women,
well, at first they were just the women.  Mary had a long history of
political intrigues, her parents having been famous for the women's rights
movement in England.  Clare was a rich girl
having some fun.
The story suggests that their meetings included many sexual adventures, but
given the stature of their work later, it is hard to believe that sex was
all that their get togethers were all about.  The film tries to bring out
that point, but gets lost in the shuffle.  We do end up looking at things as
a bit of the jaded minds at work, all the time.
Gabriel Byrne as Byron, is interesting.  Julian Sands as Shelley, comes off
as a bit effeminate, and I wish that someone had infused a bit more of the
poetical mind.  Natasha Richardson as Mary Shelley is the most interesting
of them all, in that she is the curious type amidst it all, and a bit of the
nurse trying to keep everyone together.
In the hands of the director Ken Russell, this is an interesting endeavor,
and probably one of his less celebrated orgies of visual garbage, but the
film is a bit on the loony bin, kept there because the characters inside are
a freak show by any standard, even if they were famous.  It's a sad
treatment, because there is much more literature, than mere words, that
affected all of these people, in order to create the minds that changed
literature at the time.  This, is obviously missed in the hands of Ken
Russell, or perhaps we don't care anymore, unless it is a freak show in the
first place.
Interesting, but then again, only if the story of the times appeals to your
sense of curiosity, as to how these creative forces came  together and
helped each other write.  The one thing that the film does not clarify, is
that Byron insisted that some of these meetings be done STRICTLY for writing
purposes.  The results are famous.  The
film will be forgotten.

Title
Review for Hearts of Darkness: A Filmmaker's Apocalypse (1991)
IF THERE WERE WAS A REAL DOCUMENTARY ABOUT A TRUE EXPERIENCE, AND ONE
ESCAPES IT TO TELL THE STORY, THIS IS IT.  THERE AREN'T VERY MANY BETTER
DONE DOCUMENTARIES THAN THIS ONE.
 I happen not to be a great fan of Francis Ford Coppola.  After the first
Godfather film, I dropped out.  The sequels, can gather all the accolades
and reviews, I am not going to see them.  Peggy Sue was fun.  Pennies from
Heaven I fell asleep on.  But the stuff he has produced for others, now that
is something else.
While being extremelly receptive to world cinema, he also tries to invest in
as many foreign film makers as he can, probably hoping Hollywood will notice
someday.  Unfortunately, when is all said and done, and  written about, the
real genius behind his work is not Francis at all, and his ideas, or
intellectual pursuits.  This documentary is even better than Francis' own
work.  And the reason why is because she doesn't quit because there has to
be an explanation.  She keeps going, and one gets to see more action, than a
script has ever seen.
Essentially, this is a documentary about the making of Coppola's now famous
'Apocalypse Now' film, and its incredible problems during the shooting of
the film, which had to be done in an area where the rebels were fighting the
Marcos government, and that was devastated by a monsoon, by Martin Sheen's
heart attack, and by a preponderance of an over stuffed Marlon Brando.  But
it was Francis' ability to be able to match the fury, and beauty, of the
moment which made his film a success.  Despite the fact that he had to
ransack his house, and all his personal belongings, to achieve it.
The basic premise of 'Apocalypse Now' is Joseph Conrad's Heart of Darkness.
The real premise of this documentary is the real Joseph Conrad's Heart of
Darkness not the animated version found on the film.   And it takes  his
wife to see and notice the clear parallels of the story and book.  Here he
is having a breakdown, and she is talking in retrospect about watching a
man go through a cataclysmic event in life, and succeeding at it.
Eleanor's observations are incredible, and really show Francis as a smaller
person, because he is so emotional where she is so steady.  He is
extravagant.  Se says she could do without it all, the china and what not,
in fact she'd prefer that she didn't have it all, and enjoy a simpler
existence. and we are watching her husband nearly kill himself with his
vision.
It is an amazing little trek through the jungles of man's idealistic, and
often cruel mind ( sounds familiar Joseph? ) which results in an
achievement eventually.  There are no better parallels to make. this is it.
Where literature does not meet film, it's where it becomes film.
With added new music by Carmine Coppola, and touched up by the Grateful
Dead's Mickey Hart ( who did ALL the sound effects and percussion for the
original film, which tells you that Francis was aware of Hart's musical
curiosities, and expansion as a musician and person ) this film becomes
another impressive work.  It's hard to believe it isn't a real movie on its
own......it sure feels like it.

Title
Review for Man of No Importance, A (1994)
This is not a super interesting film, with over bearing plots and themes to
hammer you over the head with.  But it is a film that comes and goes and
will surprise you in the end, with its sense of wonder, and expectancy.
A popular man, who works as a ticket collector and seller in a bus line in
Dublin, has a fascination with poetical theatre, and he hopes one day to
stage a play, with the people that ride the route he works with everyday.
He has a big dream, and every person fits the vision he has.  The main
problem is that he wants to produce Oscar Wilde's Salome, which has great
poetry, but is specially known as a play that deals with sexual content and
innuendoes, that an un-educated audience may never appreciate.
And as the rehearsals start, just about every person that he got to
participate in the play is having some problem, including our bus man.
Salome, the play by Oscar Wilde, is about a special kind of freedom, rather
than anything else.  The lust the play brings about is not what it is about.
And, of course, all the situations that are regarding the sexes are off
limits, and treated with much disdain.
Our man, decides that he finally wants to live his fantasy, only to have it
turn sour on him.  But, even if his play and plans fall apart, he still has
the poetry to keep him going.
An excellent performance by Albert Finney, it is hard to find better actors,
this small film, stands up proud in design and conception. It is a wonderful
showcase of acting, from those around the bus man to the others in the
immediate family who begin discussing the ugly parts of the play behind the
scenes..... the vicious  misogynist feeling and other sexual situations.
A great film, really well done, and read ever so carefully and beautifully.

Title
Review for Love Dream (1989)
Italians love to make shlock films.  And if they aren't about the mythical
heroes like Hercules, or the Amazons, they are about the extremes of
fantasy.  In the fifties and sixties, it was this European country who
embraced the work of Ray Harryhousen, specially the Sinbad series, because
many of these stories are related to their romantic past history and tales.
This film is a bit different from those stories, but follows the same
principles of the myths.  A young man, has lost his friend, a fellow member
of his band who was apparently instrumental in helping him create the hit
songs he had written, and this loss has pretty much caused him to retire
from the music world, in an attempt to either
find himself, or to find his own piece of mind.
And he has plenty of time to be by himself, and the beach area where he
lives.  And one day, he has a notion that he sees something just off the
beach and he swims to get it.  He brings up a vase and takes it home.  It
turns out that a genie, a very pretty woman, has lived in it for a long
time.  He has always dreamed of a special woman, and all of a sudden she is
here.  She has a magical touch, and he likes that.  Their relationship
develops, and she makes her accidental mistakes by granting him his wishes
without realizing those are not what  he is looking for.  One is to build a
palace on the beach, which will destroy the natural wonder of the place....
And in time, she helps him face his lost friend, and his quitting the  music
business, but in the process he also finds that he is losing the genie that
loves him, but to whom he can no longer respond.  And the rejection is a bit
of a fall for the genie, who now has lost her vase ( stolen by the man
trying to get him back into the music business ) and is dying.  They get the
vase back and the genie gets back in it. The vase is returned into the
ocean.  And the young musician is now alone again, and almost drowned, left
in the beach.  And lo and behold, there is a jogger who passes by, and helps
him, and she looks exactly like  the genie, except that this time she is
real.  End of story.
While this film will never garner much attention as a very good one, there
are some very nice touches here.  It must have been written by a musician,
for the music is continuously shown, and an integral part of the film.  The
songs are the mind of this man.
The film has a bit of the SPLASH in it, but is different.  It features
Christopher Lambert in his younger days, probably before the HIGHLANDER
series of work which made him well known.  While it is obvious that this
is not a major production, it at least has enough in it to make it a very
nice, small film, the type you find in the fantasy sections of your video
store, but you never heard of it.
WORTH A LOOK when you just want to will the time away.
Romantic film in all of its aspects.
The music is not great, but it is nice.

Title
Review for Jericó (1988)
Seen at the 16th Annual International Film Festival in Portland, Oregon.
Aside from the fact that this film appears ( technically ) to be a bit of an
amateur effort, at least a few things standout as very good.  The
cinematography is actually very good and well thought out, and were it not
for that this film would pass as a mediocre effort.
However, it isn't a bad film.  It is hampered, and obviously so, by the lack
of quality ( state of the art ) equipment with which a well done film could
have been made.  For an American audience, this will  look a bit like the
films of the fifties, in that almost the whole thing is simple, and straight
forward.  But it is the director's first film,  and as such shows excellent
promise for many years to come, despite a country whose economy is
horrendous.  There are times when the film appears to have been shot with
rather old stock of film, which is about all they probably had.
JERICHO is the story of Friar Santiago who is becoming frustrated with the
way the church does things.  They don't seem to have the enthusiasm for the
environment like he does, or seem to care about anything except their own
expansion.  And for this, he is sent away with a group of  conquistadors
into the jungle, hoping to find new people to deliver the message.  And no
sooner do they cross the first river, does he find the first obstacle.  The
river causes him to lose the books and most of his stuff.  And after the
first night, the group gets split when a band of thieves decides that
following a German commander into the jungle is not what they want.  The
gold is stolen in the middle of the night, and the priest happens to
overhear it and goes out to see it.
He gets caught and has to go with the thieves or lose his life.  He goes.
This group begins dwindling one by one until they get attacked by a group of
Indians, who kill all those running away.  The friar, sits and prays.  the
Indians spare him, because they find him funny.
He is taken in, and begins his job of teaching the Indians Christianity. All
is not well.  They are not agreeable to learning a new word or language.  So
he bides his time, and watches the naked Indians walk around.  One night, he
can't sleep, and one of the couples is in the process of making love.  The
Indian sends him a woman.  Fade to black, much to his embarrassment.  He is
laughed at, because he does not take
the woman.  Eventually, the tribe gets tired of having an outsider
constantly trying to change them.  So they do something about it.  They
inhale a mixture which makes them 'crazy' ( as do so many of those Indians
in the area ) and this time they force it up his nose.  Since the priest is
a stubborn one, he gets several extra doses, until he finally breaks down
his defenses.
In the next event of the tribe they are seen going around a totem pole, and
the priest is going nowhere.  He gets in the middle and is  moving in the
wrong direction.  He meets up with the woman who has taken a liking to him.
The group continues its dance until we  notice that the priest has gotten
rid of his garb, and joined them in  their dance.  He has joined the tribe.
Later, he finally gets to meet another set of conquistadors, and they take
him away.  The priest is now rejoined with another order, and is
encapsulated in a square mud room, where he must remain until he is rid of
the Indian ways, and become a holy man again.  He does not.  Basically, he
will die in this hut, rather than switch back to a faith that really doesn't
care about anyone, except their own motives.
This film is not for the squeamish, for it does have a few scenes which are
untactful, like a cannibalistic scene, and some violence, which is an
obvious comment on the ugly invaders next to the peaceful Indians.  And
there is a good amount of violence, in that the  conquistadors are merciless
in many ways.

Title
Review for Historie milosne (1997)
 While this film states right off the bat that it is dedicated to Kryysztof
Kieslowski, it really is a tribute to itself, that it really owes a little
less to that director than it does to someone like Luis Bunuel, whose
montages in his later films created some rather interesting situations and
stories. And the ending, is what really gives it away, with a rather
enjoyable En Angel Exterminador styled twist ... another victim coming for
more.
 There are four stories in this one, and they take place simultaneously, and
feature, for the most part, the same actors, all roles played by actors that
had graced the late Kieslowski's films. And the main character, played by
the director himself, is the drive in all four stories, and the joke in the
end as well.
 One story, deals with a professor, who gets flattered by a young student,
when she writes in the test that she is taking that she loves him. He is
embarrassed, but nevertheless has to discuss this with her. The situation is
a bit embarrassing for him. Another story, deals with a commander who is
assigned to a role in the army, for which he is to have his wife with
him...... he doesn't have a wife. The third one, is an odd one, where he is
a criminal, who is in love with a particular woman, who betrays him... for
which he gets even with her beautifully, by getting her time as well, right
next to him. And the most important story, is the fourth one, dealing with a
priest. This provides the film with its strongest content, and most enduring
story. There is nothing funny about this fourth one, but the "love" is
resolved, in a fashion that states in many ways, where some institutions are
failing people in not only that country and in many other parts of the
world. The man is a priest, and he discovers eleven years later, that he has
a daughter. His resolution, and his ability to discover himself and do the
right thing, is the one thing that stands out as phenomenal, and makes this
a special film.
 And there are very funny moments in the story.. all four protagonists do
some time with an older man, who records all the events, and he questions
each man, about his love for the woman that the story is about... and this
would have done Luis Bunuel proud. After having used two actresses playing
the same role in "That Obscure Object of Desire", he went on to tackle even
further the weirdness that we sometimes stand for, and our petty resolutions
regarding our loves and our lives... this is the main theme in the film.
 In all cases, the situations come to the light, in the most unusual of
situations. The teacher that finds himself in a rather precarious situation,
eventually finds himself trapped and has to let the girl fall apart on her
own, and therefore get thrown out of the school. But he maintained a
reasonable sense of decorum and character, as he did not abuse the
situation, although he almost did once, and the second time he was
inadvertently interrupted, which was just as well, for it was clear this was
a dead end for him. In his interrogation, he states pretty much that. The
army story is funnier, in that there is a past lover that he is attracted
to, but they do not seem to connect... it appears that there are a few
things that slow it all down.. she is Russian, and does not have a visa, and
that is a ticklish situation in those parts of the world where people try to
find quick marriages in order to get out of the countries they were in. And
this affair comes apart further at the seems by an sad lack of understanding
and communication. She has a job offer, which would have allowed her to stay
and thus give their relationship a chance... he quits on it, before the
offer comes through. This story ends in a dead end hallway, like the
professor's did. The third one, is the funniest of all of them, and there is
a real love affair, but the lover girl left for a while because he was in
jail. But she's back, since her fling did not last. And in the process finds
out that he has money stashed away, and she gets it, and immediately goes
out of the country... oooppppss, bad deal. Now he gets more jail time
 stolen money ), and she is found in court, where he decides that he will
take the rap, and she says out loud that she loves him... and we know that
she will get jail time, but at least she can not get away with another guy,
is his joke this time.
 And the best story, is the one about the priest. An 11 year old girl comes
to a church and tells the priest/confessor that she is his daughter. And she
ahs all the facts straight. He admits to himself that it did happen, and the
young girl ends up back in the orphanage, where she revolts with a
vengeance, and finds a way out so she can go see her father again. In the
meantime, the pries is having his battles inside his head about the whole
thing. And it is his final decision that makes this film stand out, and
makes the ending so special.
 If anything, it is Jerzy Stuhr that stands out in this fine and very
enjoyable film, as the excellent actor that he is. Playing four roles with
different attributes is hard enough, but they are all in the same "body"
only, and this is hard enough to do, and only the likes of Peter Sellers
ever really did it well enough to be remembered for it.
 If this film is a tribute to Kieslowski, there is one thing missing in it.
The music of Zgbiniew Preisner, but this is handled very well by Adam Nowak,
in a similar style and mood. There seems to be a different style of music,
and each vignette sees to point to one film or another and the music seems
to be the giveaway.
 A very enjoyable film, with a lot of funny bits and pieces... but it really
is more of a tribute to Luis Bunuel, than otherwise. But it is done by the
family that Kieslowski created, with his themes of love, that were often
ruined by some event or another, some of these just plain bad timing. But
the love is always there, even if it does not happen, and drives the film.

Title
Review for You Seng (1993)
Unlike many films that come out in America, Chinese films ( mainland or
otherwise ) have to be careful with their politics and their attitudes
towards their opinions.
If they can not come up with a political film that speaks mountains of
views, say something like Zhang Yimou's TO LIVE, then they spend their time
updating old stories with modern twists.
TEMPTATIONS OF A MONK is this kind of film. It's difficult to decipher,
though, if this film is an attack on an old fashioned, ineffective system of
politics, or just a simple story of a man, who failed in life and  decided
to become a monk, and his past keeps trying to show up and  get him back to
his old life.
Fortunately, in this film, the new attitude, that is, the old past is dead,
survives, even if it takes an old man to do it for the younger one, in what
is a very ironic twist of fate and story, but a rather satisfying one.
The thought that this film adds to the mix, is that not every old person is
stuck on the past. In fact, some elders are also hipper than the younger
ones, who have chivalric ideas and lifestyles, where ego and tradition  tend
to live. Though the old man is stuck on this as well, at least his hermetic
style, presumably, adds a more civil understanding of the life any
individual ought to take. The old man makes the point that the social scheme
( sort of, anyway ) is a trap for everyone except the person itself.
This is a really good film, given that the exposition of the situation is
odd, and perhaps unusual. But we do find that one samurai, failed in his
attempt to save his master and as he feels failed he has to leave the place
where he lives or he will live forever in shame. He figures that he will add
his services somewhere else. However, he finds an isolated space, where an
older man lives, and they strike up a friendship. From this point on, the
samurai begins tackling his past. And it comes to him in all sort of manners
and fashions, until, towards the end, it comes in the form of a sexual
encounter with a woman he used to love very much. And
it is here that the old man interferes.
One may think of this as inhuman, or not correct, but as an allegory, it is
excellent. Just about everything had failed to get the old samurai back,
except a woman. And it takes the religious minded person to show the new
monk that the social trappings of sex can be maniacal, and  downright ugly.
The film ends here, in another peaceful outdoor setting, without making any
more statements.
Making up your mind, in this film is not easy. Perhaps I see more into it.
But it is a nice film, that speaks bundles, and these statements are very
subtle. But one thing is for sure. There certainly is more than one voice
saying, in China, these days that the past needs to be buried and that a new
life is needed. And this may be the under current that undoes the Communist
hold in China.

Title
Review for Kaspar Hauser (1993)
One can always tell when a film has budget problems.  It is all shot in a
stage, and the actors have to carry the whole show.  The shots are all close
to the action, and rarely is any thought given to the larger picture... so
it seems.
There are many versions of this story.  Werner Herzog's totally romanticized
and original story is one extreme.  Historians might like this version
better, since it shows what is pretty much accepted as the probable story
and events.  The details may
change, but the appeal of the character will forever be remembered.
In this version, Kasper is a pawn in the political stage of the Germans
around the 1800's.  Rivals are trying very hard to maintain  their own
control, and they will do anything they can to try and make sure that their
rival does not succeed, and then attempt to take over the ruling family.
Should Kasper's father not produce a son, his family will lose Bavaria to
the rival family.  And the story sets it all up so that Bavaria pretty much
loses its whole family.  The film, however, does not continue with the
political suggestions and implications.
The last person involved in the case is finally done away with and the myth
lives on.  Who was Kasper Houser, and what was he about.?
But this film is not as bad as it sounds, or looks.  It is, another point of
view in a story that has fascinated many for a very long time, and a story
whose political overtones may have changed the life of a country, if it
indeed was such a story.  The film is directed as if it were a play, which
it is, but not the same one.
Werner Herzog's story was, by comparison, a sort of a remake of Francois
Truffaut's The Wild Child, basically using a loose version of Kasper's
story.  When compared to this film, this one will not hold up very much.
Herzog's was witty, cute, had some magnificent music, and was very clever.
This one is mysterious, insidious, and on occasion, the political forces get
on one's nerves.  But it does have some political edges that are very
interesting.  Like an English upper class clusters whose involvement is
curious, not to mention ... that threatens in some way or another, the
outcome of the story.  And of course, as soon as the decadent person is
gone, the story falls apart,
and Kasper meets his end.  It's a nice suggestion that as long as he had
some high connections, Kasper would connect, but the minute he didn't he
would not make it because of the fighting within the imperial houses.
Werner Herzog's films never made us think this way.  They always felt like
an anthropological study of some kind.  This film seems to be trying to
define a point in history.
With some good acting, nothing as good as the whimsical material of Herzog's
but still some good work.  The character of Kasper Houser is the stand out
in this film.

Title
Review for Delicatessen (1991)
Some films are difficult to discuss.  Either they are serious stuff that is
trying to make a point, or they are stuff that is just making fun of people,
and their ways.
DELICATESSEN is one of those films.  Amidst a totally surrealistic
atmosphere, that includes some mime work, and many dreams, this film plods
along until it finally finds a reasonable 'peace' in the end, by making sure
that all the characters that live in fear, and are involved in the making of
the ugly scares, are either gone, or have gotten their come uppance.  In
between a surrealistic group, that looks like the same group that was the
revolutionary statement in the film BRAZIL, is engaged to get some of this
work done, but never does, and may even  be at the wrong address.
After the war, this family, living in one house is full of people and
relatives that do not have a job.  A butcher is the leader of the house, and
one day hires a young man who has pledged to do a good job.  And amidst the
usual odd events is the fact that there is a 'butcher' that also scares a
few people with his cleavers, and occasionally uses them. The suggestion is,
that in the hard times, any mender of the family that is just dead space
will be hacked up to provide some money for everyone.
The newly hired young man is a curious sort.  He is an ex- circus performer
with a very famous name, and the trickery doesn't get him.  He returns in
kind, and becomes in the process enamored with the butcher's daughter, who
also likes him.  As soon as the butcher is aware of this, he decides the
young man is the next target.  But we never really know in whose mind this f
ear is living, or if it is real, except that in the end of the film, there
are only the two young lovers sharing a roof playing  their circus like
music in their instruments.  A measure of peace has been  established in
this house, so it seems.
In the middle of it all, it is a surrealistic bunch of segments that just
come and go, as the butcher helps us learn who the next victim is, and in
the case of the grandmother, she dies of a heart attack, by just
'imagining' the butcher with a clever ready to attack her.
A fun, and weird movie to watch, it is well written, and filmed with your
confusion in mind, which makes it fun to follow.  Every so often there is a
new wrench in the works, and you go ... what..?? is going on..?

Title
Review for Becoming Colette (1991)
Like another film about writers and their times, IMPROMPTU, this is not a
great story, or a great adventure, or even a great film.  But it is a nice
little tribute to a woman writer, who was an immediate influence  to the
likes of Anais Nin, and therefore a vital voice in the development of the
art of writing.
While Colette's writing was more what we would consider 'erotic', than
anything else, it still made its mark.  Her most important story, that of
GIGI, was turned into a film that still has won one of the largest acclaims
in the Oscar Award history.
The story of Gabrielle Colette starts innocently enough with a rogue who
takes on a dreamy country girl for a wife, only to discover that she is a
fairly good writer, and has an inspiring style.  His taste for women and
other pleasurable delights pretty much runs him into the ground, while he
attempts to gain as much as he can from his wife's prolific output.  And
since the writing she is coming up with is too erotic, it is published under
his name for quite a while, until it is finally discovered who the real
writer is.  And during the time of her growth, she experiences many of the
things which are the mark of many of her Claudine books.  From sex, to
drugs, and to many friends in the artistic community, it all pretty much
shows the decadent life styles which pretty much control the lives of many
artists during the
time.
With a fine portrayal, by Mathilda May and Virginia Madsen as one of her
lovers later, this film plods along rather nicely.  It is only indulgent in
the sensuality of the moments where an overdose of sex or
drugs is concerned, which is where the writer Colette really excelled as a
dreamy eyed participant.  Klaus Maria Brandauer plays the man who gains her
hand in marriage and benefits until his charm can no longer win her.  But
the film still seems to depict an era that developed many writers, Gabrielle
Colette being one of them.

Title
Review for Mighty Aphrodite (1995)
Copyright (c) Pedro Sena 1996. All Rights Reserved.
Woody Allen has always been around with some eccentric stories. This is
probably as good a film as he has ever done, at least it is better centered
as a story, than he usually is.
And it almost is not the story that attracts us to this film, but  the way
that his characters carry themselves. It is difficult not to consider this
an excellent film, in the way it is done, with its ludicrous Greek chorus
and all, which is just perfect, though the people I saw it with, do not
understand this stuff, and did not find it funny to see the chorus break
into a musical number, while also editorializing everything, which Woody
Allen has always
done on his own character and we got bored with it.
The story is simple, though it has its intricate turns.  A Manhattan couple
and their marriage are just about over, and they adopt a child. The man's
curiosity wins out and he finds that the child he adopted is the son of a
porn star, whom he goes after to meet. And she is a bit on the bird brain
mentality, but she does have feelings.  And Woody tries to help her along,
but never tells her that it is her lost child that he has adopted.  But in
the
middle of it all, in a lark, they get together, finally, and have an evening
of fun, which the story suggests has her get pregnant, and she is feeling
better about having lost her first child.  And on the way out of town, she
meets another man, and lo and behold everyone is happy ever after... well,
the marriage of Woody and his wife, is probably dead too, as she  has done
her side thing also.
Well, if anything, this is typical Woody Allen, in that the stories are
totally intricate, and intermixed so much that
it is off the wall. On the other hand, it is the "innocent"  side that makes
this an intricate story, and Woody refuses to condemn that part of things.
There are plenty of moments when we could easily get disgusted with the
young girl's lifestyle, and living. But somehow, we take some pity on her,
and do not spend our time judging her wrongs, or her next movie.  And we
definitely know that Woody's marriage in the story, is in trouble, as its
fires have gone out.
Were it not for the funny stuff, this film could easily be considered styled
a bit after the Godard method of filming, where a suggestion as to right and
wrong is never made, and the audience has to choose, something that the
Hollywood viewer can never appreciate, where all the characters have to be
separated by either colors, or obvious deeds. In this film, people are just
that, people.  And this style, creates a lot of funny, weird moments, that
are enjoyable for the discriminating seer, although terribly boring for
others. In so many ways, Woody lets the camera talk, or keeps it running so
that the characters have to live a bit longer, and do not become a shadow of
themselves, an idea, a mere representation of who they are.  And thus we
never
really find the girl unattractive, Woody boring, or any of the other
characters in the film out of place.
But the funniest thing in this film is not even Woody, but Myra Sorvino, who
ended up getting the Oscar for
her portrayal, of what starts out being a blonde bimbo, and becomes a rather
nice woman in the film.  And it
is hard to let go of F. Murray Abraham, as Woody's friend, and alter ego, as
the leader of the chorus, whose
staging, is what separates this film apart from others. Unfortunately one
has to have known the Greek chorus
in the boring Greek plays, to appreciate the style that Woody has designed
for this production, which is immediately off the wall, specially when it
breaks its commentary into a song and dance routine.  But it never stops to
make its point.  It's the modern chorus for the 20th century, used in the
only way that we will ever understand, or probably ever appreciate.
Magnificent film, if you want to appreciate one of America's truly great
writers and directors, the Capra of the 80's and 90's.  It's a shame that
while he has critical success, his films rarely go beyond that. He deserves
so much more than that, and he will be forever remembered for his writing
and directing, never his acting, the character of which we are basically
tired of.  But what is around him, makes for an excellent film.

Title
Review for Merry Christmas, Mr. Lawrence (1983)
There are many ways to create an anti war film. Some dwell on the violence.
Some dwell on my cause, or your cause, and justify it. And some, stand as
truly great works that do not try to prove anything except that we are
fickle human beings convinced that we are right at every turn.
Nagisa Oshima, went a step further. He went so far as to state that much of
this stuff is a battle of inner wills, if not an egotistical  desire which
man has for physical control, even sexual.  The point is made that even at
the worst of times, the animal in us will still come out, be it in fighting,
or in anything else.
The place is Java, in 1942.  And the Japanese maintain a prisoner camp for a
few soldiers.  Most of them seem to have been commanders rather than just
common field soldiers.  The presumption is that these camps were set up to
try and gain valuable information that might lead the Japanese into places
where they could attack the enemy.  It might have worked in many cases, but
in this particular story it doesn't.  Be it a staunch English major, or the
better meaning and mannered John Lawrence, who had been in Japan prior to
the war.
In between the battles of wills, the commanders engage in various incidents
with their prisoners, and they never seem to get the  edge they want.  This
forces the commander Yonoi and sergeant Hara to have a better respect for
their prisoners, but it never seems to change into anything else.
There are moments in this film that are very well written, and have been
specially well directed into film, perhaps because it is the famous writer
that directed the film.  And the continuity of the piece is rather
interesting, with flashbacks that are immediately seen as unusual, but an
indication that the characters are here to take a stand, and one of power
and inner force at that. The young English soldier whose background seems
centered in various forms of betrayal ( so he calls it ) regarding his
younger brother, ends up clearing up why he joined the army in the first
place. And he finally commits the ultimate insult that gets him buried, as
we finally see why it is that he did what he did.  For once he has not
betrayed anybody, but by his actions helped save, or buy time, for his
fellow prisoners.
Eventually the tables turn and the Japanese commander is visited by  Mr.
Lawrence, who understands the spoils of war better than anyone. "We are
victims of men who feel they are right, and the truth really is that no one
is right, of course". The commander is to be executed the next morning.
Very good in this film are both Tom Conti and David Bowie, in what is an
excellent script, very well directed and thought about.  The film defines
color only in certain times and moments.  And lush it is. The rest of the
time it is basically bland, and only shows the two colors of the camp.
With music by Ryuchi Sakamoto, who also plays the Commander Yanoi, this film
pulsates with a few musical tones, that just bloom into a musical moment.  A
rare, and well designed style for the film.

Title
Review for Performance (1970)
If you like films that challenge every inch of your imagination, body,
spirit and soul, this is the film to see! it is one of the best written,
filmed and spectacular films ever done and one of a kind. Few have really
come close to the complexity of this film, that just about dares you to see
it again, just so you can go look for yet another thread and meaning.
However, this film is not for every one, though it features some of the best
known talent in the world of arts, specially music, which is another
astounding element used so powerfully through out the visual madness of this
film.  This style of musical filming, was adopted by Nicholas Roeg, who is a
master of music timing and spacing, in all of his films.  The passages with
music tend to enhance the film twice fold, rather than just show off a
pasture, or  grandiose sight.  In PERFORMANCE, the music is the enzyme which
carries the  film, while also, being the drug, that confuses you to no end.
This film put Randy Newman ( Long Dead Train ), Merry Clayton ( Gimme
Shelter ) Ry Cooder ( Bootleneck guitar ), Buffy Saint Marie ( Dyed, Dead,
Red ) and Jack Nietzche ( original music, and all musical arrangements ) on
the map as people whose talent and ability would go beyond the mere fancy of
a hit song.
And of course, it had MICK JAGGER in his first film.
This film was first made in late 1966, and early 1967, and was on the shelf
for almost two full years, because Warner Brothers was afraid of how they
could present something so weird, and unusual.  Eventually, the fame of Mick
Jagger, and the success of both Don Cammell and Nicholas Roeg, forced the
studio to release the film, in a version which was at least thirty minutes
shorter for American audiences ( damn it !!! ), because of its sexual
content, in the form of total disregard for nudity, manners, and poor taste
in several scenes.
And one must remember that this film has at least two or three levels
running at all times.  We may be seeing what one person is saying, and
immediately,  a visionary scene happens, which depicts what it is the person
is really  saying, or thinking.  In this sense, the film is extremelly
difficult to  explain, because there are two stories.  One which we may
think is the real  one, and the one which we think is the invisible one, or
the one which is  felt, and not generally worked with.  However, the actions
of both  extremists, the performer ( James Fox ) and the retired rock star
 Mick  Jagger ) are so extreme and off the wall, that it becomes almost
impossible  to define where one level ends, and the next starts.   In
between, it has  amazingly prophetic lines of dialogue, specially to Mick
Jagger ( James  Fox remarks about Mick's make up and effeminate clothing "
.... you'll look  funny when you are forty ... ") which I am sure was not too
pleasing to  Mick, and might still not be.  But his presence, does make the
film really  something else.  And he is in peak form as a performer in this
film ( Memo  From Turner ) and in a scene with some fluorescent lamps on his
hands.
A performer ( hired killer ) is trying to quit his group, after one final
job, who happened to have been an old friend of his, and the wrong one to
mess with. The performer ( James Fox ) tries to change his appearance, and
decides to take up in the Soho flats, where sex, drugs and rock'n'roll are
the mode of living.  While he is on the run, trying to figure out where he
is going to go, he meets a stoned musician ( looks like Hendrix, but isn't )
who is talking  to some one else about the good hits, and stuff one could
find there, and that he had just left the place, because it was too heavy.
The performer, jumps at the chance to hide in a hitherto unknown and
unexpected part of town, where he may succeed at evading his pursuers.
Arriving at the flat where the retired
rock star lives with two women ( Anita Pallenberg - Keith Richards' wife,
and Michelle Bretton - French actress who lived with Mick for a while, who
looked like a twin of Marianne Faithfull ), he requests to rent the room.
He is turned down, but insists.  He finally gets the room.  And the fun
really gets started here.  Amidst much literature, mushrooms, loud music,
and much sexual activity, the story goes every which way, with the performer
trying to get a passport in the mean time.  He goes out in wigs and clothes
provided by the girls.  By the end of the film, he has been found and his
boss is coming to get him, and take him home ( to kill him ).  They show up
on a given day, and come to pick up the performer.  The performer, goes up
to the rock star's
room and plants a bullet on his head ( the camera follows it ) and then
leaves. We only see the wig and body move.  When the car moves off, a face
turns, and ........ we can't give it away.
AND WE ARE STUCK. WHAT.? How the heck...?
There are several hints through the film.  The most obvious one, and
probably the most difficult to explain, is when Anita Pallenberg, amidst one
of the  scenes where they gave the performer several mushrooms ( they are
trying to  find out who he is, and it is this invasion which leads the
performer to kill  the rock star in the end ) and when he inquires about the
rock star, and  why he isn't on the stage, Anita says " ... he's stuck, he's
stuck ... " and  she tells a story about him playing around with mirror
magic ( staring  into a mirror ) and what happened.  She says that " ... he
lost his demon ...  it's out there, somewhere ... " which is harmless enough
for now.  I find  this one of the best clues to this movie.  If one accepts
the premise that  one being has two sides, one evening in a fit of drugs and
bad  meditational experience, the person split in the two obvious parts.
And
one could say that the 'demon' has become the performer ( who has no
history at all, and his boss comments on that ) and the 'real' person is
the rock star.  However, one side without the balancing agent produces
disturbing effects.  For the rock star, it is the inability to find his
spark.  And for the performer, it is his inability to find a relative  piece
of mind, in a world where only violence and hatred persists.  And my
estimation,is that since they are one and the same person, they are doomed
to meet at some point in time.  Since we met them when they were separated,
we do not know, or have a hint as to who is the real person.  When they
meet,
eventually a choice has to be made ( cross roads ) and one will be gone.
In the film, the rock star is the body to go.  However, being that we see
him alive in the end, the one who really went was the performer.  And the
rock star is now reborn, I presume.  End of film.
And you will sit for an hour or two wondering what hit you in the head.
The use of the visual elements, the sensory part of the film, are disturbing
at times, and loving at others.  For example.  The performer is doing one of
his jobs, on a beautiful Bentley ( or Rolls ) and destroys it first with
some acid solution, and then begins shaving the man's head, and torturing
him.  He doesn't kill the guy, but tells him this is a lesson.  The sensory
part of the film shows the performer making love to a woman, the performer
being  birched severely, a woman having an orgasm, and the whipped person
screaming, and a court of law discussing a case ( we hear the judge, and
see his face close up ) and when the deed is done, he leaves.
The sensory parts of the film centered around the rock star, are all geared
towards sex with the two women and the rock star ( a scene mixes everyone in
such a fast paced cut, that it confuses the viewer ), and a preponderance of
drugs.  The dialogue is strong, and unusual important, offering what may be
the hints to the real story.  The only unexplainable parts, to me, regards
the performer's boss, who in the song Memo From Turner, is played by Mick
Jagger,  another suggestion that the rock star may be the real person.
Along with THE ROCKY HORROR PICTURE SHOW, this film is the most famous of
all midnight show'ers.  And a great one, it is ,too.  You'll end up seeing
this film more than once, to try and answer your own questions.  That tells
you how good of a film it really is.
MUST SEE. PERIOD. GREAT FILM. SUPER MUSIC. WRITTEN LIKE NO OTHER BEFORE, OR
SINCE.

Title
Review for Color of Night (1994)
One sometimes wonders if these things are made for the art form, or for the
sake of making a few dollars.  It may help a superstar and his bank
deposits, but what does it do to the others.?
It is a story about a shrink whose patient, one day, takes things in her own
hands and busts through the umpteenth floor window.  Depressed and feeling
very much responsible the doctor ( Willis )
decides to take a break.  He visits a friend in the other coast, who is also
a shrink.  And he gets sucked into another shrink-fest.
This new group is the same as all others, except that this one has a
Hollywood flavor to things.  The bisexual actress, the homosexual whoohoo,
and the rest.  Amidst them is a young girl that by being
quiet and subtle ends up involved with the psychiatrist.
As it turns out, Rose is not quite a patient, but a plant for the plans of a
maniac person, whose desires are a bit more on the sick side than anything
else.  In the doctor's therapy rooms, Rose is  dressed differently and
unrecognizable, though the new doctor has gotten an inkling for what is
going on.
The doctor is starting to have a good time with  Rose, and the film spends
its best moments behind the lens, watching this man making out with a girl
that looks no older than a teenager.  With plenty of gratuitous nakedness
thrown in to ensure that Bruce Willis enthusiasts get excited.
The story is actually very good, were it not that the film has to bring it
to a thankless and ugly end.  Do all love stories and affairs that are
satisfying have to be this way.???  In Hollywood one would think the answer
is yes.
See it only if you are interested in nakedness.... otherwise let it sit as a
waste... sad, because Jane March is not bad in it.... but then, who is going
to see this for her acting.?

Title
Review for Lorenzo's Oil (1992)
Some films are excellent from the start, and it is a matter of trying to see
if it can hold up to the tremendous task of copying the human spirit in all
its glory.  Despite the reviews, which claimed a very poor accent by Nick
Nolte's character, this film is really as strong and beautiful example of
what the art form can really do, but often does not
because too many producers are in it for the money, too much so, rather than
celebrate the beauty of the human spirit, in its many forms.
A young man, is found to have a debilitating disease ( ALD/MYELEN ) of the
brain, which eventually eats up the young person's body, one inch  at a
time. And at the time it was inconceivable that anyone would really want to
do anything about it, specially the medical establishment.  The Agostos, do
not take that lightly, and try anything, with a few hints and help from a
doctor who happens to be a bit of a skeptic of his own
colleagues, and the parents battle does not end, until there is something
which seems to work, to stop the terrible disease from continue on its
destructive path.  And after fighting the medical establishment, including a
few nurses who don't give a damn, and do not think the young man will ever
make it, they finally find, amidst many studies, and papers, and information
a few things which might help the child.  And they proceed to try these
things, until something works.  The first one being the most critical, the
build up of fatty acids, which destroys many nerve cells.
Eventually they find someone who will co-operate, and a stodgy old foggie
who is patient enough to get the necessary syrup, which they believe will
help.  And an Italian company decides it is worth  sending it around.  After
this effort, the parents have now to gain over the association which only
believes in the pain and the suffering ( I have seen the ADA do the same for
their menders ) in order to get more attention by the medical establishment,
who up until now have not been too helpful, with the exception of the good
Greek doctor, who is afraid to commit to a therapy, but does give
suggestions as to how it should be applied, and eventually defends the
family who has done such incredible research, and accomplished what many
medical teams could not.
The Agostos, have managed to get their closest friends, the wife's sister
 calls herself a test rat ) and a neighbour whose son is also just acquired
the disease, a genetic disorder carried by the mother.
At the meeting of the sad feelings society, one of the mothers starts the
revolution which the Agostos need, which is their involvement in publicizing
the success of the radical medicines, with ample proof that it is working.
The young man Lorenzo is still alive today, and the nerve cells are
rebuilding very slowly.
George Miller has written this film, in a style that is similar to at least
one of his efforts, THE ROAD WARRIOR.  The film oversees several years in
the process, and the chapter format seems to work very well here.  In bits
and pieces that together bring the film to a triumphant conclusion, though
the battle is not won as yet, but could at any time.
Susan Sarandon, as the wife is superb, and worthy of her nomination for an
Oscar.  While Nick Nolte is also very good, his style is  very nice, though
at times a bit difficult to understand, but then, so are many foreigners,
and so what?.
Beautifully directed, and lovingly treated, this film is a must see for many
viewers.

Title
Review for Visiteurs, Les (1993)
It's a shame that these types of comedies do not make it in America. These
are worth a lot of fun, and they display a sense of humor that few people
can enjoy or appreciate. It really is a story in the style of The Goons, the
American Firesign Theatre, or even a Monty Python story - not just a
vignette. but unlike those stories, this one has no deus-ex-machina working
for it, in the country that just about perfected it with Moliere. Says a lot
more about many other fluffy comedies...
An 11th century knight and his loyal page consult a wizard regarding some
trivial matter or other. But the old wizard messes up and forgets one
ingredient, and that gets the knight and page in another century, the 20th
to be exact.
The great premise brings about some great moments, like the characters
considering cars dragons for the longest time, and many other idiocies that
we have forgotten to appreciate because we live with them, least of all
perfumes and baths.
In the 20th century, everything is messed up. The descendent of the knight
is now the servant, and the page's descendant is now the owner of the castle
and its lands. This creates several caste problems between the characters
and it gets exploited to the max. But the whole film, does not stop there.
The page, who is very clever, gets a whiff of the whole thing better than
his boss, and when it is time for him to return home he makes sure that he
is not the one who goes, but his relative, and he gets the bimbo that has
befriended in the meantime, and turns the hotel into a fun place to visit
and be.
The story is almost not needed, but it helps. There are some excellent
moments in this film that define "eccentric' to the max, and makes for a
very enjoyable film.... with subtitles.
However, the best part is really missed in the translation. The film uses
old French versus the new French, and that in itself creates a great many
words that come and go and get lost in the translation. it is probably the
best part of the film, other than the great visual gags.
With very enjoyable performances, and well understated humor to make sure
that this is not lost in a laugh track, this very good film never got the
appreciation that it should have. by all means, it is a valuable, and
enjoyable film. you won't soon forget it.

Title
Review for Reise der Hoffnung (1990)
One of the saddest, yet, one of the most poetic films I have seen.
It is a political film, which deplores the system to which many people are
attached, and the fact that there isn't much which can really be done about
it all, ... what some of us will do for a chance at a piece of a dream.
For south/central Americans, the dream land is America.  For the many
Kurdish peoples stranded, and stuck in the middle of three hostile
countries, the dream land is either Germany or Switzerland, the richest
countries in Europe.  The price they pay to get to one of those places, is
anything they  can.  The sad part of it all, is that so few of them actually
succeed, and their lives are ruined, forever, with or without their family.
A Kurdish farmer makes a decision to get rid of his farm, and go for the
dream land.  He has received a letter from his cousin in Germany, who will
soon get a job in a factory which has promised to hire him.  He takes his
wife and one of his seven children ( the oldest, a boy ) with him, and the
travels begin.
By the time his travels end, the film stops, leaving us to guess what, and
how it will eventually turn out.  All said and done, there was a cousin, or
a relative of some sort who didn't really exist, and the letter was
fabricated ( the farmer had some money ) with the intent of having the money
taken away by someone,... unclear weather it is Mafia like connections or
simple people who prey on the misguided ones.  Once the 'vision' of success
and future have been aroused, there is little anyone can do for this man.
He is gone.
He travels through Italy, with a fake passport, and goes through various
places until he gets to the high Alps, the pass into Switzerland.  Here, the
people who have brought them this far are having problems agreeing with each
other, and the crowd has to peddle their way on foot, in the snow, in the
night, to get to 'freedom'.
It's the plight of all immigrants, and if you went to school in southern
California like I did, and worked part time in restaurants to pay for the
books and buses like I did, you found out that half of the dishwashers are
Mexican and also very illegal.  The same thing happens in Texas and New
Mexico.  They go through the same process, although,  they have succeeded
where 75% of them have failed.  They know it.  But the others don't.  I even
knew people who every once in a while would bring in one or two for
a thousand dollars each ( I couldn't prove it, though the person drove a
Cadillac and the border guards don't check out rich looking American blondes
driving Cads ) and a few Mexicans who told me how much they paid, which they
are usually told to keep secret or their friends and families will never
come, for the privilege to come to this country.  Believe you me, when all
you have is hell, you will pay the price for a piece, even if a taste, of
real freedom.
It's worth it .  And hopefully something will work out in the future.
Funny what people will do for a dream, isn't it???
This film has incredible music.  If you like European style jazz, listen to
Norwegian TERJE RYPDAL's music ( from EOS ) and swede JAN GARBAREK's music
 from EVENTYR ) all over this film.  It makes the mood of the film so rich
in quality, that it is a bit overbearing.  The cinematography, combined with
this music, is really something to behold, and probably the main reason why
this film won the OSCAR as the best foreign film of last year.  I think  all
actors are Kurdish, and the director is a Kurd, who had a student visa to
get to Europe,... which means he is from a better to do family.

Title
Review for Demon Seed (1977)
Some stories just wrench your heart into smithereens, and leave you stunned,
and having no idea of how you should feel.  The battle of now and the future
usually is a good place to do these things, because we have no idea what it
will look like anyway, but we can let our imaginations run rampid in the
mean time.
DEMON SEED is one such film.  And while the book is better, the computer
spends its whole time talking to her sub-conscious, and working on
reprogramming it, by telling us what she is dreaming and predicting her
reactions, thereby giving itself an unfair advantage.
The story is a bit on the futuristic side.  A scientist's house is part of a
major program linked by a humongous  computer ( Proteus ) that has the
ability and capacity to control itself.  And when the scientist leaves on a
major job, he leaves his wife alone at home.  The computer has been studying
the wife for a while, and in due time it begins to play little games with
her until, she finally realizes the computer has her trapped in the house.
As soon as the computer has accomplished part one of the program, now it is
time to start part two of the program.  The computer is working full time,
on a process, and the ability to impregnate the wife and having a child born
who would be an extension of the computer.  The wife begins retaliating in
any way she can, but in the long run she gets worn down, and the computer
wins out.  By the time the husband returns, he is a non factor, and the
computer has now built enough work and equipment to do away with the
husband, and concentrate full time on the wife.  It succeeds, and in the end
a baby  is born, out of a cocoon.
Fritz Weaver is the husband and scientist who has been swindled by his own
invention, and Julie Christie plays the invaded and raped housewife, in a
very unpleasant film, and disturbing at moments.  But it is well designed
and delivered to the screen, with outstanding acting by Julie Christie, who
somehow always seems to feel really convertible in the roles where she plays
the woman who ends up taking the beating, emotionally, or otherwise.
The film was directed by Donald Cammell, whose first film was Performance
 with Nicholas Roeg ), and it has the psychic intensity which Performance
also shows.  The visualistic element may be Roeg's, but the physical  set up
is Cammell's.
A bit of a horror film, yet, more than that.  Do we allow our own creation
to turn around and destroy us?  And how free of a hand do we create these
things  to have?
GOOD FILM.  BETTER NOVEL.
Copyright (c) Pedro Sena 1994
Pedro Sena, Reviewer and Moderator of the CENTIPEDE's THE FILM.

Title
Review for Hachigatsu no kyoshikyoku (1991)
This is a story that relates to a sensitive subject in Japan, and America.
And how some people have dealt with it all.  The subject
is Hiroshima and the bomb.
While the bomb went on to get Japan to surrender, it did make a mark in its
people, a mark that still lingers today, if the story is any
indication.  But its effects, other than the terrain, have almost
disappeared, with the exception of the elder generation, who may
not only have seen the blast, but also experienced it first hand.
And the story is related to that event.  The parents have gone to Hawaii to
visit the elder mother's ailing brother.  And the grand mother is
basically the babysitter.  And the children, want to go to Hawaii, where
they seem to see a better life and fun.  And one of the
ailing man's children is an American, who will inherit the family's fortunes
and large plantations.  This does not sit well with the
elders, but it seems an opportunity for the rest of the family for better
jobs and pay.
But the main thrust of the story is not the family situation, but the grand
mother's state, in the aftermath of the explosion, which
she saw amidst the mountains.  It has affected her since, and did kill many
of her family and friends.  She spends most of her time
isolated, and in quiet prayer and meditation, and the only things she can
talk about are the events, then, and how they felt about
them.
And this film becomes a chronicle of a generation that suffered much pain,
and has had to withstand inner anger for an enemy
for 50 years. These feelings, are still there, but smoothed out by the
economic situations between the country and the world.
The film is strictly about the details of the event, and how the grand
mother works with them.  And a powerful example it
is of what war can do to a populace.  The mother is not angry  at the
Americans, although she has some misgivings about her
brother's American son.  But she doesn't take it too personal, since she is
getting on, and she is much too tied up in the
event itself.
An excellent film, with some beautiful acting, Akira Kurosawa still uses his
own theatrical symbols, rather than revert
to special effects.  The old lady sees the explosion, and also thinks that
an eye has been watching them ever since.
Worth seeing.  Although very literary in content, the film, still, is a
wonderful look at a generation that lost much of its
strength, because of the bomb.

Title
Review for Cold Heaven (1991)
I like Nicholas Roeg and Theresa Russell.  Despite what could be considered
overacting on
the part of Theresa, in a very difficult script to act up to, this film is a
bit unusual in that one is not sure what is actually happening.
The character that died, is still alive.  The connection to the religious
event and the nuns and priest is a bit beyond me, except that Marie
 Theresa Russell ) somehow is the enzyme which makes the vision happen and
thereby change and affect the lives of the priest, his superior, and the
'crazy' nun, who is indeed capable of seeing visions, and bring people to
see them.  And Marie, who considers herself an agnostic, and doesn't  like
the church is forced to come to grips with her own hypocrisy and lies in
order to save her marriage, and most likely herself, which is the real hint
the priest offers her, when one lies to him/herself.
It is a typical Nicholas Roeg film, in that it is trying to make sense of
the visionary space, not an easy thing to do specially when the church does
not accredit anyone who has them for fear of lessening the meaning in their
own dogma.  And Marie has to figure out what is going on, while at the same
time attempt to reconcile her need for physical contact, since her husband
is too ill to help her.  And to make things more difficult, his healing has
more to do with her honesty and ability to communicate.  When she is lying,
or being evasive, he gets worse.  When she is clearer in her ways, he is
better.   And much like the ending of the film BAD TIMING, A  SENSUAL
OBSESSION, this time the woman reconciles her lies, whereas in the former
the man does not for whatever his reason might be.  Marie chooses wisely and
properly, thus allowing the ending to be positive, while also helping the
local religious authorities come to grips with their dogma ( and build a new
mission ) and vision.
And unlike many of the Roeg films ( Performance, Walkabout, Man who Fell To
Earth, Insignificance, Bad Timing, and Track 29 ) this time the main
character is capable of resolving the situation into a positive, one with a
bit of a future, and a chance to redeem herself.
As usual, this is a visual film, that relies on what we see and don't see to
offer us any clues, and it succeeds as a bit of a suspenseful story until
the husband re-appears.
GOOD FILM.
NOT FOR EVERYBODY, BECAUSE IT DOES NOT COMPROMISE ITS GOAL.
MARK HARMON AND THERESA RUSSELL ARE VERY GOOD.

Title
Review for Kagemusha (1980)
It's hard to believe that one man can keep turning out films, and never
suffer in quality.  And he writes most of them as well.
And the odd thing is that unlike a lot of popular film makers, who continue
to repeat the same theme, with a new story, this man can take an old story
and change it into a new film, with no sign of the old film at all.
KAGEMUSHA, could be seen as yet another samurai and shogun film.  But it
isn't. It is a well thought out story, and well carried out, throughout,
deserving a much wider audience than it has gotten.  It is visually
glorious, as is the trademark of this film maker, and has some very
impressive shot configuration, which I have only seen in the films of David
Lean.
The story is simple enough, and recalls the competitive nature of the shogun
spirit, and their endless battles at the expense of many lives.  This time,
an aging shogun, finds himself unable to lead his people, and he decides on
a replacement, to keep the myth of the fearsome man and warrior alive, and,
thus maintain the control, rather than losing it to another family by way of
marriage, or loss.  To accomplish this, the old shogun finds a young, and
apparently fearless fighter, to be his double.  Only a few will know
that this is happening ( later they are dispatched, in order to protect  the
identity once the old man has died ) and what is being done.  The older
warrior figures that his council will make all the decisions necessary to  r
un the constant field battles.
However, the twist is that the replacement turns out to be an excellent
field general, and has been able to devise and win more wars by his capable
decision making than the council.
The only problem is that the replacement has moments of self doubt and pity,
and they are shown in staged sets, with props, thus suggesting the idea that
his problems are illusory.  But it is hard for this sensitive man to realize
that a bum ( basically ) all of a sudden is a master general.  And then the
story centers around his actions till the end of the film.  I won't give
away the ending.
With beautiful sound effect's work, excellent footage of battle scenes, and
a knack for dramaturgy, this film maker stands out as a real master,
specially seen as such when two of his best friends George Lucas and Francis
Ford Coppola produced this film, and distributed it around the world, much
to the chagrin of the Japanese film makers whose attitude towards money
making is as fierce as the shogun's thirst for blood.  Akira Kurosawa has
been highly critical of  many of his countries 'money factories' ( as he
calls the studios ) because they have no respect for art, or creative
people's work.  And for the past fifteen years, he has found his financing
in Europe and America, because his counter parts want a film that can
attract the masses, not the educated
masses.
There are very few artists, and people, who refuse to compromise on their
beauty, and AKIRA KUROSAWA is one of them.  His work is impeccable, and
really should be seen and appreciated, in as wide a screen as possible.
Few films, know how to make a country side so glorious.  And fewer still can
make the action in front of it as good, or better.

Title
Review for Fresa y chocolate (1993)
STRAWBERRY AND CHOCOLATE, is one of those films that is hard not to like,
and at the same time, one wonders what is it that makes it good.  It
vacillates between being a political film, and a personal film, and one
might wish that this would have been resolved some, to make the film easier
to go along with.
The personal part of the film, is a nice story about a man, who is gay, who
takes an attraction to another man.  Instead of becoming lovers, they become
good friends, even if they are on opposite side of things on a political,
and personal, scale.
And then, on the other hand, is a slight political story, that is not
vicious, but is tremendously suggestive that the war on Cuba
is mainly about how well hidden one has to keep their personal intents,
politically, so not to get over run by people who are so
eager to satisfy the state, and get paid for it.  It plays people against
people, and damages any kind of social structure.
The other story is more interesting, although hardly developed. The gay man
is a writer, possibly a subversive one by the Cuban standards, but he will
not give up his "underground" fight to get books into the country, and add
more "freedom" into their culture, specially the intellectual kind.  He is
involved in artistic circles, and his previous lover, an artist, has an art
show pending, but he has a problem which may be stopping him as well, which
is, he is also gay, in a society, where it is considered wrong, and
basically punished with being cast out.
This may be the real theme in the film. The young man, who is being pursued,
does not fall for the trickery and the games the gay man plays, but their
friendship teaches the gay man something about being honest and direct,
rather than tricky.  At the same time, it hurts to learn all this, in a
society where it isn't permissible.  And although the film resolves well for
the young man, it does not for the gay ones, which is the only solution that
pretty much would help the film get made in Cuba, and not throw these people
in jail.
It is believed that the authorities in Cuba have opened up the arts some,
but if this film is an indication, and it was partially
smuggled, and shot clandestinely in that country, thanks to the efforts of
some Mexican and Spanish people.  But the arts are still
grossly held up to a ridicule and criticism, by a hypocritical standard that
pretty much rules people into the ground.  A sign
that the communist Cuba, under Fidel, still is held together by a little
more than strings and rubber bands.
One can only hope that this is a sign that this country has an art form
which is due to break out.  The question is when, a leader
will realize the potential it has, not only to put people to work, but also
to create revenues from abroad. STRAWBERRY AND CHOCOLATE, is not a great
film, but it has a special appeal that is hard to let go. The film is
choppy, an obvious result of its sporadic shooting style, but it manages to
get it together in a reasonable fashion, not tied up neatly because the
whole film is not tied up from the word go.  It shows much promise, it
really does, and this is important.
Worth seeing, if only to realize that Cuba is probably going to join the
world map of arts pretty soon... count on it.

Title
Review for Zhao xiansheng (1998)
(Seen at the 22nd Portland International Film Festival, in Portland, Oregon)
 The expectations from anyone that knew of some of Yue Lu's work before as a
cinematographer, were a bit high. What were we going to find from a
cinematographer that did such beautiful work in TO LIVE and SHANGHAI TRIAD,
the latter of which had such a mystical touch to it with so many colors and
beautifully designed sequences.
 So it is with a surprise that the fist film that Yue Lu takes on is not one
that was closer to the things that he has done for a while, but something
which is new to China, but is making waves. Whether this choice is made to
develop the acting styles of the Chinese into something more emotional and
more wide open, or just a desire to try and polish the work that Chen Kaige
and Kar-Wai have been doing. Well, it is not nearly as dynamic as the other
two are, but this director must have decided a long time ago that what
mattered to him was the acting, not the show.
 MR. ZHAO, is a film that is slow moving, but if one goes in prepared to
watch the fine acting work, one will be pleased. It has none of the
fabulously mechanic, or even the "automatic" hand held style that Kar-Wai
uses, but it has a blend that fits somewhere in the middle. Right from the
start, we see the hand held camera up close to Mr. Zhao's wife, who is
determined to find something, or make a discovery. And from that point on,
the camera has already set the tone for the film. We are going to see these
actors duke it out the best that we can. But the best that we can, is in
effect a very slow script that is afraid to make a move, in many ways a
compliment to the main character and title of the film. He would rather not
face his predicament, and avoid any decisions, and the shooting style is
going to make him pay for it.
 This works magnificently in the sequences when Mr. Zhao is in the hospital,
which are always subjective (and should be), and it is the only time that
the film takes on a different shooting style to create a sense that it was
during that time that he discovered some sense of life, which he is
obviously lacking right now. The rest of the film is like the morning mirror
that you hate to face to shave or do your teeth, or comb your hair.
 With the tight corners and spaces that the rooms have, the camera setup is
good, though, as it clearly places the onus on Mr. Zhao having to defend
himself. If this was a decision that was made to add to Mr. Zhao's
predicament, then the film is very good.
 The story centers around Mr. Zhao, who has made a good friend of a younger
woman, and whom we find as we go along is pregnant. But, now that his wife
has already discovered the  whole thing, it is time for him to fess up and
make a decision. Leave his wife and take on a new one, or return to his
wife. Mr. Zhao's inability to make this decision comes across as a bit of
cowardice, and selfishness, as he tries to escape the argument with the
younger girl by saying that he has to be responsible to his son, to which
the younger girl replies, what about the new one you are going to have?
Here, the younger girl makes the decision that she is capable of making in
these modern days. She is going to have an abortion and she does. On his way
to the hospital, Mr. Zhao meets a young man who calls himself one of her
friends, and he proceeds to harass Mr. Zhao to no end, and much anger. And
this is the fateful decision that will make things more confusing, and
probably worse.
 I suppose that is it fair, and right, to state that the acting by all three
characters, are impressive, and fit into the area of TEMPTRESS MOON, in the
sense that it is strongly trying to get away from the stolid and staid
acting styles that have been a part of China. Gong Li, while having done
much to put China on the map with her acting, still is very old fashioned
and upright. The camera in this film makes sure that the actors are in their
element, or space, and they do their thing from it. with some nice touches I
might add.
 Were it not for the nice acting work, though, this film would be not so
good. Basically the script is not strong in dynamics. It's as if the lines
were given the actors, and they have to live with them and do the best they
can with them. But here, the younger actress playing Mr. Zhao's mistress, or
new lover, is very good. She is much more modern and active than the other
two, which is a nice directorial choice. By comparison, Mr. Zhao and his
wife do not move much at all during their exchanges, in of itself a
commentary about the old styles opposite the new ones. Maybe the point is
that Mr. Zhao wants to become more modern, and his wife is too old fashioned
to fit in. But this is a stretch, and only seen when taking the film as a
whole, something that might be way too difficult to express to the actors
while a film is being done. It's terribly difficult to hold a concept for
months and not move away from it, specially for actors.
 All in all, visually it is a nice film, were it not that the colors in the
rooms are really off tone, or so bland, and dark, that make the film
difficult to sit through. Missing are the nice touches that have become the
symbols of Chinese cinema. It comes off as a slice of Chinese life that is
bland, and lacks color and individuality, if this is intentional. But
perhaps this is a breaking out into other areas, for which the first
exercises may not exactly be perfect, but the eventual results will be
better.
 A nice film to see, in that Chinese acting standards are obviously taking
on western proportions. The question is, how is it going to help the film
makers define their generation with this new style. The results, so far, as
terribly mixed, as if no  one has really figured out what to do with these
things. One film maker is way too much camera doped-up, the other is way too
much actor involved, and this one is somewhere in between, but entrenched so
far into the acting that it appears that the rest of the film suffers by
comparison. I imagine that it would have made a better impression if it had
been better lit up, not so much as an acting ploy, but as a desire that Mr.
Zhao might have hoped for, or his younger mistress might have looked forward
to. But we never get out of the NOW, which is interesting, but is not making
for a film that helps film audiences lose themselves in it. Still nice, but
not great.

Title
Review for Fearless (1993)
Peter Weir has been on a roll for a long time.  His characters are always in
a very careful high wire act, on the verge of falling either way into an
emotional pit.  It is no real suroeise, to see that this film follows that
same pattern.  At least, this film has a feeling that the person who wrote
it knows a little more about the whole subject than not, and
it may be just because the screenplay writer, was also the person who wrote
the novel.
FEARLESS is not a difficult story, but it is one of those "event" type of
stories that require a little time to "heal" itself, and to work itself out.
The story is a one liner.  A plane crashes, and a few people survive.  And
those who do can remember the details in, do so in a sort of guilty style,
like they should apologize for being alive and not having died.  Max has
been in an invincible form since, not needing to solve his own problems.
And while he is in this form, and capable of helping others ( as it turns
out ), his own body is resistant to a few events, like the fact that he is
allergic to  strawberries.  Carla has been feeling awful, because her own
child died, just seconds
after she let go of him from her hands.  Various others are also in a
disarray of an emotional stress.
And the film is really about Max, and his ability to help out a few of the
plane survivors, specially Carla.
With some very nice performances by Jeff Bridges and Rosie Perez, this film
is rather nice to watch, and never crosses the line of bad taste, or into
the realm of horror. It is about those people's fears, and lack of
understanding, since the accident.  A tough subject... a tougher story,
requiring a tough director to lead it.  There are similarities
here to the film THE HERO, where Dustin Hoffman has a similar role. Here
things are better defined.  There a supreme acting job made the film.

Title
Review for Amantes (1991)
Spanish films are finally settling in as an important part of the art world,
usually having to play second banana to either an Italian, French or English
film.  But at least, when the films do not like a Spanish piece of fluff,
they are beginning to shape up as a nice breed of work, even if, so far, it
seems to be centered around one actress, whose
work is beginning to be noticed.  Victoria Abril has helped put her
country's films back on the map, a bit on a sabbatical since the late master
LUIS BUNUEL, who single handedly made sure we knew there was much more to
Spain than Generalissimo  Franco, even though the government was not about
to say anything about the film, so they could sweep their distaste for
arguments with the church.
If anything, if Pedro Almodovar and Carlos Saura are an indication, the film
industry has finally succeeded in Spain, to the point where the church is no
longer a divisive factor of the public by deciding a film is bad, and the
public flocking to go see it.  Were these church leaders intelligent, they
would have embraced the artists and public, and set themselves up well
 even financially ) for the next century or two.  But old ideas die hard....
and the divinity  plays have not improved.....
Amidst a country, like Italy, where the Christian church has such a  large
influence, film is thriving.  While it exposes a side of people, which Luis
Bunuel himself was already discussing in very large detail, although he made
a point of showing up his opponents,
these films have begun to gain a life of their own, and probably say more
about the actual population of the area, than it does about their ideas.  As
in Bunuel, the ideas and the realities are not quite the same thing, and the
opposite sides can have disastrous impacts on individuals.  If this helps
people learn, then the church  has found its destroyer.
AMANTES, is a story of dualities, and specially in the mind of a man, who
can not decide between his love for a woman, and his desire to be involved
with someone more innocent, but who can't satisfy him despite her true love
and care for him.  And the resolution he has  to make involves a bit of a
plot to get rid of the innocent girl, who
has in the end, finally recognized that she does not want to live, since her
only dream is dead.  And in front a church, she allows for her lover to help
her commit suicide.
The whole film is based on a true story, and the outcome of the events,  and
while it creates a wonderful screen tale, with very good actors carrying it,
it is the subtlety of the situation, and the teetering edge that it lives in
that keeps the film going.
Victoria Abril is very good, and as in at least two of her previous films,
has no qualms about her sexuality or sensual involvement in her roles, and
portrays another depth for an actress which is not readily found.  As such,
it also shows the potential of a new
style of film making, which in the future will incorporated what is today
called pornography, into an art form.  There are moments which are not quite
for everyone, surrounded by the gypsy love songs about sex, and while a bit
surrealistic to see it portrayed in a film, it does bring out another set of
feelings in the people involved.  And the innocent girl, lacked this kind of
open-ness. And while she is willing to learn, it also appears that she is
destined to fail.  She is not free from herself, as the lover has become
with her body.  However, it is also this freedom which brings about the
fateful deed, and the eventual destruction of the romantic relationship.

Title
Review for Forever Fever (1998)
(Seen at the 22nd Portland International Film Festival, in Portland, Oregon)
 The opening of this film states what it is really about. Singapore's
official language is English, official utensil is the chopstick, and the
official dance is the disco?
 It's the mid seventies in Singapore, and the youngsters are trying to find
their way in this culture on their own. The one thing that is vastly clear
is that western culture has had a serious effect on it, and that Saturday
Night Fever did not escape. The only unfortunate thing about this film is
that the same critics that panned the original will also pan this film as
boring and full of it. These same critics probably have no clue as to how
much influence American films have the world over, and how so many people
take on those ideas and personalities as a way to grow into their own,
probably as a sign of revolt against the past and its old ways that still
has a hold on things.
 Ah Hock's hero is Bruce Lee and he has all the moves down pat and spares no
moment to practice them, even at work. His group of friends has other ideas
and takes to the dancing clubs for fun, and eventually Hock joins them, only
to find a brand new obsession. The disco rage is on, and it catches him. And
here he finds a chance to gain something so that he can acquire the money he
would like to have to be able to come up with his dream, a motorcycle that
is way beyond his means and wages. with his childhood sweetheart he starts
dancing and appears to be learning very well, clumsily at first, but then
full blast. Eventually it leads him into the competition that will be
providing a nice prize which would allow him to acquire the motorcycle he
wants. But competition is fierce and there is one person that is in the way
and is making things difficult for him. He has befriended another girl who
just happens to be the girl friend of the hood that drives the MG and makes
life difficult for anyone in his way. Hock loses his job on account of this
guy.
 But all is not lost. While practicing the dance, he spends the rest of his
time seeing the movie so he can study the moves, and comes to meet the Tony
in it, that comes out of the screen to give him advise on life, love and of
course dance.
 With the new girl, he gets to the dance competition, but not before he has
to suffer one indignity. He is beat up by the hoods, friends of the bad guy.
He manages to win the dance with the girl, and on the way out he is again
encountered by the same hoods, and this time Hock takes on the Bruce Lee
character and teaches them a lesson. He leaves and finally gets to talk to
his sweetheart and make things get back on track. In the end caption, the
film says that they went to Norway, danced in another competition and then
won the prize that allowed him to buy the motorbike of his dreams and take
his sweetheart on the trip that he had promised.
 This is not a great film, but it is a lot of fun to sit through. The
dancing is very good, and the fun added to the routines are very enjoyable
and make for a film that is a lot of fun to sit through, even if nowadays we
think that disco stunk and is dead. In other places it was not dead, and was
a very important scene, one that had much more meaning than anyone in
America could ever conceive. Here, these things are just another trend. When
it dies it is over. In other places, it is the justification and the impetus
for social change, and this film does not spare us this point. Hock's
brother, is having a personality crisis, and he finally admits to the whole
family what he wants. None of this could have happened in a society that had
no western inspirations or had no idea that the world out there is very
different from the old line that still lives. Their parents are shocked and
the situation is dangerous. And the brother eventually pays the price. Hock,
escapes these things, probably because his dream is not so drastic, or much
more difficult to achieve. Leslie's dream is dangerous in any way that he
can look at.
 A fun film to sit through, that has plenty of laughs all the way through.
The stuff with Tony coming alive to talk to him is the same stuff that we
love to see in movies, and this time it is important, and meaningful to the
society that this is, an dis becoming since the English have left.
 With some very enjoyable acting, and well defined characters, the film is
in English, and is very difficult to follow sometimes because they all speak
so fast, but one rarely needs to worry about it, since one knows what is
going on. Few films can do that well. This one makes the grade, even if it
is a bit of a fantasy. But rest assured, from a foreigner, that much of this
is not a fantasy. America just rarely looks at any other culture for
inspiration or learning. If they only knew how others look at it, if they
only knew ....
Fun film about what may have been to grow up in Singapore in the 70's after
the English left.
4 of 5 GIBLOONS
Reviewed by Pedro Sena, Copyright (c) Pedro Sena 1999. All Rights Reserved.

Title
Review for Searching for Bobby Fischer (1993)
SEARCHING FOR BOBBY FISHER is the story of Josh Waitzkin, a young man who
has an ability to play chess that draws some comparisons to the Grand Master
Bobby Fisher.  Where Bobby Fisher was known to be an eccentric, that
disliked the circles of the chess playing community, the young Waitzkin has
all the makings of another man that will  play chess forever, and become
either a good player with all the trappings for failure, or a good player,
who is also a good person behind it all.  This is what the film is really
about.
The young Josh, gets the inclination to play chess in his young days, and
sets out to learn the game on his own.  And at a certain point, he decides
he wants to check out the chess bums in the park, who seem to have a daily
thing going for a few dollars. Josh takes a liking to Vinnie, a black young
man who may be  a good player, but does not have the upbringing to take his
game to another level.  But what Vinnie lacks in upbringing, he has in his
ability to play like a cat... he is quick, and he is
clever, and he knows how to set up an opponent, something which the streets
of Brooklyn are surely full of.
In due time, Josh's father decided to take the young man Josh to a chess
school and get him some instruction on the game, perhaps a chance to get
better.  In the school he meets some of the well known chess players in the
world, and the teacher first shows his disdain for the inner discipline that
many of them lack.  The young man Josh now has to come to grips with
something which is difficult to do for him, which is to project far enough
ahead in order to play a better game, something which people his age do not
do.
Eventually, the young Josh starts playing tournaments, but he lacks the
killer instinct that is sometimes necessary in order to survive these
slaughter houses.  He plays well, but he has found the closest thing to an
enemy, which he is afraid to  face.  His deliberations take him back to the
park for some fun chess ( for him ) and back to the teacher, who is not very
happy with the young man's forays into the area where chess is not an art,
but just a game.
During this time, the Josh's family begins having a few problems. The well
meaning father, has accidentally drawn up plans for his genius son.  But the
mother is concerned that the child is missing out on his childhood.  And
this battle has an effect on the young man who is just trying to play to
indulge his ability to think, and have some fun with it. And in the final
tournament, in Chicago, Josh comes to meet his nemesis for the first time.
He is a rich kid, that has been supported by an older line of chess players,
and his style is dry, and quiet, and just play on... ruthlessly.  But the
kid does not know how to enjoy the game.  Josh finds himself trapped, and
loses a major piece.  Vinnie immediately states that Josh is setting him up,
much to the chagrin of the instructor who does not like games.  And when all
seems lost, Josh finally sees that he has got his opponent where he wants
him, even if it isn't true.  The young man does not know how to lose and
challenges Josh to continue.  And the real battle really begins, and Josh
finally traps the king. Before this, Josh had offered a draw, because he
knew that he could trap his opponent, who was good at set games, but not
very good at free play... or at playing the style which the parks in
Brooklyn had taught him.
A fabulously well directed film, with one outstanding factor that is
immediately visible.  The film is shot, in its entirety, with single lights
for highlight, and also a very real effect. It has shadows ( like every
corner of your house and room ) and the camera deals with it.  It adds a lot
of suspense, and thinking to any shot, and helps isolate each character in
their own little world.  The concept is not new.  It is very old, and the
one that we live with everyday.  But it is rarely used in many American
films whose tradition is steeped by the television styles, which is overly
lit, and is not real.  It makes for a moody film, but in this case, it is
not a brooding film, but one that tries to help us define that little space,
where the character sits, or stands.  CONRAD L HALL's vision is now clear,
and set. And the director Zaillian knew how to work with it.  The concept
was well thought out previously, and Mr. Zaillian must have been well aware
of the way this film needed to be shot.  ( See the film VISIONS OF LIGHT for
Conrad's discussions on his use of lighting..  or lack of. )
This film is very well cast, and Ben Kingsley is very good.  But the
character most interesting to watch, is Lawrence Fishburne playing Vinnie,
in a role where he can be his street person, and street smart.  It helps the
kid grow up, but it also helps him be a kid, because it is fun.  This is
always in contrast to the brooding, and very serious chess teacher.  Vinnie
never touches a chess piece indoors, and Bruce never touches one piece
outdoors. And Josh becomes the best of both worlds, because he mixes the
two.
A very well done film, with a very nice little story line that goes beyond
the world of chess.  Josh has another little friend, and he takes him aside
towards the end.  He may lose a chess game, but he still has a friend to
play with, and that is more important. The ending line, with his little
friend, is so very satisfying, and one of the reasons which makes this film
so pleasing to anyone, chess fans or not.  A great kid story.  And a real
nice look at an outcast from the chess world, which Bobby Fisher is.   More
of a  renegade against a stuck up system than anything else is the point
that the film seems to wish to make.
Worth seeing, and with some electrifying performances, and moments of very
nice tension.  Few film directors can draw up such a well done piece of
work, but it may have been the eye of the cinematographer that made this
film the excellent piece of work that it is.  Right from the start.

Title
Review for ĄAy, Carmela! (1990)
Carlos Saura has always been interested in dance, film, theatre, and many of
the artistic forms which people have related to.  He has depicted them in
his films as a part of life, a very important part of life, that provides
not only a spark, but also the means without which we are not capable of
surviving.
It is no surprise, then, when this film deals with such a theme, and in a
manner which is not pleasing, but this time, it is a compromise one has to
make between life and death.
A pair of down on their luck actors, take up a small living, in exchange for
food by providing entertainment for the troops  ( the republicans ) that are
fighting the forces supported by Mussolini, Hitler and Generalissimo Franco
( the nationalists ).  When they are tired of a small town, and decide to go
on to a larger place, life changes.  While resting close to Valencia ( their
destination ), they are approached by the advancing nationalists.  They are
arrested, and thrown in with all the others, only to be saved by an Italian
commander who used to be a theatre director, and stage manager.  He insists
on the creation of material for his own troops, and all of a sudden the
entertainers are forced to become real 'actors'.  It's the only alternative
to death.  However, Carmella ( the wife ) has a bit of a big mouth and often
speaks out, and this has a potential of getting them all in trouble.
Needless to say, they don't win, or get very far, although the nationalists
won all the battles and ruled until Franco's death in the seventies.
A bit of an oddity, for a Saura script, it is acted, in the spirit of a fun
farce, and play, but it is deadly serious, and the characters are in danger
at all times.  All in all, it is a slow film, that requires the viewer's
attention, because much of the dialogue is intended to create 'slips of the
tongue' which is a
very good, and strong acting tool.  However, this attitude, often gets all
of them in trouble, though the Italian commander, has a good enough sense of
humor and understanding of things, to be able to disagree, and defend their
position cleverly.  And without, meaning to, both the audience, and the
actors, are eventually forced, or resigned, to accept the inevitable
solution.  The life of the artists goes on.  The art lives on.  And a new
government is now in power, though it got there by the gun.
A politically minded film, it really shows the sensitive side of an
extremely volatile situation, and how one can deal with it, even if one
disagrees with it.  People do tend to stand up for life, given the choice.
And the ensuing  results are not always pleasant.
The acting is fun, and good.  The film does not have much music in it, but
it does have the political songs of the day, which at times are sung, and
their lyrics keep the film moving.  The subtitles, unfortunately do not do
the original dialect any justice at all, so one really misses out on the
actual
flavor, and style of insulting an invading force, which renders the actors
forced choice even more repugnant and disappointing.  Taken out of the
subtitles are the swearing, and the fowl language which these songs have.
The actors' original opinion on the nationalists is not very far from a pile
of excrement. The subtitle, doesn't even come close to telling us what was
really said.You may like to see this film, if you are a history buff, and
have an interest in Spain, or if you want to practice your vernacular
Castillian.
Copyright (c) Pedro Sena 1994
Reviewer and Moderator of the CENTIPEDE's THE FILM.

Title
Review for Knockin' On Heaven's Door (1997)
 I suppose that this film is a bit like trying to define dark comedy, or
black humor as it is often known. The problem is, where does one define the
beginning of the tragedy, or sad story, and the end of the comedy.
 And one thing, that some French and German films DO have, is a lot of this
who cares style of comedy, that invariably is more unfortunate than
enjoyable, but it does help us laugh a little. Maybe that's the only point.
 In this fine, and very enjoyable film, Martin and Rudi find out that they
do not have too long to live. One has an inoperable brain tumor and the
other has bone cancer. So they set out to take a trip and enjoy whatever
time they have left. And what a trip this is. They begin by stealing a car,
and then make their way to the coast, which has to go through Denmark.
 And the misadventures along the way, are hilarious, and very enjoyable,
although Martin seems to be having seizures every now and then. In the
chase, of these two are two hoods, the victims of the stolen car, and later
by the police. And towards the end, the film pretty much allows a Deux ex
Machina to work, just so that these two can have their quiet end.
 Several things make this film enjoyable. All the characters are eccentric
nuts, and have their own agendas, and the are always crashing into someone
else, which makes for a bunch of odd ball situations, that are hilarious.
The whole thing starts with the first time they have to fill up the little
car with gasoline. But a bigger hint for tings to come, was shown in the
room that they were both assigned, where they met. As soon as they decided
that they were going to enjoy their last days on earth, the cross falls off
the wall, and the cabinet opens up to find a bottle of tequila, ready for
them. And what seems to start out as a drag of a film, slow, and down
trodden, all of a sudden turns up to be one of those that you got to see to
enjoy it.
 Rudi has never been to the coast, and never seen the sea, and Martin tells
him about it. In the end, we discover much more, and this is the main motif
in the whole film. Nothing will stop these two from getting there, it seems,
specially when the police is bumbling on its own wheels and adventures, and
can't get things together. As it turns out, these guys get a break from the
news media, which allows them to continue to their destination, where the
film ends.
 If this film is not well directed, at least the two characters have worked
out together really well. And it is their interplay that makes the things so
enjoyable. With their bit of luck, they manage to make happen one of their
wishes from their list, thus adding a slight fulfillment to their lives,
even if it is at the end.
 With some excellent music, through out, and a supreme version of Bob
Dylan's song at the end, a la German rock super style, this film is actually
a very nice one, and one that is worth seeing. It is not a fancy film, in
shooting style, or anything major, but its two characters are infectious,
and do take us along for a ride.

Title
Review for Glengarry Glen Ross (1992)
This is a depressing film, and story.   But if you can get by all that, you
ought to appreciate some dynamite acting, the type that you hope to catch on
a stage at least ONCE in your lifetime.
Like the play, to which this is faithful almost to the last letter, this
piece is one of David Mamet's best known pieces of work.  And while it is
not a fancy piece, or a Broadway piece of shlock, this is what the theatre
loves to have around, as a chance to blow audiences all over, and allow the
actors a chance to shine.  Glengarry Glen Ross is about just that.
It is the story of a few down and out real estate salesmen that are in one
office, who are at the end of their ropes.  Their selling abilities are now
moved into a new style of hype and slickness, that underlies all the
characters.  Only that these guys have not updated their game to the new
ways and styles.  It seems that this particular office is now relegated to
the junk departments, or to the lists that are left overs, and to try and
sell some property to tenants that have been targeted for years, but have
never given in.  Downtown, all the salesmen are getting all the new leads.
But here, they never see a new lead, because none of these guys has the
talent to sell them, or they have not sold anything in so long that they
have forgotten how to sell.
And the characters panic, scream, talk, lie, and do what they can to book
the client that might just get them a chance to try and sell one of the
prime pieces of properties around, which are the new dwellings in Glengarry
Glen.  And to this extent, one, two, or three, it is never really clear, of
the salesmen, conspire to rob the office and steal the list of new leads,
with the hope of getting a chance to sell one or two of those properties.
And the rest of the play is a series of moments trying to find out who
exactly did it, because the two who seemed to have planned it, may not have
been involved in it at all.
The two acting jobs that stand out are Jack Lemmon ( Oscar Nomination ) and
Al Pacino, the two aging selling superstars, now trying so hard to close yet
another deal which might save their job.  Accolades regarding their ability,
and their smoothness, is just about impossible... there are not enough words
to describe acting in this level.
The weakest part in this film, believe it or not, is the directing. As a
play, this is ready for "movement", and the lines has quite a bit of it, and
the characters use it very well.  The director is afraid to keep his camera
still, and many times gets caught off guard by the charging actor.  The
angularity with which David Mamet loves to work with, is not at all clear
here in this film, something which is readily visible on stage.  It moves in
small
concentric circles from this space to the next.  We might have been able to
enjoy this better if we had just placed these actors in a building, tore
down the fourth wall, and just turned the  camera on ... and watch them kill
themselves trying so hard.  To make a close up, for emotionality's sakes, is
un-necessary, and a bit of film idiom, that is wasted here.
But this film, despite a flaw that is questionable by this reviewer, still
is about the one thing that we need so much in this country. Live theatre...
this is IT, at its finest.  If you ever wonder where these people learned
their craft, take a good look.

Title
Review for Kika (1993)
If there is anything that is worth while checking out in Pedro Almodovar's
films, it is the superb cinematography.  Like his previous films, this one
is a treat to watch, not only in the color schemes that are quite
outrageous, but also for the really well thought out set designs.
The story, that is something else.  Despite its (rather) oddball storyline,
this film is fun to watch, because it is really hard to figure out what is
happening at any time, and what is this whole mess leading up to. And like
many of Almodovar's films, this film could be about many things, from a
surrealistic attack on the way that some television people can manipulate
situations to get the results they want, to a story of odd characters
who are usually scheming to get their way with the women.
Either way, the film is entertaining, although the famous situation
considering Kika's rape is actually boring, and taken to a bit of total
surrealistic exasperation.
But what is the film really about. The late Spanish master, Luis Bunuel,
would say that the film is always about the people, and what they do in
various situations when they happen.  If this is the case, the characters in
this film are quite unusual, and fun to keep track of.  The television
reporter, will stoop to anything to get A-1 material for her stories trying
hard to get the premium ratings that she wants.  At the same time,
the person she is trying to frame and set up, also happens to be the wrong
one to keep an eye on, as he is shifty, and is able to keep things going his
way, all the way to the end.
But in between, is a series of situations that are off the wall, and some
characters just seem to pop out of nowhere to surprise the viewer, and also
to jolt the thinking.  Who really is the maid.?  And what is the son
actually doing.?  And who is really setting up these things.?
Although, I do not find this film as much fun to watch, as say for example,
HI HEELS, still there is quite a bit of Almodovar here to keep us going. The
film is extremely color rich, and well lit, almost to the point of too much,
and the contrasts that are offered for the eyes, are quite a memorable
viewing.  But the rest of the film may just really be
a bit of a bore.  We are never really let into the characters to enjoy their
idiosyncratic ways. It almost comes off as a cartoon. But it is a Spanish
cartoon, and the attitudes are different, and sometimes, fun to watch.
Slow to develop, and at times just plain, compared to other Almodovar films,
KIKA, still stands as a fun film to watch, despite its occasional bad taste,
here and there.

Title
Review for Stanno tutti bene (1990)
Compared to THE ICICLE THIEF, this is not a better film, or any recent
Italian films shown here recently.  And only because THE ICICLE THIEF has a
funnier  story.
But, STANNO TUTTI BENE, has the best showcase for ACTORS.
Marcello Mastroianni, has been around for what it seems like ages.  He is
usually good, and more often than not a bit boring.  The Italian stallion
who bags all the women, and gains it all, and then squanders it before the
ending and has to return to his unsatisfactory situation with his wife.  And
finally, he gets a role that he can showcase, that he is no slouch of an
actor.
Playing a Sicilian father of five children, whose wife just recently has
passed away, he decides to take advantage of the old folks pension plans and
goes on a trip through out Italy, to try and visit his children.  But as an
aging man, little does he know that his family doesn't want him around, and
in fact, hide a lot from him.  He had some tremendous expectations for his
children, and tried to get them the best positions available, in order to
insure that they would succeed.  None of them do.  And four of them are
struggling to make ends meet, and not having an easy time of it.  They tip
each other off, so they
won't be home when dad arrives, or will try to make arrangements to make
sure he doesn't notice their sad situation.
And by the end, it all has to come to a halt, and he is told by one of his
children, at a dinner for the whole family ( only two sons came ) that one
had died, and that they all were having a hard time.  Dad finds a reason to
not accept the death of one of his sons, and has a small stroke.  He goes to
the hospital where they all visit him.  The young grandson has gotten a
girlfriend pregnant and he dishes out one last piece of advise to the
youngster. This time the grandson follows the advice and the film ends
with the old man standing at his wife's gravesite telling her that all  was
well.  He means well.  And he wants his wife to be happy.
This film, is both about the old age neglect, as it is about the oldsters
inability to accept the life of the young ones, they raised.  And
invariably, in all societies, the children end up paying a much harder price
for surviving.  Marcello Mastroianni, is outstanding, and deserves the
accolades.  As the  old man, who talks to himself, and reasons every thing,
and is rather  congenial, he stands out.  And in the process, 'buries' his
children, because he has strength where they do not.
Written and Directed by Giuseppe Tornatore, who can't escape the gags
through out the film.  And there are some really hilarious moments for a few
of us, who enjoy seeing the unexpected.  The Mona Lisa joke is one of the
best, and really sums up the whole thing.  They not only don't know what
they are talking about, they don't even see where they stand in time.
WORTH SEEING. Gags are totally unexpected and will surprise you. Very nice
little film, and it is too bad that some of us have to enjoy it  with
subtitles, because there are a lot of small Woody Allen type little gags all
over that are harder to see if the subtitles.

Title
Review for This Is the Sea (1998)
Seen at the 21st Portland International Film Festival
    I suppose that is  hard to appreciate the problems that Ireland has had
since its unesasy peace, between the two main factions in their country.
    And many a film has dealt with that, specially the theme of the
political edge on this tough situation, and how to undo hundreds of years of
hatred. It is believed that the British have not done enough in this area at
all, and some films in the past have directly pointed the fingers in that
direction. This film really gives us another finger to point at, and in its
own subtle way, gets us to realize that the problem is not so much a
political argument, as it is the individual education of each and every
member of the social structure of the country. Not enough has been done to
try and help integrate these people, and inevitably, as is the case here,
one man or two take the law and war in their own hands, for whatever reasons
they feel they wish to conclude their arguments with.
    But this excellent film, does it in a subtle way, although it appears to
steer our attention in the wrong direction.
    It is the story of two young one, who meet and come to know each other
and fall in love. And the problems start here. Hazel is a Plymouth Brethren
Protestant, and Malachy is a Catholic, even though there is no direct sign
that he is one. This creates a problem for the family of the girl, the
mother of whom, happens to be stubbornly opposed to the girl even getting
involved with anyone and has the girl marked for the role that she has
played for years, and her ancestors have followed for at least one previous
generation. But this is the nineties. The young girl is supported by an
elder, whose relationship to the family is not clear. As the mother finds
out that the daughter is skipping out, she gets her son to find out details,
and here things start getting complicated. As it turns out, the brother ends
up in cahoots with the whole tragedy, and an effort to kill the young man
Hazel has come to like a lot, is under way.
During this time, our attention is aimed at Rohan, who appears to be on the
British authorities' list of people to be watched all the time. The
authorities seem to think that he is involved in many other operations, and
keep trying to get us to figure out why what happens in the end is done at
all.
    And the twist ending in this film, will leave us a bit breathless. As
things get clear, the bomb that was set up, was engineered by the old man,
whose allegiances we were led to believe were with the young girl. And Rohan
was a bit of a side step thing to get the authorities looking in other
directions. The tragic side of the affair is that Hazel's young man is not
the one killed, but his older brother, and it takes a moment, for the girl
to figure out, by over hearing a phone conversation, that the killer is this
old man, who has taken upon himself to destroy the future of the young ones,
and add to the mess that the country of Ireland already finds itself in.
    In between, there is a lot of things that are subtle, that display this
director's excellent ability to do what she did. Right in the opening shot
sequence, when Hazel is being baptized, she does not have a smile,
indicating that she is being forced to do something that she has no desire
to do or be a part of. And it is the old man that provides the amusement to
help the kids to get through the ceremony. And through out the film Rohan
keeps after Malachy's older brother, to recruit the him for various jobs,
none of which are discussed, although the whole thing appears shady, and a
set up for Rohan, so he can get some money off some people.
     But it is a triumph, to see that he most important part of this story
makes it to the end in one piece, and makes this film superior... it is of
moments like these that hope arises and one can look forward to the future
and it is a credit to the director that things like these are not missed at
all.
    With some magnificent performances, none of which are over done, this is
a very well thought out and designed film, and deserves credit for not
pointing the fingers to anyone, but the hearts of those who have nothing in
it but hate, for selfish reasons. People that live in the past, and are not
interested in seeing the future a better one for their own children, despite
all the changes. And the future of any country depends on this.
    Another very well done thing in this film is the use of music through
out. While it has its edge in opinions, it is nevertheless strong, and
pointed towards the individual. Once again, the director's well thought out
vision comes through, and it makes the film stronger and better because of
it. If more artists took that stand, maybe things would change faster.....

Title
Review for Antonia (1995)
It is films like this that redefine what films are made for. And it typifies
the attitude that is the European community, versus the American style of
action pictures that are vacuous. They may have a lot of clever things in
it, but they have little substance.
ANTONIA'S LINE may not have much action, the film is very slow, but it does
have charm, character, passion, and beauty, and on top of it, a magnificent
story, and outline.  Antonia has moved back into town, because her mother is
on her final days. She has come into town without a husband, and with a
daughter of marrying  age.  They both immediately become the talk of the
town and the immediate
attention of all the members that want to mix with the two women. But,
unlucky for them, both women are independent and do not spend much time at
the usual lifestyle of mating and making children,  which seems all that the
whole community has to live for.
The town is an incredible hodgepodge of characters, that are totaly out
there, which makes the film even more enjoyable. And how they all blend in
is rather funny.  Antonia's daughter, one day decides that she wants a
child, but does not want a husband. They end up in the city, where her
daughter visits a brothel and gets together with a man who is one of the
owner's favorite lovers, and probable father of at least one of her
children. Of course, the daughter gets pregnant and this starts the film on
chapter two. We find that the daughter is gay, and she now lives with her
friend. And other matches are made in the village, including one young man
who is a bit slow. And eventually, Antonia also gets in the mood, and takes
on a lover, a man about her age, who has a miriad of sons, and no wife to
help him raise his children. She has not allowed anything to come to pass
between her and him, for years. And when it finally happens, the film is all
aglow. Everyone is happy, and everyone has a lover/wife/husband and  the
there are no worries anywhere.
And then the film turns. Antonia's grandchild grows to be a young woman that
is head and shoulders above most of anyone, and has a tutor, who is the
town's lonely man, always buried in his books and studies. In school the
young lady even embarrasses a teacher because he is not capable and
intelligent enough to see what is happening. The whole class ends up leaving
the room, after the girl's lead.
But this girl, one day meets a rather somber moment in life. She gets raped
by one of the village guys, who thinks that he is better than most. And this
is dealt with in a very harsh manner, but considering what he did, it may be
thought of as some sort of justice.
The film progresses, and ends on a somber note. The town's tutor, is a sad,
disappointed man, who apparently had fallen in love with Antonia, but she
did not respond. He has his only smile in the whole film in the beginning
when she returns to the village.  This kinda brings the film to an end.
Antonia's grandgranddaughter, is the one telling us the story, and we
finally notice why the characters are so
strange. They are basically seen through a child's eyes, and the
punishments, and the events all come and go with the same horrific flavor
that this film brings forth. It seems that the events are all very
important, and  they all have serious consequences as to the chain of
events.
But none, take away from the enjoyment of this film. It just won't quit,
even in the end, when you shut the video player down, and the film is still
in your mind... wonder what all this is about. By the style of directing and
story telling, the film is not about anything in particular. It covers three
generations, and it displays problems that each of these generations has had
with its own growth and time. But these
problems never stop the growth of it all. and as the film says in the end,
nothing "has come to an end".... except this fine film, with so many
excellent moments.
Of special interest and fun here, are the priest and his turn around. He is
probably set up, because he is a dirty old fart anyway, but it is all for
the best. And who he ends up with is a treat. One could say that there are
meanings here and there, but all in all, these are understated as a part of
the whole picture, which is the whole film. Yes, we can say that there are
pointed moments, and statements, but when one does that, this film loses
some of its really precious moments. Like Antonia's daughter and grand
daughter always seeing things happening... in the oddest of moments... and
these bits are so enjoyable that it is hard to fault a film for anything
else.
Well thought out, beautifully written, and worth seeing.
Reviewed by Pedro Sena. Copyright (c) Pedro Sena 1997. All Rights Reserved.

Title
Review for Manon des sources (1986)
And this is where the story really starts.  Manon, now a grown teenager
decides
to take her revenge in her own hands, on the people who destroyed her
father.
With the help of an outsider boyfriend they begin planning their attack,
until
the old farmer's accomplice is found out and kills himself.  At that point
the
old farmer is lost, and has little strength to keep up the chore of plugging
the well every time it swells up.  The problems mount until 2/3 of the way
the film drops a brick on your head.
An elder woman, who lives elsewhere, comes to visit.  She was one of the old
farmer's flames, and dearly loved him.  She loved him so much that when she
got pregnant she kept the child.  And she tells the story of the child
growing
up away from dad.  And in the meantime Yves Montand's face begins to turn
sad, that the woman he loved the most, never told him the story before, and
they never married,  which they both wanted.
He absolves himself, apologizes to Manon, and clears himself before he dies,
a disappointed man, sad in love, and sadder in life.
The beauty of this film is the turnaround between what is really a set of
criminal actions, and the kharma which begets him.  What he did to others,
he
now pays in full unto himself.  The suffering he applied to others, he now
has to face in full.  And he does, thus showing his strength and ability.
Manon and her husband unplug the well, the town is happy, and the prosperity
will now start.
It isn't often that a story is told, and keeps you in, only to find out that
all that matters is not gold.  And when it does, the story has to deal with
it without throwing it away.  This film does, and delivers with as much
beauty
as there is.
If you have the patience to see this film, do so.  You will be stunned, but
you will like it.  It delivers, like most films don't.
A MUST SEE.  But it only makes good sense if you see both films, since the
first film explains the outcome and actions of the second film.  SUBTITLES,
you say, so what. A film is a film, and to take care of the action like this
novel does is an accomplishment not often done in film.  This is LITERATURE
at
its best on film.  This is not ENTERTAINMENT.  And as literature, it teaches
and helps us along.
ENJOY IT.  The Acting is superb, and this was Yves Montand best role ever.
He
won several international awards for it.  It's a tour the force, and a real
shame that he gets ignored for the Oscars.  There isn't much better work
around that can stand up to this kind of material.  Brilliantly written and
taken care of with just as much care.  Wonderful music and visuals through
out, as it has 'poetic' moments every now and then, giving us the seers a
chance to catch our breath, and evaluate what went on.
If you like good work, this is as good as it gets, or are likely to find.

Title
Review for Basquiat (1996)
BASQUIAT, is a perfect example of what a film maker can do, when he cares
about what he is doing, rather than just making a film that is supposed to
mean something. The touches, the care, the details, and the totality of this
film, is what makes this so endearing and important. Never mind the artist
even.
The film itself, though, is as good as it gets about the artist, and while
it obviously does not approve of the artist's way, it never stops to make a
judgement about his lifestyle, and here is the beauty of it all. As Jean
Michel says " if I take it all out it will all become boring ... "
And this is what the film does so well. Wether the performances are close to
the originals or not is another question, but it is hard to fault the
attitudes that some people take here. New York does get its share of shit
for art, that becomes known as "art", and although Basquiat and Warhol were
not major
intuitive players, they did add a certain amount of freshness and weirdness
to the period that helped push the buttons, and expand the art business in
that area, and eventually around the world.
But it was not new. And it was not tremendously original. Jean Michel
Basquiat, did however have to offer something that others did not. He did
have an artistic perception that others around him did not, not even Andy
Warhol. And the film does go a bit out of its way to show that Andy Warhol
is really
not the artist that he was made out to be, and lacked the resolution to be
the intuitive force that Basquiat DID have.
Few films stand out in the art world. Generally films like this that deal
with music do better in film. Films about writers tend to be harsh to stick
with as the narratives get tiresome. But films about art, are even harder,
because it is necessary that one embroider the work into the film, and this
is not easy. The best of these, LA BELLE NOISEUSSE, is four hours long, but
it is riveting, and the main subject IS the art, and the main people
involved in it, the painter and the model. With Basquiat, he is his own
model through his feelings, and this allows for a nice place for the film to
come from.
Few films take care of things like this one does... it is excellent. And
should be seen. It's a shame that it did not get a wider release, because
the film has excellent music and visual imagery to really blow off most star
wars dilettantes.
4.5 out of 5 GIBLOONS
Reviewed by Pedro Sena. Moderator of Centipede's THE FILM.
Copyright (c) Pedro Sena 1997. All Rights Reserved.

Title
Review for Far Off Place, A (1993)
Despite the fact that Disney films usually only goes for the greedy kill
when it comes to the making of films, at least here is one film that is
rather nice, preachy in some ways, but still very dedicated to a worthwhile
cause.....that bucks the general trend.
A Far Off Place is about a young man that gets caught up in the middle of a
war on the ivory in Africa.  While being out in the country with the new
friend he has just made, both their families get exterminated by a band of
thieves, so it seems, when in all actuality they were erased by a mob that
is defiant about its stand on the illegal trade of the massive elephant's
ivory.
In the process, the two get taken up by an aborigine, African variety --
what are they doing here anyway...??? -- that pretty much leads them to
freedom and the eventual downfall of the ivory baron and his control of the
whole area.
And while the film starts with the type of relationship that two teenagers
are believed to have, none to speak of, but now they are forced to stick
together to survive and get to their destination, the film moves along with
the strength of the aborigine, that stands out as the wonderful actor and
person he is.  Though bit by a sand scorpion, he manages to deliver his
friends to safety and ensure that the wild is preserved for his own people
and the animals who also take a liking to him.  In the process he shows us
that the elephants are also intelligent people and that they understand when
one talks to them..... a herd helps the children escape by erasing all their
tracks.
This film really is more about the feudal lord systems that run much of
Africa than anything else, and the white man has become the greedy devil
which we hope is finally ending, although the underground war against the
poachers is still gigantic.... this type of film should help one become
aware of it.
Excellent film, and enjoyable at every moment with very good acting and a
tremendous story.  Brutal as only the jungle can be in places, although it
is the survival that matters in this case.

Title
Review for Scent of a Woman (1992)
There are films that just stand out, and if it isn't because it is well
written, then it is because an actor just takes over, and delivers what is
undoubtedly one of the most deserving Oscar performances around.
Scent of a Woman, is a simple film, nothing complicated about it at all, and
the story is very easy to tell.  A college boy, Charles (Chris O'Donnell) in
a private institution in the east ( Boston ) gets in trouble with a few of
his friends, for which his future is at stake.  Since it  happens just prior
to the Thanksgiving holidays, there isn't much that  the school can do to
discipline anyone until the following Monday.  In  the meantime, he gets
himself a part time job to help take care of his financial needs for the
holidays.  And that job is to take care of a retired, and blind, career army
man ( played by Al Pacino ).  And what looked like an easy job turns into a
weekend in New York, where the real  story about the Colonel is unfolding.
He wants to have one more fling,  and then end his life.
The Colonel is alone, his own family doesn't like him, or his surprise
visit, and he is not known for being Mr.. congeniality, either.  But Charlie
is a well mannered kid, and his way eventually affects the aging Colonel.
Upon returning to the school on Monday, Charles is facing expulsion and a
ruined future because of his honesty, and integrity.  And in appears the
surrogate father who delivers the young man from the claws of defeat. And
the school's discipline committee takes a harmless stand, so not to hurt
anyone, which is the speech that delivers the young man from the claw of the
over eager administrator with revenge on his mind.
A magnificent film, really nicely done, well executed in almost every phase,
and it stimulates the feelings of the viewer, because we can not let go of
the character or the story.  The aging Colonel still has an eye for women,
and can smell them a mile away, and teases the younger Charlie about them.
There are many films that one should see on a large screen and this one is
one of them, but unlike them, this one is stronger, even if seen at home, on
the video ( as I just did ), where one's emotional edges are allowed to run
freely.... and this film is at least one of those that  requires a pause...
and then run back to it....

Title
Review for Outremer (1990)
There are few of us, in this side of the ocean, that can really feel  and
understand the horrible destruction that overcame Europe this century, and
what it left behind.  After all these years, there are still deep scars,
which nowadays, get used up by a different breed in an empty fight for a
dream that is sicker than freedom ever will
be.  It isn't all about love..... it is about giving in to what is
available.... it's all there is.
There are three sisters, and they are good friends, and differ in many
respects.  The oldest one promptly marries a naval officer ( story starts in
1946 ) just before the French go off to try and save their Algerian
province, and later the Vietnamese country.  The marriage is  fine, and
there are four kids, a fifth on the way, and the officer goes off to Japan.
He disappears.  The happy marriage is now history, and the mother tries to
kill herself ( fails ) because she misses her  husband.  The second sister
gets married to a guy who does little,
except reading books.  He gets taken to Algeria, where he has a wine farm,
and employs Algerians.  And the younger sister lives with them.
The younger sister has become a nurse, a valiant battler to a cause that
prevents her from speaking about it to any one.  She has a loved one who
happens to be an Algerian, and on occasional evenings they visit together in
the middle of the night.  The tensions in Algeria get tougher, the marriage
of the second sister is falling apart, she does all the managing of the
farm, and the husband reads.  The younger sister's line of men has
increased, suitors to an idea they can not find.  And one day the lover is
caught and shot.  She leaves for
France, after taking abuse by Algerians who didn't know better.  The second
sister, saves her husband, but gets shot in the process.
And as the film ends, it is 1964, and the third sister is finally going  to
get married, and can't even say the words.  It is clear, that  this is not
what she really wanted, but it is what she has to settle for, the knight on
a white horse she spoke of never materialized, or if he did, he was shot by
the very people she is a part of.... a
meaningless fight for colonialism.
The filming of this story is actually extremelly romantic, and has moments
that come off like a romance novel, in that at times it  appears overly
emotional, and then immediately after shows us another side, full of
fantasy.  In other words, there is a lot to be desired by the choices people
have to make, or end up with,.... and even
when they have a choice, they may not come away with it.  A sad commentary
on idealism versus realism.
One sister had hopes, and ended up dis-illusioned.  One had a good start,
but ended up not seeing the man's faults.  And the third has met her man,
but can never really enjoy it, or make anything out of it.  The two who
never had an idea of what they wanted, eventually find that they are not too
happy, despite their outward appearance that they are....it all comes out in
a scene, when the two older sisters are upset because the younger one is
over thirty, not married, and refuses the approaches of a well to do
architect.  The one who
couldn't consume her private inner marriage, was more courageous and fought
a more humanitarian battle.. but where she has courage, it  also is the
means to her destruction.
While the film ends a bit on an upbeat note, it had to go through a tough
period to finally afford a chance for the third sister to  accept what
society has to offer.  The catholic rites she is  undertaking are extremelly
strict ( the camera stays on the priest's face for it ) and even have a hint
that the foreigners are not children of god.
In its own way, it is a scathing attack on what was does for an individual,
and the stupid notions many of us get, when something comes around, and we
immediately take sides and guns to our cartel. And it is this attitude,
which is destroying the beauty, and the humanity in all of us, despite the
glorious battle some of us have, or are, fighting.  In its own way, the film
deplores the belief systems which create the hypocrisies.... And deservedly
so.

Title
Review for Ju Dou (1990)
I suppose that China is only at this day in time, been able to finally
discuss some of the problems which they have had for several centuries, and
the forms which are readier than most to show it, happen to be that of the
motion pictures.  And one of the first themes which I have seen, have dealt
mostly with the advent of women as second class citizens, servants to the
male superior, to whom she is basically a slave, a  mistress who has to bear
a boy, or they are dumped, or killed.
Zhang Yimou's first film ( to my knowledge ) is about a young lady that gets
bought out by a new master.  But he is rough, and unkind, and the new
mistress ends up receiving some solace in the friendship of one of the son's
in the clan.  But this fateful union proves to be terribly destructive.  The
affair produces a boy, who is brought up along, until one day, the couple's
affair is finally coming to a head.  The master of the house has become
disabled, and now is at the mercy of the mistress and her boyfriend.
However, as the child grows, he befriends the old man, though he
accidentally kills him.  And the old man has convinced the youngster that he
is the father, not the lover.  The young man grows angrier as time goes by,
and in the end kills the lover.  At that point
the mother sets the silk ( fabric dyeing ) factory on fire and puts an end
to the whole tragic affair, from the tainted marriage to the tragic love
affair.
It is interesting to notice that very much like the film which Zhang Yimou
would eventually do ( RAISE THE RED LANTERN ), the focus is strictly on the
event of the woman's involvement with her lover, which, has no choice but to
fall into a tragedy
since they are the ones violating the norm.  And it is convenient to notice
that by concentrating on the character's individual desires, the film pretty
much absolves the social atmosphere from its culpability in creating a
system where women are expendable depending on the desires of the master of
the house.  I suppose, that by doing this, the government can blame the
state of affairs on a system long gone, which
was corrupt, and which Mao Tse Tung tried to end.  And the film can find
funds, and avoid criticism.
In a more subtle manner, the film also decries the lack of modernization,
not only in the actual factory, but also in the way of thinking.  In the
beginning a buyer asks the
master why he does not upgrade his factory and modernize it, and the owner
dismisses it as not wishing to have too many people in there.  In other
words rugged individuality is the main reason why such a large country has
to be ruled with an iron fist...only to pay for it later.
The very attractive Gong Li, plays the role of Judou, and is actually very
good, though it appears that here she has the capacity of really becoming
very emotional, in contrast
to her role in LANTERN, which is so subdued.  The difference might just be
that in JuDou, the characters are commoners, where in LANTERN they are upper
class.
The film is nice, though very sad and tragic.  And it is well filmed, though
the symbolic edges during the film tend to appear a bit old for us, who have
seen so many films, but
very effective for a society that has not seen that many films.  And the
turn of events is actually very unexpected, which is really the product of a
well told story, something
which Zhang Yimou has definitely displayed in his work.

Title
Review for Ed Wood (1994)
The emotional trauma that one goes through to make a film..... specially
when one is new, and does not have a record to go with the resume.  This is
really what this film is about.
And this film is as much a tribute to those efforts, as much as it is for a
man who tried to get into film, but eventually, he could only find his way
into an area, that in years to come, Hollywood would finally learn to use to
its advantage.  Ed Wood, unfortunately,
became synonymous with the worst films ever made, not so much because of the
subject matter ( total surrealism, Hollywood style ), but because he ended
up being stuck in his own image.  And in those days, one never left it, or
so it seemed.
This film, is a kind, loving, and caring look at the trials and tribulations
of a film maker.  In the process he has the fortune of making the
acquaintance of one famous actor in the decline, Bela Lugosi, who is
terribly addicted and confused.  And the question is how to get the old
actor into a costume for another story, something which even Bela, might
have hoped would bring his star back to life.
And, what makes this film so nice, is without any doubt, the exceptional
performances all around.  Martin Landau won an Oscar in March of 1995 for
this film, and deservedly so.  The great Bela Lugosi could never get that
much attention, but the legacy he left behind was his mark, and this is
probably as close as he will ever get to the Oscar.  And Johnny Depp, tends
to look like a fifties kid just trying to make it through the 30's and 40's
and make a film.  Sad to say, that the demise of Bela Lugosi had a lot to do
with the depression and how no one could afford to go to see a film, and
thus,
support an industry.  All of the film's attention is on the inside story,
and how some people are trying desperately to make a living, in an era, when
it was virtually impossible to do so.
And the only material that was trying to break the Hollywood traditions of
the time ( already in place ), were the ones that did something different.
And Ed Wood personifies them all.
With a few bit parts here and there, like Bill Murray as Bunny ( eventually
Myra ) Breckinridge, the film plods along.  Ed Wood couldn't afford real
actors, so anyone who wanted to be in a film was going to have the honors.
Many did, to help develop the oddest collection of characters in any film,
to come up with some unusual surrealistic material Hollywood style, which
this stuff really is.
Good film.  Worth seeing.  A great look at the film business as well.
4 GIBLOONS
Copyright (c) Pedro Sena 1995. All Rights Reserved.
Member of the Internet Movie Critics Association

Title
Review for Don Juan DeMarco (1995)
This film is ample proof what a first rate actor can do for a film that is
basically nothing, to begin with.
Were it not for the subtle, polished, and so very clean work that the two
experienced actors in this production show, this film may have otherwise
fallen apart.  But with Marlon Brando, and Faye Dunaway, this film takes on
different proportions, which
are rather unusual, and turn what might have been a so- so film into
something rather nice to watch, at least for people who have a taste for
impeccable acting work.
This is the story of a young man who thinks he is Don Juan, the legendary
lover.  But he is having problems, he has fallen in love with one particular
woman, and he is now living in a mental institution where some doctors are
eager to drug up the young man, and put him away. But Dr. Minkler has
different thoughts. He engages the young man's trust and takes helps him
come through his hard time. In the process the young man affects the
doctor's own private life which has become stale.
A simple story, all in all, but by the time you get a hang of both Marlon
Brando and Faye Dunaway, as his wife, this film  takes on different
proportions.  And it is their acting that
keeps this film going. One doesn't even recognize Faye Dunaway, and it is
such a surprise that she is so smooth in this film rather than the showy
actress that she has been for so long.
As the story develops the doctor is discovering that his stale marriage is
all of a sudden becoming a bit more exciting and that they are starting to
enjoy each other a little more... and much of the credit goes to the young
man that is on the edge of being instituted.  He has an incurable
romanticism that is hard to let go, that affects many of the people around
him.
It is a pleasure to watch such a magnificent actor in this film do his
thing. He is so relaxed, and so well prepared that if forces everyone around
him to do that much better. And his relationship with his wife, which
appears to be boring at the start, turns out to be a really nice match of
actors, that work their way through things rather nicely, and it is a
pleasure to watch.
The film is nicely directed with a few touches here and there, and a
noticeable lack of close ups so that we do not get so emotionally involved
with the young man. With such a  great pair of actors around him,  it is
hard not to enjoy this film.

Title
Review for Edward II (1991)
Much like Peter Greenaway's PROSPERO'S BOOKS, this play is not for everyone,
and specially for those who have intellectual visions about both the poetry
and the play.
In keeping with the general trend in England over the past thirty years to
assault all theatre with every interpretation of the same play, anyone can
come up with, this play is not erratic, or strange to follow.  In all
probability, it carries more truth than it does theatre, if the situations
were considered possible, or true, if they were actual history.
The king is a homosexual ( nothing new there ) and has an affinity for a
particular childhood friend ( Gaveston ) with whom he wishes to share the
throne and every possession he has.  However, this is a major problem for
the nobility surrounding the court, and leads to the destruction of the
king, supported by his jealous wife, who comes of as the gorgon.  The
Gaveston is ordered to be killed by the queen, and eventually the throne is
taken away from Edward II and passed on to his young son, who happens to be
a pawn in the whole thing.
While the conformists will never even stay for five minutes to watch this
play, there is a bit too much kissing amidst the homosexuals in the court,
the fact remains that its probability ( were it fact, and there is no reason
not to accept a bit of literary license upon an old story ) of truth are
actually better than the glorified events of any other tragedy, which both
Marlowe and Shakespeare went after in the years to come.
There is also another thread which is difficult to ignore, and has also been
explored on the stage.  That Marlowe himself, was a young man that spent
much of his time with other boys, thus sharing a few things with the king.
However, this is not all too hard to take when it is a well known fact that
younger men played all the roles of women in Shakespeare's time, and were
well known to engage in sexual activity other than what was, and is,
considered normal by any social standards.  By all intents and purposes,
this makes Doctor Faustus an exercise in narcissism, rather than a pact with
the devil to fight an institution.  At the time, much like the Hebrew
counterparts, if a man was not married, or had children, he wasn't
considered a man at all, but a detriment to society, and one to be made fun
off.
Regardless of any of these facts, this is an excellent play, with some
outstanding poetry, though it doesn't have the rhymes that Shakespeare was
capable of, and it plays very straight forward......and well.
And although it isn't my special type of theatre, or the way I would really
present it with its incredible directness and disregard for the audiences
proclivities, it makes for a more open attitude in presentations, thus
affording a better, clearer, and therefore more effective theme about the
way humans tend to treat each other.
EXCELLENT PLAY.  OUTSTANDING ACTING. NON COMPROMISING IDEALS.
And not for everybody.
Copyright (c) Pedro Sena 1994
Member of the Internet Movie Critics Association

Title
Review for Fargo (1996)
It's nice to see American directors come back to the old fashioned black
comedies and their off beat styles. FARGO is, aside from the deadly  serious
story line, one of those. But it becomes a black comedy by virtue of its
characters and their naivete, or should one say, on  occasion, their own
stupidity. At the bottom of all this, is the human
fallacy, that no one can see anything we do at all, and that we will  get
away with it all, even if something goes wrong.
Unfortunately, the film states that this is a true story, which might have
made the film that much more entertaining. The real story is that the film
is NOT entertaining and that these characters are real people with real
reactions, and over reactions. And, in between, is a half baked attempt at
making fun of the life and times in the Midwest, with its naivete and over
abundance of expressions and vernacular.
The story is basic enough. A man who has grand designs for financial gains,
trying to do what others with the capital do -- harmless enough, hires two
bums to kidnap his wife and set up a ransom situation, where upon he  would
split the money with the bums so that he would be able to go ahead on a deal
that he has his eyes on. So far so good. But the two bums that he hires are
an odd couple. One is vicious and the other is apparently a bit retarded, or
at least not all there. And in the process of doing their job, they get
stopped by the highway patrol. The vicious guy loses his  temper and kills
the trooper and then decides to go after a passer by that drove by during
the moment they were disposing of the trooper's body.... and on, and on.
Amidst all this is a police chief, Marge, who is pregnant, but seems to
have a pretty good handle on things, and a fairly controlled demeanor. She
and her husband look like the all American average Joe and Mary, boring as
heck, they probably go to the Twins games once a month, etc, etc. She is a
character. She has brains, in a place where other troopers do not seem to
have much of an eye for detail and attention. She decides to follow up the
case, and it kicks back to the man who has the grand designs. The getaway
car, seems to have a dealer's plate, and this seems to be the  only
dealership in town. The fact that his wife is also missing, is also  a
curious point to her. They couldn't be connected could they?
Eventually, the two bums kinda get out of hand, and the kidnapped wife
manages an escape. By that time, the police chief has done all her homework
and is already after the bums and the man with the big plans. End of story,
and film.
But in between, the whole thing is crazy, and off key, with the largest
array of off beat characters this side of FREAKS. And they all have an
expression, and they all talk funny, and they all say the darndest things,
right down to the two young gals that were picking up a couple of extra
bucks for their movies and fun. Unfortunately, the information they  provide
to the chief is really useless, but the moment is a treat.
Making serious films is one thing. Making fun films is another. But making a
funny serious film, is yet another one, and Joel Coen, has done a very nice
job on this one, right from the start. But, darn, the whole thing is really
depressing. But funny.
There is no doubt that Frances McDormand is very good in this role as the
police chief, and probably well of her Oscar... I did not see all the other
winners. But this one was good, in a role that is very difficult to balance.
One inch that way, the film becomes a total satire, and the story loses it.
One inch the other way, the story becomes another murder mistery and the fun
part of the film becomes annoying and distracting to us, as it may have been
for the police chief. In the balance lies the great piece of work in this
film.
Nice film to see, although not exactly enjoyable. Not recommended to be seen
before bedtime, that's for sure...
4 GIBLOONS
Copyright (c) Pedro Sena 1997. All Rights Reserved.
Member of the Internet Movie Critics Association

Title
Review for Love and Music (1971)
It is interesting to watch a concert where the real stars are not the rock
bands, but the music itself.
And so is STAMPING GROUND, a gathering of music in Holland, which I believe
took place several years in a row, and featured some of the better known
bands of the time.  What makes this concert interesting is that it does not
stick with the 'hits' or the well known pieces of music by each band, and
several musicians discuss their bitterness  towards the business because it
is afraid of losing the money, when  most musicians are less afraid to play
anything they like.... Grace Slick goes so far as to even indict American
audiences for their sheep mentality. It makes you wonder why this film was
never really pushed in America, but did so well in Europe. Country Joe
McDonald explains that it is nice to go to a place where you can play
anything, and you're still appreciated, which is what the real sense of the
music is about -- in America some music impresarios would have castrated
him.
In keeping with that tone, we get to see a scorching opening set jam by
Santana, the kind we don't see anymore on any stage at
all, firing up an audience like it really should.  It sets the tone for the
quality of music in this film, although sadly enough, the age has hurt it a
little.  It would be nice to find this relic re-recorded onto a Video Disk,
and the music Remixed for superior quality.  The other various musicians
found are Al Stewart doing a solo performance, the late T-Rex ( Marc
Bolan ), Country Joe, Dr. John doing his funky kind of thing in those  days,
Canned Heat playing a couple of extended songs ( no hits this time says the
lead singer, and he proceeds to do an excellent blues song ), Family, a well
known European art rock band that produced many satisfying albums.  It's a
Beautiful Day, doing  a couple of sets, one of them a bombastic version of
I'M SO TIRED, whereupon the skies break with a dose of rain, and David
Laflamme continues pounding the violin.... and towards the end Pink Floyd
doing A SAUCERFULL OF SECRETS.
All in all, this film is very nice based strictly on the merits of the
feeling and intensity of the musics of the various musicians, who for once
sound like they really sounded on stage, rather than the glorified hit
making bands that they never were, specially the Jefferson Airplane, a band
known for its lack of discipline on stage, although they always manage to
blend the individualities
into good material.
I LIKE THIS FILM. IT DOESN'T HAVE THE EXPLOSIVENESS OF WOODSTOCK, BUT IT HAS
A SPECIAL MUSIC FEELING WHICH ALL MUSICIANS, and us all should appreciate
and love.

Title
Review for Impromptu (1991)
I like this film, despite a few people not thinking it is ( either ) good or
worth it.
And perhaps much of it is because I like to 'study' historical characters in
the field of the arts, compared to their artistic endeavors.
In this film, we can see a little of FRANZ LISZT, FREDERIC CHOPIN, GEORGE
SAND, and a few other artists which stuck together, as the scenes in Europe
tend to do.
Franz Liszt is a part of the 'high' society which has helped him become
famous for his talented ability to stand up to the already famous pianist
Chopin.  And as a member of that society which champions as patrons of  the
arts, he is also affected by the many women, in search of a match to set
them up for life.  The writer George Sand ( a woman ) happens to be on the
outside circles of this group, and does her writing in her own manner
despite herself, and manages to do alright, even competing with  the women
who are always in a position to outdo each other.  The game is fun as long
as no one steps on anyone's toes.  On a given evening, Sand discovers the
music of Chopin, and proceeds to write one of her books, which gets quoted
all around, but is hidden from Chopin by his lover since she doesn't want to
lose him.  The lover manages to use quotes from the book and keep the
composer's attention, until one day he happens to discover why it is that
this other woman is infatuated with him.  He
reads the book, and voila, a new relationship is born.
While there may not quite be a lot of truth, or guarantee that it is all
quite correct, there is a nice touch of the 'muse' which drives many artists
to create what they do, and in this area, the film is excellent.  This is a
film for both literature, and music lovers, for it treats both quite
importantly.  And as such, it also puts down the mistress system as a bit
corrupt on its own feet, and that even women are adapt at playing this game.
At the time, I presume that it was the thing to do, and was expected to be
done without second thought by any woman.  Whereas the English Restoration
lifestyle openly flaunted the 'cuckold' theory, here they are at least a bit
more modest, except when the lights are out.  The ladies even suggest
several times that they had had affairs with other men, in some orgies,
which has always been very well known enjoyment of the European upper crust.
Judy Davis as George Sand is very good, as is Julian Sands as Liszt.  And it
certainly is ten million miles from the Ken Russell treatment of the same
subject.  This is serious about the art, where Ken's is a bit more on the
unusual side, if not too extravagant.  All the ladies in this film have a
good time as the courtesans they are, and the film plods
along an incredible barrage of gossip and small events, which make it
difficult to follow at times.  It's difficult to realize that a subtle shot
of two women in the background chatting, will eventually come up as an
agreement to get something done.  But it all ties together well in the end.
A FILM FOR MUSIC ( AND LITERATURE ) LOVERS. Someone says to
DELACROIX....paint something 'dead' this time.... you have to know the
romantic artists for this film to make better sense.

Title
Review for Pred dozhdot (1994)
One of the five finalists for the Oscar for Best Foreign Film, this entry
from Macedonia does not wait to let its position and feelings known. This
film starts with powerful music and developments to get
directly into the meat of the story.
The film is told in three parts, and we find that the ending of the story is
in actuality the start of the first story.  However, the photographs in the
second and third stories are about the very first story.  So we end up with
what might be a cyclical story, but in essence is not.  The priests discuss
the continuity of the world and how things are cyclical.  And for these
people, and their families, the only cyclical thing is death, and senseless
killing.  The law in the hands of whoever feels he is in charge.
Macedonia has some intricate problems with the Albanians, and it is
something which has lasted several hundreds of years, and has never been
fixed.  On top of it, the Albanians do not have a homeland per se, because
their space is occupied by the Macedonians.  The usual religious
divisions are clear.  We have the Christian fashion and the Moslem fashion.
The indication in this film, is that the Moslem fashion is basically
uncivilized, and runs its own rules.  The Christian fashion
adheres to its own biblical stuff, taken from the BOOKS.  Which is the first
part of the story.  It is called WORDS. And it already depicts how the
chants and the words of the religious structure already are
failing in its desires and tasks.  They do not stand by the young man,
regardless of his culpability.  Fate brought the young girl to his room,
rather than another priest's.
The second story, exploits a photographer and his editor ( lover as well, it
seems ), and his desire to go home and get away from the wars.  He has just
been in Bosnia, where things are not exactly peaceful.  His editor and him
can not get it together, she is still married to an Englishman, and the
whole thing ends up in a tragic disaster for her.
And the third story, is the best.  The photographer comes home to his own
people.  But they are still caught up in the lawlessness of their own
country.  And while he means well, and to rescue the
daughter of the woman he would have married, were circumstances a bit
different ( she is a servant and second class citizen now ), he is now faced
with the same problem that we saw in the first story.
The family structure is meaningless, in light of the political decisions
that everyone has come to make and live by.
The brutal film then follows the young girl that has managed to save her
life, and we are back at the start.  Things are indeed cyclical.  But does
it really matter.? No.  No one learns their lesson.  The viciousness, even
between family members, has fostered for so many years that nothing seems to
be able to end it. The sad point, and the film kinda drops it quietly, when
Alexandr dies ( he has a smile on his face ), is that the best solution is
for all this thing to come to the saddest ending of all.
SHOULD SEE
4.5 of 5 GIBLOONS
Reviewed by Pedro Sena. Moderator of Ygdrasil's Film Newsgroup
Copyright (c) Pedro Sena 1995. All Rights Reserved.

Title
Review for Green Card (1990)
Typical Peter Weir film.  It tells you a story, and gives you an ending
which  is not satisfying, but forces you to make a decision as to what the
characters will or will not do.
I suppose in life, we all need to make those decisions, and more often than
not we do not.  So the director decides it in a certain direction, and we
are left with a decision of our own.  How would we have done it?
This is a film about immigration laws in America.  And how people think
about America.  For almost everyone through out this world, that does not
have the means to come to America, the chance and choice is more than one
can resist, and they will do almost anything to get it done.
Gerard Depardieu is a failed musician who wants to come to America.  Because
he
is rather well known in France, and he has been denied an entry visa before
due to a drug related past.  He buys a fake passport, and makes his way into
New York illegally.  There, the hounds take over.  It is big business, which
also has some connections to the Mafia ( the foreigners are signed to pay
the  Mafia their first two or three, or ONE month's pay if they find work,
or else.) and the only solution is for a marriage that will work.  Given the
language,  and cultural barriers, the chance of these marriages making it,
are nill, and  the Immigration Department attempts to nail as many of them
as they can.  Like the film, many stories are made, much cross reference is
done, and much acting is also studied, in order to keep the authorities at
bay.  But the
people who are usually involved in these situations are not often
intelligent enough, or  capable enough to do it.  After all they came to
America on a dream and a  prayer, and their lifetime savings.
Gerard's marriage is arranged to a nice girl, that really does not know what
she is getting into.  In all reality, she has a rather vacuous relationship
going with another guy, whom she has to get rid off in order to keep the
authorities off Gerard's back.  All's well, and so far so good, as she
begins discovering this guy.  He impresses an audience of upper class New
York'ers with his piano playing and a song ( the film never clarifies
whether he is actually a musician or not,  he lies so much and has to fess
up to the girl later ) that is weird, and could only be appreciated by a
snooty audience.  But it isn't enough.  He is messed up in his head.  He has
lived the life of  a libertine in Paris, and now, if he wants to stay, he
needs to give up his old ways in order to make it here.  He fails, not on
his libertine ways, but on his lack of concentration, another hint that this
is the reason why he is not a better musician, or better known as a
musician.
As he fails, one of his tests with the immigration officials, he is arrested
and then sent back to Paris.  And the girl, is left there.  Will she go to
Paris, now that she likes him, but has no idea of who he is, or where to
find him, or is the whole thing just another adolescent flash in the pan
relationship, where the girl is the loser.  She had gotten rid of her
previous boyfriend, and now she loses the one she was just learning to
appreciate. Given the unsatisfying conclusion, the answer lies in the
adolescent idea.
Depardieu, as the Frenchman, trying to make it to America is good, because
he can play himself, and we wouldn't know any better.  Andy MacDowall is,
however, very nice, and has a certain easiness through out that helps the
film along. It is a Peter Weir trademark to have a strong female lead role,
carry the story.  With the exception of only one of his films ( THE LAST
WAVE ) the women usually are the difference between the solution or the lack
of one.  In this story, she is young, and doesn't know herself well enough,
but she has the  intelligence to follow through and try to make things work,
only when she  finds herself finally, attracted to this stranger which has
been brought to
her life.
And by the way, she will not get paid the $2,000.00 dollars promised at the
start, because it didn't work out.
This type of situation is very common in all of the world's major cities,
and has been a gray area where many have been caught for the right reasons,
and  many have gotten away with it for the wrong reasons.  The solution is
to let people in with open arms.  The problem is that this is not really
feasible,  or viable in any way.  The logistics are too dangerous, and not
very good.

Title
Review for Supa no onna (1996)
Seen at the 21st Portland International Film Festival
    If you don't care how and what the food you buy goes through in your
local supermarket, then this film is not for you.... maybe it is better to
ignore it, as this strong and biting satire, as only Juzo Itami can deliver,
will give you an insight as to what some foods go through.
    Having, in the past, made films that pulled every punch imaginable, from
the family traditions ( THE FUNERAL ), to taxes ( A TAXING WOMAN & A TAXING
WOMAN RETURNS ), to the diabolical gangsters ( MINBO ), to hospitals ( THE
SERIOUSLY ILL ), Juzo Itami, this time takes on the supermarkets' own war,
to get the consumers. And while this film has its funny side, in the crazy
situations that it creates, it also shows another side, which is very much
the attitude of a corporate structure that is more concerned with its
profits than it is with any customer.
    Goro has a supermarket. And a competitor comes into the neighborhood,
trying to take him out of business by providing less expensive prices for
everything that is sold in the supermarket. Bargains Galore, its name, has
in mind the closure of Goro's humbler venue, so that in the end it can mark
up its prices in any way it can. Goro hires Hanako, a housewife whose
talents seem to be better suited to management, than they are in anything
else. Hanako, as she gets familiar with the operation, discovers many of the
tricks of the trade, done by many of the elders in charge of each section of
the market. And the procedures, are not always "fresh" food, but a new
packaging and a new date, to try and convince the customers that quality is
on the shelves.
    Hanako's ideas take hold, starting with a few of the women that work in
the supermarket, being that they do not even shop there at all. And Hanako
discovers along the way that a few giveaways here and there make a bit of a
difference. If not cause some serious problems in the running of the store.
A price error, forces them to give away Eggs for very low prices,  and
causes the store a few hassles, but, it brought the people in, and everyone
knows that these customers will buy a few other things.
    As the operation gets stronger, the competition also has trickery up its
sleeve, and it has been undermining much of the operation by paybacks to one
of the store managers, as well as the meat and fish elder supervisors.
Eventually these people are found out, and Hanako has to tread slowly and
carefully, until in the end they all have a showdown. And here, the truth
and honesty win out, and even one of the elders decides to stay rather than
go to work for the corrupt opponent. In the process, they also find that
"freshness" (with some very funny jokes on this word as well) becomes a much
more important tool than they imagined.
    With some very nice performances, in this hectic, and fast paced film,
this film gives us a sitting of two hours that is satisfying in many ways,
although a failed love story between Goro and Hanako does not come off much,
even though towards the end it is suggested. But this would take away from
the satire and its strengths.
    With food gags all over the place, the film lets you have it. And what
fun it is.
(Editorial)
The director of this film, Juzo Itami, died shortly after the film was
finished, and he left behind a legacy of comedy and satire that is rare, and
uncompromising. We would wish that he had been able to make one about film
making, of which he must have had a few stories to tell, but we will have to
do with much of the Japanese society, and its many errant ways.... not to
say that these things do not happen anywhere else.... America is no less
guilty of any of these subjects at all, should anyone have the guts to
tackle it... we could learn something along the way, too.... worth seeing,
specially, is A TAXING WOMAN and its follow up A TAXING WOMAN RETURNS. THE
FUNERAL is also good, although not as funny as the later films. TAMPOPO is
also very enjoyable. All four of these films are available in video, which
means your best local site for foreign film may have them... ask for it.
Reviewed by Pedro Sena.
Copyright (c) Pedro Sena 1998. All Rights Reserved.

Title
Review for Hu Du Men (1996)
Gosh, this film is about so many things at the same time that it is a wonder
that it comes around to an end, that is satisfying and helps define the film
is important and valuable.  If this sounds like too much, then the film is
full of stuff that is very enjoyable and truly nuts ... and one could hardly
expect for more in a film.
Story.... let's see, where do we start. It has to do with a Cantonese Opera
singer that has become a star. But for her to get there she has needed to
get various bits and pieces of help for her to be able to do her work. And
she plays men's roles in the opera.
In the middle of it all we find out that she has had to let go a child,
which her sister has raised, so she could concentrate on the stage. The
title is a word in Cantonese Opera that refers to the invisible line that
actors cross between real life and acting. And this film makes sure that it
does not mix the two for a moment, but towards the end, it is obvious to us,
not the opera's audience, that this line has been crossed, although it is
crossed in a nice way, rather than one that hurts a performance, or hurts
the personal life that each character has.
In between are the craziest of actors and people speaking at the same time,
and always on an edge.
We really do not find out very much about the characters, except the lead
one, and the past. Like there are hints that the real father of the child
that she has is actually an actor in the troupe who is now gay. And on top
of it all, the family situation at home is getting desperate.. the husband
is losing his business and the daughter is becoming very gay. For the
character of Lang Kim-sum this is not a problem, since she has been around
this stuff for years. But for her husband, this is a terrible
predicament.... until it all crumbles in the end for him, when he finally
becomes a nice man.
The really nice thing about this film is that it is hard and harsh and
heavy, but it is also a lot of fun. Lang Kim-sum has her share of problems,
but she always manages well ( with great expression a la J. Maguire ) to
sidestep the problem and come up with a solution. And if this mess is not
enough, the suitor to the girl that is being forced into her troupe happens
to be her son, which she can not tell him, or admit to anyone else. Only her
sister, who brought the boy up knows it.
Well, if you are into fun films that are crazy, really do not wish to be
saying very much on its own, then this film is for you. The film speaks
bundles, but it is all in the undertones, and in the style with which it is
handled. We know there are problems, but somehow things work out and "the
show goes on". This film follows that saying truthfully, and magnificently.
Excellent performance by Josephine Siao, as the lead, in what is really a
very difficult role to balance out without being melodramatic or trying to
be funny. She manages it excellently well.

Title
Review for Kleine Teun (1998)
(Seen at the 22nd Portland International Film Festival, in Portland, Oregon)
 If one takes aside the tragic ending, this is probably one of the best
directed films in this festival. and this is so, probably because the
director resolves with a film camera all the dilemmas that any actor would
have on a stage, the subtleties that the audience can not possibly keep
track of, and appreciate. In this alone, the film is magnificent. In acting,
let's just say that it would make for a rather exciting evening, with some
very funny moments in between, the doors in the film not withstanding.
 Never in film has anyone done so much, and so well, with doors, that could
easily make the early days of cinema look foolish and petty. The line
delivery is excellent around these set pieces, and rarely does one feel that
we are not on a stage, watching this drama unfold in its own eccentric, and
rather odd way.
 But as the film creates its dilemma, it also sets the stage for an ending
that, like comedy, is hard to finish. How does one finish this whole thing,
that started as a bit of a lark, and ends in a murder?
 The story centers around Keet and Brand, who by all looks, are married. And
have been for many years, which have become a strain on Keet. She has not
been able to have a baby, it seems, either to Brand's lack of attention, or
worse yet, they probably are not married and Brand is now showing little
attraction for her. This, I don't think that is ever made really clear. But
Keet badly wants a baby, and she is beginning to think that she can get it
anyway she can.
 As chance would have it, Brand is illiterate and has a hard time reading
the sub titles in many movies he watches on tv. Keet is tired of translating
things for him. She hires a tutor to help him learn to read and write. And
later we discover what her real plan was all along. What she didn't bargain
for, was that Brand and Lena would fall in love, and that Keet would be
pushed aside and forced to do the things she detests, like eating meat she
doesn't like, or think is not good food. Eventually, Brand and Lena have a
baby, and now the triangle is in serious trouble and the strain is getting
impossible. Keet has lost a husband she likes, and now has a baby that she
can look at, but she can not adore it like she would like, or a mother
would.
 And eventually the situation explodes, and the result is sad and
unforgiving, and basically ends the whole thing for all three of them.
Situation aside, this is a film that is very enjoyable, as its comic
situations and pacing is excellent and its camera design next to the actors'
work is indeed well thought out, specially when it comes to doors and
windows. One would think that a prop is not that important, but nothing
speaks more in this film than the doors. They are the one thing that
eventually define the end. But in between, one can not avoid laughing at the
way these things are used, or abused.
 A one man show, a director who is obviously well trained and particularly
sensitive to the actor's work on a stage, he knows how and when to fill
moments. One rarely gets the feeling that something is wasted, and this show
must have been superbly rehearsed, or the magnitude of the actors is way
above and beyond the usual that we find.
Good film, very enjoyable. Tragi-comedy at its best.

Title
Review for Feng yue (1996)
FILM TITLE:       TEMPTRESS MOON
DIRECTOR:         CHEN KAIGE
COUNTRY:          CHINA 1996
CINEMATOGRAPHY:   CHRISTOPHER DOYLE
MUSIC:            ZHAO JIPING
CAST:             Gong Li, Leslie Cheung, Kevin Lin Jianhua, Caifei He, 
Chang Shih, Liankun Lin, Ziangting Ge, Xian Xie, David Wu, Jie Zhou, WYemang
Zhou, Lei Ren, YIng Wang, Kevin Lin.
SUPER FEATURES:   The design of the film, and story.
 TEMPTRESS MOON, has its good points and bad points.
It is not, on par with previous Chen Kaige films, in that fundamental
directing choices regarding this film. Like his close friend and director,
Zhang Yimou, Kaige has always been a bit too symmetrical of a film maker, in
the sense that the scenes are framed a bit rigidly with the camera, and then
shot. TEMPTRESS MOON, shows that some directors in China are seeing other
films and that they are getting influenced by them. Chen Kaige made a
directorial choice in this film of shooting the whole thing on a steady cam
( by hand ) rather than sitting the camera down every now and then.
It helps, and then it doesn't. When it is challenging to a particular
character's wish or desire, it works. When it is looking at the staid,
boring, and basically dead old monuments of the Pang family, the elders, it
does not work.
It has been said that the success in film, is made because of its ability to
make the camera invisible. And although the idea is ok, in this film it was
not, totally well defined, or designed. The characters know where the camera
is, and are obviously playing to it, which is a bit boring after the first
few times. By comparison, Wong Kar-wai shoots his whole films by hand, and
one never really notices that the camera is obtrusive, although it does have
a breathtaking pace, and a dizzying movement all the time. Kaige's choice,
was to move when he had to, and to stop, when his three main characters were
at a catharsis, which may have been the best time for him to keep it moving
anyway, so one could notice the character scream "in vain" ( so to speak ) ,
thus making each character's plight that much more important... no one is
listening, or paying attention, would be a point, then.
But, if the camera is the main instrument in this film, perhaps, then, we
have to let go of something, and that may just be the story... in almost all
the films where the camera is "free", the story takes second place, and in
fact, is really less important than the point of view that is offered, the
veritable stream of consciousness of the extra person that is participating
in the "film", the fourth wall visitor/audience/us person. In this film,
Kaige never lets go of the story, and tries to enhance it with the close
ups. so we end up with a very emotional, strong, and to this reviewer,
confusing film, where the style seems to be getting in the way of the whole
thing. I might have offered that the youngsters be shot with the moving
camera and that the elders with a totally stationary camera, thus adding a
statement to the "old" style, versus the "new" style, but perhaps this was
already "passe" by the time that Chen Kaige did this film.
Thus, this film comes off as an experiment, but not altogether a bad one.
For one thing, it breaks out the acting, which in these films tend to be a
bit "formal" by western standards..... in other words, this comes off as a
sort of Peter Brook West End performance, probably blazing a trail for the
future of character and theme development. Generally, when this happens, the
"whole" tends to disappear in the past examples, in favor of the "moment".
In this case, the moment makes a statement, but it is not winning the
battles, or the war. It may be a start, however.
With some excellent performances by all parties, Gong Li, may not
necessarily be the strongest performer of all of them, her physical/sexual
moments are weak and terribly self conscious, but nevertheless, she still
manages to bring about a strong personage.
It is the story of the Pang family, whose power and strength has been
dwindling in the past years ( story starts in 1911 ) and eventually falls
apart. It's heirs, are young, and two of them are enjoying the comforts of
being rich, by smoking opium. Their relationship is confused, because of the
demands that are placed on them. And one day, Ruyi, becomes the leader of
the family, and this is a major problem for all the elders, the males, who
are afraid that a woman will ruin the family. And the situation creates an
interesting triangle, for the three children that were friends, that are now
adults, but are, essentially, fighting among themselves for control of the
family and its influence.
What is most obvious, is that the family is trapped inside their quarters,
and are totally out of touch with the world, another cross over chance where
the camera work themes could have been better exploited, since the patterns
of life outside the brick walls are decidedly faster, and changeable than
within the walls.
All in all, visually, this film is very pretty, although the color design of
the film does not get much of a chance to shine, with the camera so intent
on staying on the actors, in an attempt to make their plights stronger. In
doing one thing, I suppose that one sacrifices another. In this case, I
think the film decision was made to do the whole shoot on hand, rather than
study its potential and possibilities.
Not a great film, but a very good one. Different by Chinese standards, and a
bit more "physical/sexual than previous films. Still, it is self conscious
in this department, but that may have more to do with their ability to get
past sensors in China with their state run film industry, than it does with
the director himself. But ultimately, the way to represent this falls on the
director's shoulders.
A good film, not a great one. A changing of ways for Chinese film making,
and a sign that shooting styles will begin to vary out of China, which is
good. Honk Kong influence is very obvious.

Title
Review for Historie milosne (1997)
Seen at the 21st Portland International Film Festival
    While this film states right off the bat that it is dedicated to
Kryysztof Kieslowski, it really is a tribute to itself, that it really owes
a little less to that director than it does to someone like Luis Bunuel,
whose montages in his later films created some rather interesting situations
and stories. And the ending, is what really gives it away, with a rather
enjoyable En Angel Exterminador styled twist ... another victim coming for
more.
    There are four stories in this one, and they take place simultaneously,
and feature, for the most part, the same actors, all roles played by actors
that had graced the late Kieslowski's films. And the main character, played
by the director himself, is the drive in all four stories, and the joke in
the end as well.
    One story, deals with a professor, who gets flattered by a young
student, when she writes in the test that she is taking that she loves him.
He is embarrassed, but nevertheless has to discuss this with her. The
situation is a bit embarrasing for him. Another story, deals with a
commander who is assigned to a role in the army, for which he is to have his
wife with him...... he doesn't have a wife. The third one, is an odd one,
where he is a criminal, who is in love with a particular woman, who betrays
him... for which he gets even with her beautifully, by getting her time as
well, right next to him. And the most important story, is the fourth one,
dealing with a priest. This provides the film with its strongest content, an
d most enduring story. There is nothing funny about this fourth one, but the
"love" is resolved, in a fashion that states in many ways, where some
institutions are failing people in not only that country and in many other
parts of the world. The man is a priest, and he discovers eleven years
later, that he has a daughter. His resolution, and his ability to discover
himself and do the right thing, is the one thing that stands out as
phenomenal, and makes this a special film.
    And there are very funny moments in the story.. all four protagonists do
some time with an older man, who records all the events, and he questions
each man, about his love for the woman that the story is about... and this
would have done Luis Bunuel proud. After having used two actresses playing
the same role in "That Obscure Object of Desire", he went on to tackle even
further the weirdness that we sometimes stand for, and our petty resolutions
regarding our loves and our lives... this is the main theme in the film.
    In all cases, the situations come to the light, in the most unusual of
situations. The teacher that finds himself in a rather precarious situation,
eventually finds himself trapped and has to let the girl fall apart on her
own, and therefore get thrown out of the school. But he maintained a
reasonable sense of decorum and character, as he did not abuse the
situation, although he almost did once, and the second time he was
inadvertently interrupted, which was just as well, for it was clear this was
a dead end for him. In his interrogation, he states pretty much that. The
army story is funnier, in that there is a past lover that he is attracted
to, but they do not seem to connect... it appears that there are a few
things that slow it all down.. she is Russian, and does not have a visa, and
that is a ticklish situation in those parts of the world where people try to
find quick marriages in order to get out of the countries they were in. And
this affair comes apart further at the seems by an sad lack of understanding
and communication. She has a job offer, which would have allowed her to stay
and thus give their relationship a chance... he quits on it, before the
offer comes through. This story ends in a dead end hallway, like the
professor's did. The third one, is the funniest of all of them, and there is
a real love affair, but the lover girl left for a while because he was in
jail. But she's back, since her fling did not last. And in the process finds
out that he has money stashed away, and she gets it, and immediately goes
out of the country... oooppppss, bad deal. Now he gets more jail time
 stolen money ), and she is found in court, where he decides that he will
take the rap, and she says out loud that she loves him... and we know that
she will get jail time, but at least she can not get away with another guy,
is his joke this time.
    And the best story, is the one about the priest. An 11 year old girl
comes to a church and tells the priest/confessor that she is his daughter.
And she ahs all the facts straight. He admits to himself that it did happen,
and the young girl ends up back in the orphanage, where she revolts with a
vengeance, and finds a way out so she can go see her father again. In the
meantime, the pries is having his battles inside his head about the whole
thing. And it is his final decision that makes this film stand out, and
makes the ending so special.
    If anything, it is Jerzy Stuhr that stands out in this fine and very
enjoyable film, as the excellent actor that he is. Playing four roles with
different attributes is hard enough, but they are all in the same "body"
only, and this is hard enough to do, and only the likes of Peter Sellers
ever really did it well enough to be remembered for it.
    If this film is a tribute to Kieslowski, there is one thing missing in
it. The music of Zgbiniew Preisner, but this is handled very well by Adam
Nowak, in a similar style and mood. There seems to be a different style of
music, and each vignette sees to point to one film or another and the music
seems to be the giveaway.
    A very enjoyable film, with a lot of funny bits and pieces... but it
really is more of a tribute to Luis Bunuel, than otherwise. But it is done
by the family that Kieslowski created, with his themes of love, that were
often ruined by some event or another, some of these just plain bad timing.
But the love is always there, even if it does not happen, and drives the
film.

Title
Review for King Lear (1987)
It is really nice to see another Godard film, and one that shows that he has
not lost one iota of his irreverence, and ability to create pieces of film
making that are exciting, weird, unpredictable, unrehearsed, free of boring
technical expertise, free of slick and pretentious shooting styles, and
above all, with pure thought at work.
AAAAAAaaaaahhhhhhhhhh, true Godard.
This film may have something to do with Shakespeare's King Lear, but to the
common and unknown audience, it might just as well not have any connection
at all to anything ( NO THING ) except a mad man, and possible genius, named
Jean Luc Godard.  As with much of his work, this is ( to my eyes and ears )
true surrealism in search of a reality through images in film, and the
script  just happens to be a loose form and interpretation of King Lear.
Maybe  aesthetically and intellectually it might have something to do with
that play, but I don't care.  It's Godard, and it's more fun than
Shakespeare.
There are several things which are pure Godard, and go back at least thirty
years, when he was turning the film world upside down with his ANTI-FILM
films that left a lot of people wondering what the heck was going on.  Much
like  another weirdo out of Italy, Godard became an enigma unto himself, and
started getting laughed at.  Indeed, films like HAIL MARY, are nice and
interesting but they don't hold anything next to TWO OR THREE THINGS I KNOW
ABOUT HER, ALPHAVILLE, MASCULIN FEMININ, LA CHINOISE, WEEK-END, ONE PLUS
ONE, that really left a lot of people wondering what he was about.
The greed in the film business during the 70's and 80's hurt the true
artistic creative geniuses of the previous decade, and even, Francois
Truffaut undertook to do some acting to support his habit of making such
simple and inexpensive films, which even a major studio didn't want to help
him with.  And the oddballs, like Godard, were left behind, despite having
made many people rich during the sixties.
But Godard, wasn't forgotten.  And he has many friends, and they all want to
be a part of his work, in any form, or shape.
Lo and Behold, when fools, madmen, geniuses and the like get together, one
would figure to have something.  I don't think it is going to be a critical
success in any form, but it is going to leave a lot of critics who only see
shtick and crap wondering what hit them.   It is easy to think that this
film  is about something or other.  Actually it is just GODARD mere and
simple, and stronger than ever, defying the conventions of film making, into
creating something which can stand up on its own, and though based loosely
on the famous play, it really does well, as a piece of experimental film, if
not
a really experimental presentation, or attempt to anyway, of Shakespeare's
play.
With Norman Mailer as the writer, and Molly Ringwald ( she sure has a knack
for appearing in the unusual ones, like Paul Mazursky's version of the
TEMPEST ) as Cordelia, this film plods along in vignettes with small
sub-titles, and two THE END sequences that continue with conversation over a
blank screen, as if we ourselves did not do that.
In between, the soundtrack has a life of its own, it starts and stops
whenever it feels like, or so it seems, and the characters thinking is done
out loud to let us understand something which is actually complex, and not
fun.  We are a dichotomous people.  We say different things from what we
feel and wish to say.
TRUE, TRUE, GODARD.  He never left us at all....
a must see for true avid film go'ers who appreciate the oddest things!!!!!
IF YOU DON'T KNOW GODARD, THIS IS A GOOD ONE TO START ON.

Title
Review for Drowning by Numbers (1988)
I have vowed several times I would never see another Peter Greenaway film.
And several times, I have fallen prey to his films.
DROWNING BY NUMBERS is a very hypnotic film in that you don't really know
what is going to happen, but you get the feeling that the women will all
win, and get all the men done away with.
This is BLACK COMEDY at its best, much like any of Peter Greenaway's films,
which have a tendency to appear very philosophical and intelectual, though
in actuality, they are just fun, and weird.
The three women are representatives of three generations.  The matriarc of
the bunch ( Joan Plowright ) does what she says, and the film starts by her
drowning her drunken husband who is having an affair with the maid.  And
soon, the daughter has also drowned her husband, and later the young girl
also drowns her lover, because he isn't man enough.
The premise of the film might just be that men, in general, abuse, and do
not care for women.  They like women when it is in their best interest, but
at any other time, the women are secondary, and relegated to the roles of
maid and matron.  And in this film, they take charge and play juror, judge
and executioner.
While this film could be considered threatening to the male ego, it really
is also an attack on the female ego, and the lack of communication both
sexes have almost at all times.  They use each other for their own means,
ways and ideas, and when they are finished, they are discarded.  Men are
notorious for doing that to the fairer sex.  Well, that's not to say that
the women don't do the same.  In the film, both younger women do allow
themselves to be loved by the male counterpart, but they are not all that
happy with the  loving, which is undoubtedly the underlying cause.  When
there are subjects
and servants, there is disdain.

Title
Review for Hong gao liang (1987)
RED SORGHUM is not the kind of film that you want to advise your kids to
go see.  Much like Zhang Yimou's other films, this one is beautifully put
together, but when it is time to make it hurt, it does just so.
Politically, it appears evident that this story is as much about the Chinese
revolutions and changes as it is about the Japanese invasions.  And the ones
that suffer are the workers, who are always prey to the events, regardless
of the government.
Red Sorghum is the story of a woman that is married into a higher circle,
and inherits a large wine making facility with it.  And when she is there
she begins taking charge of the factory and its good quality of wine.
However, the changes have caused the wine quality to suffer, be it from the
weather, or just plain bad
work, since the wine master was changed.
In comes a worker that is attracted to the new mistress.  And he is as
reckless as he is in love with the mistress.  But he is not a rich man, and
has no property, and while he has been  able to get to the mistress, his
ability to keep her and stay with her are a problem.... that destroys a crop
of wine... so it seems.
And later, come the Japanese, who destroy the whole farm, and everything
else along the way.  And this family is now forced  to run and survive in
any way that it can.  With the invasion came the destruction of the main
source of income for the area.  The feudal lord system has won again.  And
the weak ones, the poor people are the ones that pay the price, although a
few of the well to do ones are also punished and killed.
Zhang Yimou's film, is not pleasant in many ways, and it does get a bit
gross here and there.  But, for sure, it lays the blame down, either on the
early government or the invading Japanese, but rarely on the individuals
whose lives are manipulated every day.
And the love story, of the seemingly impossible conquest is what glues the
whole thing together.  It is a wonderful film, though brutal in parts, and
really exciting in others.  The photography, which seems to be Zhang Yimou's
mainstay is plainly the real winner here.  Be it in the factory, or in the
fields, the show is tremendous.
And Gong Li is very good.  As are the supporting characters.

Title
Review for Fish Called Wanda, A (1988)
If John Cleese is not a very good actor, at least he is a very good writer.
And together with the director, they came up with a very cute script, that
runs along very well, and is perfect for Cleese, who does not have to
overplay his part, and neither does he have to play the type he is so well
used to in FAWLTY TOWERS, and the famous MONTY PYTHON skits.  This is a well
scripted and thought out story, which has confined the advantages of each
actor into a nice little film.  While far from great, it still is nice to
sit through, and does have some funny moments, almost all of them centered
on John Cleese, who seems to be specially suited to playing eccentric
characters, the most difficult style of comedic roles.
The story is a bit on the weird side... two thieves, Jamie Lee Curtis (she
looks great) and Kevin Kline are attempting to get to some more valuables
and they will get involved with
just about anyone to get it done.  She ends up getting interested in John
Cleese for the wrong reasons, and has to play the role  of a lover, much to
the chagrin of her real lover (Kline).
In between, John Cleese gets his marriage turned upside down (it wasn't
worth it anyway !!), and becomes interested in the woman thief, whom he does
not suspect of any foul behavior.
A bit of a mess, but a perfect situation to set up gags for John Cleese to
get caught in, and display his incredible ability to hold it under the most
unusual circumstances.  I think he suffers from the Peter Sellers complex
that he must not crack up, no matter how difficult, and weird, the situation
can be.  He holds his own.

Title
Review for Geronimo (1993) (TV)
The sad part of this film, like most of those about the native Americans in
this country, is that they look so hopeless, and their fervor for life gets
taken out of them.  Few of them accept that they still have their spirit,
even if they are finally the caged beasts.  At least they didn't suffer as
many indignities as the blacks did for many years before, and
during, that time.
Geronimo, is well known in the schools of military strategy, because he was
able to escape for fifteen years, despite being chased by two armies for a
long period of time.  And it took, what might be considered a small act of
treason to bring him in, on his own terms, which were fake, and non
existent.
The complicated story of Geronimo starts when the American cavalry was
trying to place many of the native populations in areas, which were to be
called reservations ( and still are ), just to separate them from the white
man settler, and imperial owner.  The army's job is to uphold  the
government of the white man, for the white man, not for the native who is
considered the abuser, and the outlaw, and in the case of this
Geronimo, a rebel in every sense.
Despite the ruthlessness of the upper brass at the military, there are some
individuals that retained a certain amount of dignity and human decency, who
didn't take the chase of the natives as a victory for mankind.  And in due
time they are ( Gene Hackman in a fine role ) retired for people who 'can
get the job done' .  And now the full  army is after Geronimo, who may be at
any time either in Mexico, or in Arizona somewhere.  Eventually, the army
fails in its chase, and has to resort to the means which were used before to
meet Geronimo, which was a guide who had spiritual tendencies, and had
enough care for the life of a native, as a human.  Jason Patrick sets out
one final
time to tell Geronimo of the deal which the army has in mind, much to the
chagrin of the general who is embarrassed that several thousand men can not
find a warrior, but one man can.
The film is well written, albeit very much in a film fashion, rather than a
'natural' story, still from the point of view of the white man, rather than
the native warrior.  We get glimpses into the mind and spirit of the native
Geronimo, and his people, but they are mere flashes in the pan.  One could
spend much more time, EASILY, describing how
Geronimo, a true medicine man, could keep away from danger, or the army....
he used his trade and tools of the spirit.  The army only used ideas.  It
isn't the same thing.
The tiring part of the film is not the story, which is very good, or the
acting which is nice, and contrasting in styles. It is the brown tone of the
film, reminiscent of the old photographs whose fixer has faded and has
turned the picture yellow ( the bleach fix is red, and it turns yellow when
weak ), and the film does almost all of its work in this
tone, even using the famous photographs taken of Geronimo and the army as a
backdrop to its own scenery.
While this may be 'old' thinking on our part, or a distant 'memory' the film
is just that.  Probably the part which the native American is not very proud
of anyway.  To their credit, much of the native language is used, and not
sub titled.
It is a nice film, though a bit brutal in parts.

Title
Review for Abismos de pasión (1954)
I have always thought that this film was much more of a statement about the
over rated films that the Hollywood and English factories were making at the
time, but in all cases, were sacrificing the stories for the romantic and
film appeal. Luis Bunuel, although obviously appreciating the famous Emily
Bronte novel, however, also saw it as another chance for him to work on one
of his favorite themes... contradictions, and love/hate relationships. He
had several of those in his Mexican exile, and although
disguised as comedies, they never got the attention of very many other
countries and film reviewers, because Hollywood, and the richer factories
controlled the market.
ABISMOS DE PASSION, badly titled for English release as "Wuthering Heights",
is exactly what its title discusses... an abyss for passions, and in this
case totaly misguided and obsessive passions, in all directions. Of course,
the original novel did have some terrible dysfunctional bits and pieces. But
this film has nightmares for disfunctions. And that aside, the story is
pretty much the same, with the same conclusion -- well sort of.
And the ill fated love story that can never happen, comes about. Catalina
marries for property and money, not for love. Her husband is a bit of a
nothing. Her husband's younger sister, is impulsive and not altogether in
one piece, and to get even with her brother decides that she also wants a
piece of Alejandro, which makes things even more complicated.
And when he comes back to take the neighboring farm from his own brother, a
drunkard, just so he can be nearer Catalina, the die is cast for what is
obviously going to be an emotional nightmare.
And like Hollywood, and the English versions of this film, it does things
with a massive flair.... loud music, long shots, romantic scenes, and in
between the total mayhem. I tend to think that this was Luis Bunuel's
statement that he could also make a shitty Hollywood film, for the "public",
which he always thought was a ridiculous concept anyway. And in these
moments, one can find almost copies of many moments taken from the Olivier
film ( with Merle Oberon -- the worst Catherine of all time, although the
prettiest ), and so many other romantic films. Spain can also do this, might
have been the real story, not just Hollywood.
The film starts by saying that it is a faithful adaptation of the Emily
Bronte novel, and it really is in many ways, despite its obviously pointed
changes to aid the flow and complications in the film. Were it not the
famous Bronte novel, this one might have been the better of the stories, as
it has more elements of tragedy and chaos that the other story. The novel is
more concerned with the ill fated love affair. This story is more concerned
with everyone else involved in the whole thing, not just the two ill fated
lovers. At stake are the younger sister who marries Alejandro to get even
with her brother, and Alejandro's drunken brother, who spends his time
beating up his own son... the dysfunctionality is totaly visible, whereas in
the novel it is hidden in the English "society" of the day... makes the
lovers feel like "victims". IN this version, they are not victims, in that
they create their own hell, because of their impulsive and obsessive
natures.
All in all, the acting in this film is actually very good. The film creates
some serious acting moments that are indeed difficult at any stage, and
these tend to force actors to get tight and better. And here they are
better. They are not showy and lit for romantic appeal.... they just are,
like you and I might be. In this sense alone, this film is far superior to
the better known Olivier vehicle. I suppose that a modern film maker would
make a film interpretation that Heathcliff either has aids, or is gay.... a
modern twist.
Intellectually, this is a very nice film. For audiences searching for a
Hollywood excitement film, this is trash of the Ed Wood variety. Sadly so.
It's just a shame that this film, and Bunuel's own Robinson Crusoe are not
given a better look. Both of these films stand out, not because of the
usually surrealistic nature of this film maker, but in this case, because of
his ability to create excellent stories and tie them up in a literary way,
that even Emily Bronte could not.
Very good film, although it shows some age. Could use some restoring to save
it along with so many other films by this master.
Reviewed by Pedro Sena. Moderator of Centipede's THE FILM.
Copyright (c) Pedro Sena 1997. All Rights Reserved.

Title
Review for Love & Human Remains (1993)
"Showdown at Boot Hill" presents Charles Bronson doing what he does best: 
kicking ass.  Ever since I first became aware of Bronson, through the
"Death Wish" series, I'm always on the look-out for his films.  He has a
great screen presence, and you're always rooting for him.
In "Showdown at Boot Hill", Bronson plays a bounty hunter in the old West
who shows up at a small town to pick up a criminal.  The criminal refuses
to go, and draws his gun.  Of course, this being a Bronson movie, ol'
Chuck shoots him dead.  The only problem is this particular criminal had a
lot of friends, and nobody will admit it was actually him, thus preventing
Bronson from collecting his bounty.  So, he hangs around the town, waiting
for someone to come forward, while falling in love with the local spinster
in the process.
While there's nothing terribly original about the story, the Bronson's
performance more than makes up for it.  He plays a man who knows that he's
doing the right thing, but also knows that people around him mistrust his
motives.  Bounty hunters were not thought too highly of back then, but
somebody had to do it, I suppose.  
>From the instant he comes on screen, the audience is always on Bronson's
side.  We want him to succeed in his "mission", as it were, and we also
want him to find love with the lonely waitress at the local bar.  That's
what makes Bronson one of the true icons of American cinema.  He has that
rare quality that allows him to appear tough when he needs to, but also
sensitive around his friends and lovers.
Like Clint Eastwood, he's a true "man's man".  I only hope that he has not
given up on acting.  It would be a real shame if this legend were to die
without having won an Oscar.

Title
Review for Canción de cuna (1994)
If the intent of this film maker is to make someone cry, anyone in the
audience, I would like to tell him that he succeeded.
But it isn't the fact that the film is that good that makes you cry, as much
as it is the fact that the story is so well told, and put together, that it
becomes irresistible, and the film, unlike many, maintains its impartiality,
just to allow us to feel the emotions around us, instead of giving us a
detail which sucks us in.  In this case, this may have been intentional,
since the culprits are nuns.  In other words, the film is trying to make
sure that the nuns also learn a lesson, one that has less to do with God per
se, but
much more to do with humanity.... and what a vehicle this is....
This story, is well known in the Spanish language, taken from a playwright
at the turn of the century.  And it has been turned into film by a veteran
who has won an Oscar, but had retired from the film community because it had
become fickle and not creative in his eyes.  As the director says, in the
liner's notes... "Despite the habits of today's film audiences, schooled on
disaster, violence
and hate, I wanted to create a moment of sensitive quiet... make a film that
would bring even today's cynical audience a feeling of happy tears," When
the only Spanish films that we hear about and see are Almodovar, it is easy
to see that this man has a point and a half..
The question is, what is it that made us cry. The story? The acting, which
is so tight and sturdy.? Or the quiet, unobtrusive, shooting style, that
allows us to see a full person, going through their own catharsis.? Or is it
all of the above.?
Unlike many films, which tend to cut into a tighter detail of faces, when
the stuff gets more emotional, a trick that gets us more involved in one
character, this film tends to avoid this, as we would have to
get involved with too many people, and our attentions would get divided. So
it "averages" things out. We never get to see more tears on one than we do
on the other, and we get to see full faces almost all the time.  and with
the background and others visible, the story becomes slightly less personal,
and a bit more universal, or in this case, more communal.
This is the story of a convent that is going about its business, until one
day, someone leaves a child at their doorstep. After some debate, the mother
superior finally agrees to take on the child. And the
debate is fierce, and only comes alive after the regular doctor is summoned
to check the child.  The doctor, adds his two cents worth and finally
convinces them that they should do it, not for God's sakes
but for humanity's sakes.... is it the child's fault, asks he.?
And eighteen years later, the nuns have to deal with the fact that the young
girl has grown up, has met someone, and is going to marry him.  And this is
when the film begins to really shine.  The convent
can not force its ways onto the child, and the young girl, despite only
knowing one set of parents, all the nuns, does have her mind set on going.
Eventually she does, but not before a stirring ending sequence, that will
undoubtedly be remembered as one of the nicest, softest, and pretties things
ever filmed.  It takes courage to direct and film it in this style, stark,
"naked", in front of the camera, which is not moving like they are not -- a
sort of standing their ground --, and in the process generate a lot of
emotional upheaval.  The nuns are sad that they are losing a daughter whom
they have come to love.  And the doctor, another story altogether, is losing
the sight of another nun, whom he loved, and cared about so specially.  His
age, finally shows up, and it almost looks like it is his last time here.
In between, are several things, which make the film special. The doctor is
the only man in the film, the young man in the end aside as much of a
non-character, and he has to survive not only visiting the nuns, but
withstanding their assault on his reason. But a nice, mother superior whom
he understands well, and likes him, helps the situation. They have a love
between them that is hard to let go, and the film uses their exchanges of
looks as the signal. And there are a few lines that magnify those moments.
It is the look of the moment that makes it so special... and likewise we get
this in the ending.
With outstanding performances, in difficult extremely contained roles, this
excellent film just moves along.  Never really boring, but turning at each
corner, quietly, softly... and then making  us miss it all in the end. And
we get caught in the avalanche of  tears.
It is a very happy film, by all means, but just differently so. It's just a
shame that something like this does not get shown a little more so people
could see what acting of the superior kind can really do. This is a
masterful film, by someone who obviously knows what he is doing. It's just a
shame that few will notice that.

Title
Review for Söndagsbarn (1992)
The sad thing about this film, for Americans, is that it is slow.  It is a
film, like Daniel's father Ingmar, that is given to detail, and the
minute nuances that are still taught at many acting schools.  It is an
outstanding film, probably a bit more "open" than the father's pictures,
which tend to be mired in the emotional upheaval of the characters. Unlike
his father, Daniel stands back, and allows them to look sheepish, and at
times selfish, until the realization hits them, that while they meant well,
they did not do very well.
This is a story, written by Ingmar Bergman himself, about his own growing up
in a religious family, whose motives were not questioned, and whose desires
were very idealistic.  Pu, has an admiration for his father, but it isn't
very clear weather it is because of the rather stern exterior and belief
system, or if it is because the father is right.  The father is not always
right, and as Pu gets older, and now famous, facing his father, the elder
Bergman is having problems coming to grips with his own idealism.  Ingmar
(Pu), has been expressing all of his idealism on film and studying it.  The
father has taken it all in, and is now suffering some terrible delusions,
most of them from feeling like he failed as a father, since the mother asked
for a divorce and left.
The great thing about this, is to watch, in the end, Ingmar's own stern
conduct, in dealing with his father, just when he has reached
a level of fame in the world cinema.  The father has not succeeded, or if he
did he does not feel this way.  And Ingmar is not interested in wallowing in
the garbage, as is not Daniel, in doing this film. It is a bit brutal, in
many ways, but it does force a sort of
therapy on the old man, that is working, however slowly.
Daniel Bergman is showing that he is also a fabulous director, like his own
dad, whose legacy is without question one of the great
accomplishments in the history of film.  Daniel, unlike his father, has the
ability of allowing the camera to move a little more than
his own father, thus making the film a little more bearable for an audience
that is used to fast paced films... but it is STILL painfully
slow, and difficult to appreciate, unless we make a commitment to do so.
Like Sven Nykvist, with Ingmar so many times, Tony Forsberg comes off as a
visual dynamo that makes this film alive.  It is visually striking, and
colorful.  It helps the film live.  With Sven's "quiet" camera, this film
would have been exactly like the father's material ... stoic, but effective.
With excellent acting, and a very well written script, covering some thirty
to forty years, this film can only signify that the younger
Bergman is on the way to try and outdo his own father.  And it helps to have
the father provide a script of his own experience
to help lead the way... similar to the story, isn't it...???
I suppose that the funny thing was to see an actor playing the older Bergman
confronting his own father in 1968.... I think it would have been a bit
"selfish" not to, but it would have added another dimension to the film.....
the Bergman's of today are involved
in a religious offering called film.... the Bergman's of yesterday were
involved in the good book.... and there is a difference in
the end... you must see the film to catch it.

Title
Review for Muriel's Wedding (1994)
Copyright (c) Pedro Sena 1996. All Rights Reserved.
It is hard to say that this is a bad film, as the story is so nice, and so
well done.  And it gets your attention as it is moving along.
This is the story of Muriel, who has finally gotten done with  high school
and is now the loser in all the battles with the other girls for attention.
She just isn't that good looking, and carries a few extra pounds that cause
her to be laughed at.  But this does not deter her abilities and her desire.
To grow up, or force it upon herself, she has to create a bit of a lie, and
an opportunity to do just so allows her to get out of town and move to the
city, where she can give herself a chance to grow.
As time goes by, she makes a friend or two, and learns to relate a little.
She has also incurred a large expenditure of dad's money so she could leave
town and start her new life. This she intends to pay, but this expenditure
causes a  terrible flap in her parent's life. The father is accused of
swindling the money, and it pretty much breaks his political career, which
is shady at best in any case. But it makes the family situation with the
other brothers and sisters even worse.
But things are improving for Muriel. Her new life is getting better, and she
gets into an arranged marriage, which is actually a nice setup for her, and
an advantage for her new husband.  He is a foreigner that has defected from
an oppressive country, and he has the ability to make it to the Olympics,
and his marrying an Australian girl allows him to fulfill that dream, and
give the country a chance at a medal.
While things get tough, and this marriage seems doomed to fail, the eventual
honesty, and Muriel's desire to get a fresh start, finally pay off... and so
does this film.
Much seems to be expected and desired from this film, but in its own way it
surprises. It's never pretentious, and it does  not overstep its abilities.
It is well written and it is designed well, so that its characters make the
best of it.
A very well directed film. It deserves better attention, than it has
received, and really... this film deserves a look.
There is so much other bad crap out there, and this film is not one of them.

Title
Review for Breaking the Waves (1996)
    The only thing that seems to work against this film, is that it has no
positive values, as it were, and therefore, no hope, in many ways, specially
for the character/person, who makes this film go. But if one can, put aside
that value judgement, this film has one performance that is absolutely
excellent, and well deserving of its accolades. Not many people can stand
out so much, anywhere at all.
    This is the story of Bess, who marries outside of her family and
village, to an oil derrick worker. She is, very aloof, does crazy things,
and in her spare time has conversations with God, with whom she seems to
have a reasonable rapport.... except that this is mixed to the point that it
makes her feel guilty, and responsible for the chain of events that change
her life.
    Her marriage seems fine, and as might be customary, she misses her
husband. In one of her prayers/conversations with God, she asks that he come
home. But he comes home injured, and ends up paralyzed. This adds some
strain to their marriage, and jan decided that Bess should have affairs and
then tell him about it, as a way for him to enjoy something while in pain
and paralyzed. Bess is at odds with the whole thing, and starts out with a
lie, which of course, Jan sees through anyway. And in her second attempt,
she decided to give herself away to the first person that crosses her path.
    This progresses, as is expected, and Jan is not getting better. he has,
however, met another nurse, who seems to be more helpful. The nurse quickly
sees the predicament that they are both in, and the story changes. Bess
makes another mistake and joins a band of foreign shipmen, whose attitudes
towards women and sex seem to be more sadistic than otherwise, and this
brings about her total demise. The new nurse has called Jan's bluff, and his
healing and desire to live has finally improved, and in the end we catch
Bess getting a burial, at their hands, after the elders had condemned her,
and decided that she could not have a decent burial at all.
    Startling as it may be the greatest thing in this film is watching Emily
Watson do her Bess thing all the way through. From the innocent little girl
having her talks to God, to her eventual reckless abandon, in giving herself
away, to prove that she loves her husband, which is something that he has
requested in the first place. In between is a massive acting job, the likes
of which is rarely found.
    For the most part, this film is done with a camera in hand, as if it had
Bess' point of view as the most important part of its story. Around her, the
camera moves, and at times it seems to move faster than otherwise, which is
a nice analogy for what is happening around her, and she has a hard time
keeping up with it. In comparison, the rest of the film is slow and boring,
with some rather pointed places... like Jan's hospital room, where the
camera does not move as much, or very little, thus suggesting that he is
boring, if one takes that to be a theme. However, Bess has given herself
away to this man, and she will do what she has to, to feel like she can love
him unconditionally. The down side, of course, asides from a religious
community that relishes in judging people, even if they are from their
families, as outlaws, renegades, and disgraced people.
    Lars von Trier, has used the hand style before, although it was never
used in such an incredible abandon with which it is used here in this film.
This enhances Bess' plight, and we can't help but feel sorry for her and her
predicament. And it never slows down, or makes the film less attractive for
what it is trying to do, and accomplish. It is the story of Bess, and the
film ends with Bess, though we know what else has happened.
    It's hard not to get caught up in the emotions of the moment in this
film, as the visual style tends to drag you in.... when jan gets hurt, it is
as if we are also getting hurt, or at least a part of the hard work that he
is doing.
    A very good film, though sad, but very strong in the acting department,
specially Emily Watson, who turns in what is considered a career
performance. But the film has its vicious edge at times, specially when
looking at the elders and their attitudes.

Title
Review for Farinelli: il castrato (1994)
This is a film about Carlo & Ricardo Broschi, a famous pair in their heyday,
when castrati were famous because they could carry a tune beyond the talents
of many singers of the time.  Farinelli, ( Carlo ) was at the time the best
known of them, and he is given much credit for having made a lot of Handel's
music famous, and to turn the
famous musician's style from pretentious into something valuable and good.
It is the story of two brothers, one a composer and the other one a singer.
The singer had been castrated in his younger days, to preserve the wonderful
voice he had.  And though most life around him was not very pleasant, he did
make the best of it, until he
achieved a certain amount of success, and from then on, the rest was
history, as they say.  The film, spends much time endorsing the voice part
of its main character, but it also shows the underside, the unhappiness and
the frustration which Farinelli lives under.  In many ways, he can not
satisfy a woman, and for many years, this job is left to his brother, until
he marries. The film ends with his wife pregnant, but with his brother's
child.  Presumably the start of surrogate fatherhood.!!!
But that's degrading the film a little.  This is a really well thought out
film, which tries, in many ways to show that the other brother, the composer
also had as much to do with his brother's rise, as he did in his brother's
demise inside.  It is never suggested, but there are hints that it wasn't
the  father that had his child castrated, but the older brother
 that had it done, after the father died, and the brother  figured out how
he could earn a living.  It was the older  brother that kept the two of them
alive for a long time, by  finding some work here and there, and later by
entering competitions   in fairs and the like, where they could show off in
front of  people.  They are inevitably heard by people befitting a better
social ranking, and that's when the story really starts.
The film has some very funny moments, given to the fainting of heart, and
the various people who do not pay attention to the virtuoso singing.  It is
a moment that many of us, yes us, can easily feel threatened, but it is so
true, and so well done.  The such and such countess is eating and reading a
book, not listening to him, and other some such events.
The exceptional mix of the music and the acting is what makes this film so
nice, not to mention the outstanding costume party that the whole thing is.
It's rare these days one gets to see a good period drama in full regalia,
and this film fits the bill, and then some.
Copyright (c) Pedro Sena 1995. All Rights Reserved.
Member of the Internet Movie Critics Association

Title
Review for Thirty Two Short Films About Glenn Gould (1993)
Looking inside the mind of a master musician, or at least composer, is
a difficult thing. The basic problem, which was seen through many other
reviews of this film, is that the consensus becomes one of idiocy,
stubbornness, and a maladjusted person.
Glenn Gould may have been all that, but his style and interpretation
of many classical pieces, is still one of the great achievements in
music in this century.  It is said that there is a fine line between
madness and genius, and the way this film is represented, there is also
a fine line between the directing and the truth.  As a film, it certainly
may not be liked.... the focus is the MUSIC, not the film.  And many
critics will not appreciate this.  But aside from that, what this
film does is what many film makers can not do.  Not only appreciate
the music itself, but also appreciate what it takes for a person to create
what he does.  It takes depth, and understanding.  It takes a lot of
intuition, where film might expect to find understanding and reasoning.
Glenn Gould is not about reason. Glenn Gould is about intuition.  And
this film is no less an exercise than the original inspiration...
certainly a compliment.
In thirty two little pieces, mostly in what we might consider a black
and white MTV style, the life and thoughts of Glenn Gould are sort
of displayed and shown.  There are no attempts to mediate, or define,
just a sort of interview with people that knew him, and just a few
other moments, of acting and directing license.  It creates a collage
where the music is the center of the activity, instead of one
man, something that Glenn states himself.
It is easy to see why this film was a darling of many film centers
and film festivals.  Amidst a more cultured audience, this is a very
nice tribute to a great musician this century. In the wider world,
where only Beethoven is the definition of classical music, the
appreciation of this piece of work is totaly lost.  One must not
only know the music, but also be familiar with different styles of
interpreting it.  Glenn Gould is about creating new visions off
the old, staid piece of music tat we have heard so much.
And, I am glad to say, that the film does the same.
Although, not specially done with audiences and film in mind, this
is quite an achievement, in creative thinking.  Putting together one
of these is almost like throwing things up in the air and picking
them up one at a time.  The final dimention was one of a chronological
styled ( very loose ) story.  But it could just as well have been done
in any other way.
Highly recommended film, if you not only love the music, but also the
musicianship behind it all.
Reviewed by Pedro Sena. Moderator of Centipede's THE FILM.
Copyright (c) Pedro Sena 1995. All Rights Reserved.

Title
Review for Germinal (1993)
There are many that feel that this is one of France's greatest novels of the
century.  Even if it is not, it certainly has been made into  a film that is
without a doubt, an excellent example of the quality of films that the
equivalent of the Academie Francaise, is coming up with.  Although the
themes may come off a bit political, still this novel is as much an attack
on the system as it is on the views that people undertake, in order to get
something done.  In the process, many things may happen which no one
desired.
It is the turn of the century and things in France are not well, with the
industrial revolution.  France was slow moving into the new world, and it is
paying a tough price.  Their workers do not produce enough, and their
ability to enter the international market, has caused the upper class many
problems.  Still, they survive on both fronts.
But the pressures that the lower classes in the mines are facing seem to get
tougher, instead of better.  No one can earn a living, except the well to
do, whose antics do not go by unnoticed in this film.
In due time, with the advent of outsiders coming around, the working
population gets aroused into a strike, and a revolution.  And with this they
hope that they could get better wages, and get the upper class to pay them
better wages and cut down the punishments they face.
But the strike does not get resolved, and turns ugly.  The upper class bring
in replacement workers from Belgium, and continue with their work, however
meager it may be.  And the striking workers, lacking unity and cohesiveness
of any kind, can not do much, except get angry. Their anger turns into a
revolution and they begin tearing apart the mines that once provided them
with jobs.  Some of the owners are, however, honest.  One neighboring mine
owner explains that he has no stock brokers, and no outside support and is
on his own, and his workers seem to be reasonably happy. But the main mine
in question is being run by a ruthless man intent on showing his inferiors
that they do not have what it takes to get the job done.  And his family's
main worry is the mother's desire to maintain her affair with the  ruthless
man, who is being courted to marry her own daughter so she  can also get to
him.
Amidst all this, are many ideals which tempt the working groups. A man who
has some inner strength, Ettiene, becomes a reluctant leader, and since he
is an outsider, he is a perfect man to speak up.  The locals do not lose.
And a socialist monger, expouses the ideals which would take away the
excesses of the upper class, whose style is grotesque, and class-less.  On
an eventual day, the socialist gets to one of the mines and undoes a water
duct, so it will eventually flood the mine and bust it.  This unfortunate
deed, ends up killing several miners, and placing many others in danger.
And in the process, of trying to save the ones that might be alive several
others are killed as well.  The end result, is that the family that owns
this particular mine leaves, and the mine is restarted. And the workers have
returned to their pits.
It ends with one of the miner's wives, who has lost her whole family in the
trenches, going to work, but forgiving Ettiene for having roused them.  The
people, the workers, have accepted their humility and returned to their
meager ways.  Nothing has
changed, but this time, one is sure that they will not strike again, for
quite some time.
Of special note is Maheu, with whom Etienne stays for some time, and who
becomes a strong figure when the strike gets going.  But, in an unfortunate
face off with the French police, he is shot, and many innocents lose their
life.  The French upper class will have
to pay for this one.  But it never happens.  The workers eventually need
some food for their families and there is nothing else that can be done for
work.
Emile Zola wrote a great novel, with the hope of creating some awareness in
the situation.  He never blamed anyone, directly, although the socialist
seems to be the one that causes the most harm, something that many a
political force in France never has liked.  But, even though, the socialist
ideal may have been right for this moment, the way it went about it was
totally wrong. The French, still are today, very much a people's nation, but
it is ( like everyone else ) hopelessly attached to romantic notions about
anything.  The grass is always greener in the other side.  Maheu's wife's
pardon of Etienne in the end, is a sad moment, but never a victory for
anyone.  The workers are
still trapped.  they have been beaten down, by the destruction. The upper
class moves on, and never faces its due.
Extraordinary performances all around, specially Gerard Depardieu as Maheu
and Renaud as Etienne.  As is typical of any Claude Berri directed film, his
characters are solid, and what could be a slow film, always proves to be
dynamic in some sort of way.  Some outstanding design in the cinematography
helps as well.  The film is quite claustrophobic when it needs to be, and is
almost always trapped in an over crowded space, be it Maheu's house or
elsewhere.
Outstanding music adds to this sad, but so very well done film.  If not for
a great novel, in lesser hands, this film would have come off preachy.
Instead, it comes out as a great story, beautifully told, by a master film
maker.

Title
Review for Kafka (1991)
This film is only as good as your reading was in your school's English
classes.
If you read a few of Kafka's short stories, you will like the blend in this
film.  If you didn't, chances are that this film will go over your head and
you will not appreciate the famous literary tradition which the writer
developed, because this film is Extremelly faithful to the way he wrote.
Frans Kafka, is not easy reading, and neither is it a Sunday pleasure and
cup of tea, terrace reading.  It is all too often, much more serious, with
implications which lean towards the existentialist movement in literature in
the late 40's, 50's and
early 60's.  By the time the sixties arrive, the shadows of the war were
diminishing, and the arts, in general, took an up swing in feeling and
attitudes.  The existentialists, having made their point through Albert
Camus and Jean Paul Sartre, all of a sudden were alive with a group of
weird, unusual, and clever writers.  And what was originally
known as 'new wave' cinema, may have been the ( Godard and Truffaut ) reason
why it started in the first place.  The negative and often helpless
attitudes with overtones of the decline of the civilization of the
industrial age, all of a sudden was alive.  The social rules and ways has
dehumanized people....and Kafka's contempt is for the fact that people can't
do much to change it any more....and often have to die knowing the truth,
but having to admit the falsities, just in order to survive.  The sixties
were the first rebirth of 'life' since the war that destroyed so much in
Europe.....and Franz Kafka, could very well have predicted it and hoped for
in his writing, were it not for a friend who did not do what he was told.
This highly autobiographical film, starts with the young Kafka doing his job
as an insurance clerk, where as time goes by his fear of impropriety and
dishonesty is discovered to be true by his mind ( his perception  already
had it figured out ), but the whole thing is undermined by his inability to
clarify his relationship with his father and eventually himself, and those
he cared for, or cared for him.  There were fears which suggested he was
unable to cope with the fact he knew what some of the outcomes were, not
realizing that he could have a say in how to change that outcome.
As he gets older, and notices his 'friends' happen to be the unusual sort of
people, gathered for political activities against the society they despise,
with whom he really does not wish to be involved, but with whom he happens
to share some points of view.  Eventually it makes  him a hero of sorts,
because he has the ability to succeed in destroying  a part of the system
where all the other revolutionaries have failed. However to himself, he
still is a personal failure, and with this he fails himself.  His weak
health eventual fells him.
The best part of this film is actually the acting showcase put on by the
likes of Joel Grey, Alec Guiness, Ian Holm, and Theresa Russell, who
probably couldn't resist a chance to work out a literary event. And although
Theresa comes off a bit overly emotional at times, and for good reason, she
is not as strong as the others, but manages to hold her own, as the ill
fated Gabriella.  And the film suggests that it is
her fall that weakens his own quest for self discovery.  The girl who loves
him is a nice girl, but he does not show any inclination to doing anything
about it, and she is too shy to do anything about it. Gabriella has a
stronger appeal, if not domineering, which may appeal to the younger Kafka.
And she is not immature, and young by any means,
where the other girl appears really naive, and incapable of understanding or
being a satisfactory partner on an intellectual level, which might be a
requirement for Kafka.
Joel Grey as the co worker is very good, and funny, if not obnoxious. Alec
Guiness as his boss is really smooth, as usual, in anything he does. And Ian
Holm stands out as the intellectual evil man, who is still exercising the
atrocities of the past war, obviously something which in Kafka's mind, must
be done away with, and buried away.

Title
Review for HUFTERS & hofdames (1997)
    As with other recent films from the Netherlands, this film also displays
what may be happening in that film community. It is clear that these films
do not have a large budget for their production, but once again, the focused
work of the director and actors, has compiled another pleasant film to
watch, even if the situation itself is tricky, and not exactly pleasant. But
along the way, we also get some laughs at the expense of a few of the comic
clowns in the production, the ones that know it all.
    It is the story of Dmitri, who happens to like Esther. Esther happens to
like another guy, who is tough on her and she dumps for another guy who is
less interested in her than he is in another woman that does not pay too
much attention to him. In turn she happens to like Dmitri, but he happens to
like Esther. And the film tries to see what happens with each other as they
go through their daily affairs and lives.
    Dmitri has a friend, who is married who thinks he is a know it all, and
never misses a chance to put down his wife/girlfriend in front of her, when
they are in bed, it seems the only time that Dmitri calls. In the end, this
friend makes a rather serious mistake, or perhaps he has said one comment
too many that infuriated his wife, or girlfriend. But in between, Esther
finds herself in the middle of abuse relationships, which she discusses with
a psychoanalyst sort of guy that does foot massages for her.
    If anything, the film makes a point of only commenting on the side of
any relationships which are not honest. Dmitri, has one ting going for him.
He does not lie, and while he enjoys the new found relationship with Susan,
whose boyfriend is kicked out of the house, and finds his way to Esther's
arms, he is also about to enter into their realm of a dishonest
relationship, if the end of the film is any indication. Dmitri and Esther
have a form of "score" game set up, to challenge each other. However, this
game has never gotten him anywhere with her, and more than likely will not
in the future as well. But the other relationships are not resolved either,
which tends to suggest that this film is a sort of "day in the life of ... "
and lets us make our own judgements at each character's expense.
    As a statement on the youngsters inability to resolve their own
relationships, in lieu of some sex, this film could come off as a serious
commentary on a society that works on its personal satisfaction much more
than it does on the meaning of its connections. Everyone is affected and
hurt in some way or another, since they really lack an old fashioned
commitment to their friends, and loved ones. And the one that does, is
intrigued by a person that has little respect for her anyway. Thus the film
suggests that we really can not make decisions, when we do not look at these
situations, and even when the situations seem right, that we are afraid to
enter into them, for some oddball reasons... such is the case for Esther.
    Interesting acting is found on all sides. An active camera keeps the
film alive, and prevents it from getting boring, or from falling into the
dreaded hip syndrome that many independent/cult films fall into. it allows
its characters and actors to live their "fantasy" and merely seems to follow
them as they go from day to day. One even has a hard time finding a bad
"shoot" moment in this film, or one that does not fit into the film style
and people. It's as if we were a person right in the middle of the action,
which in this case works.
    A nice, carefully worked film, although it offers a slight inconclusion,
it does suggest by its manner that this particular generation is really
confused, and lacks focus on what they can love or not. And love is
definitely confused with sex here. One gets the idea that Dmitri only really
wants to go to bed with Esther, and she gets upset with that thought,
although she does not say that to the others that go for her body anyway,
and couldn't careless about her feelings.
Reviewed by Pedro Sena.
Copyright (c) Pedro Sena 1998. All Rights Reserved.

Title
Review for Fatale (1992)
Louis Malle's films have always been about the interaction between two, or
more, characters.  DAMAGE is not any different at all.
It would be very easy to call Louis Malle, the quintessential film  director
one can study in academic circles.  DAMAGE is another fine example of what
the art of directing is all about.  Nicely tied moments, and a cohesive
story.  Made even more so, by the actions of the director.  Malle, despite
his American connections  ( married to Candace Bergen ), has never lost his
feel for directing something, and is ( and will ) be remembered for it for a
long time  to come.
DAMAGE is the story of an English diplomat that is on the verge of becoming
a prime minister, but his ability to get his job done has met an enemy.  It
is his 'double', or his other personality.  And for his indiscretion, he
loses his whole life.  Society can be cruel, but then so can the
individuals, be they the Stephens intertwined in their chances of success,
or Anna, whose life seems to be a series of tragic incidents she happens to
bring to a close everytime.  While Stephens  sees and understands that he
can not continue what he is doing, Anna is engaged to his son, he still does
it.  And it costs him
his own son.  And social position.
As the film closes, the older Stephens is admiring a picture of Anna on his
wall.  He observes that he saw Anna once more, but she didn't  see him.  She
had had a child with the Frenchman that helped her
before.  And that he had lost her special feeling.  The wildness.
I suppose that there are a couple of things this fine film would like  to
make us all see.  why is it that the impossible is always so attractive, so
clear, so desirable -- and yet, so utterly destructive.  Or is
it, as the credits suggest, that woman, while strong to pursue her desires,
is still weak -- just like any man -- when it comes to drawing a line, or to
stop.
Louis Malle's best strength has always been centered on the characters he
works with, and their inner strength, or inability to work with it.  And
their interplay in the face of disaster.  The ones that show
the weaker and emotional sides, generally fail.  The son is the example
here.  society manages to hurt, or damage, the rest.
Carefully shot, with beautiful musical passage strewn throughout, this film
is slow, but it is attractive, with excellent acting throughout, and it
manages to keep us wondering where it will all lead.  But while
Stephens is still stuck in a time warp, has everyone else gained, or lost.?
Excellently directed with very intricate and delicate dialogue exchanges.
Tender when it needs to be.  Sexual when it needs to be ( the angles are
faster, and the style cuts faster ).  This film is one of those that is sad,
but it is a triumph of tenderness about one side of our nature, which has a
tendency to hurt us in this modern day and age.  Is it us, or is it the
social mold that has done us wrong.?  Anna is having the same problem on
another scale.

Title
Review for Setouchi munraito serenade (1997)
Seen at the Portland 21st International Film Festival
MOONLIGHT SERENADE, is one of those films that just could not be made in
America.
    Japan, suffered with the advent of the bomb, and its position in
the World War II, but if anything, its artists and writers have never
let the world forget what this change really meant. For many, it was a
good riddance of an old system that had out lived its usefulness
anyway. But for a handful, who had been a part of the system, it now
has created a catharses, that they have to go through... what to do,
and how to live, and how to respond to it.
    And the film does a couple of things that are truly magnificent
directing ideas, and make this a special outing for the few viewers
that get to see it. In America, we have no idea how a generation felt,
and lived, really, since it has all been buried behind a Walt Disney
like story, and denial that anything happened. It is good to look to
the future, but is it wise to ignore the past and what people went
through.... maybe living in a situation that you are better off not
knowing what happened, is not such a blessing after all. The Hollywood
controlled "fantasy" took away from people admitting to themselves
that they were unhappy, and could not deal with their unhappiness,
unless they were drunk, or took on a fantasy film that meant nothing
but escape. As close as one comes to realities of war, seemed to be
films like Casablanca, which, on their own, were also escapist, in
that while these people were victims of war, they really didn't care
if they were or not, because of their personal agendas.
    The film starts out with the Kobe earthquake accident in 1995, as
a trigger for past connection. All of a sudden we see the past, during
the end of the WW II, and his family's trip to Kyushu, to bury his
older brother's ashes, who had died in combat. And many of the
children friends of his, joked that the family was going to commit
suicide, since it had been the honorable thing to do at the time, for
many government officials, and their subordinates. He undertakes to go
visit his family burial site, just like his father had done when he
took the whole family on this journey 50 years ago.
    And the misadventures begin. They have to take various methods of
transportation to get to the location they intend to visit. The
longest of which is a ferry ride overnight, amidst a bunch of people
that they obviously are not exactly used to be around. All of a
sudden, what had been a slight upper class family, is reduced to being
next to all the others.  The father, a policeman, is now reduced to
being a man, like all the others. He has to refrain from doing "his"
duties, and although he speaks at times in favor of the ideals of his
duties, by the time he speaks in the ship, it is obvious that he is
waking up to the fact that this is another world, and that he will
have to change. But there are a few adventures in the voyage.  He
meets an odd cast of characters, a couple of black marketers, one of
whom has a few movies in his bag, and he makes a few monies by showing
these things for a fee. Or a drug addict appears, and one never really
understands what he is running from, or for, but as they leave the
ship it appears that this man had been wanted as a criminal. The film,
in one sequence, shows an old black and white film, and it appears
that the actor is this man, now on drugs, with little respect, or
cares about much of anything. In any case, he seems to be a criminal
of some sort, just as he was in the previous snippet of film that we
saw.
    The story itself has a lot of topsy turvy turns, that at times
make it difficult to follow, but it has a couple of nice
moments... the man, now older and wiser, turns in a tunnel and watches
a family walk by... it is his family some 50 years before. This bit of
a psychic nature, is the only one ever used, but it does not detract
from the nature of the film, and the possibility that 50 years later,
Keita himself, has never really left that past world that he had a
glimpse of through a few films. But it is a nice touch, amounting to a
very strong suggestion as to what all the people in Japan went through
at the end of the War... they were all cleansed of the past, old films
dealing with ancient samurai traditions were forbidden, and most films
that were shown were American, and of a completely different nature at
the time, showing a much more westernized society that Japan had not
seen at all. We know that these things do not disappear over night.
Fifty years later, it appears that he is still thinking of that past
world some, even if for him it is a film image of sorts, rather than a
reality.
    The one thing that this film won't let go of, which makes it
enjoyable, is the young one's innocence. Keyta, now a writer, never
lets go of the moments that made his life enjoyable. His younger
sister's innocence, and his older brother's desire to follow a young
girl he met. These things, at the time, may have been funny to him,
but now appear a bit larger than life, and the impetus for a story,
that has enough moments for us to be able to really enjoy it, without
getting side tracked by understanding. His father had a terrible time
with his changes. The wife was resisting, probably much more than he
cared to accept or admit, his older brother is tired of the stern
father, and wants to leave, and his young sister who believes that
they are all going to commit suicide, which the first time the father
hears, is not funny. But by the time he hears it on the train, towards
the end of the film, it is clear that it is now a joke. And it is
here, that things start taking a turn. The jar of the eldest son that
Keita has to guard until it is in the family's burial ground,
accidentaly falls on a moment when Keita actually did something
heroic. In the hurry, the jar falls, and breaks in the train
tracks. To everyone's surprise, there are no ashes in it, something
that the young girl had joked about one time when she shook it.  And
all we find was inside the urn, was a tooth brush. Keita's ashes had
not been recovered, so his mother made do, with a toothbrush. It is
funny, but really signals the end of a tradition. It almost seems like
the family trip ends there, like they do not have anywhere to go from
this point on, or that the whole thing is pointless..... an excellent
time to make a statement about the cultural changes.... things are
different now, and the father Kokichi now knows it.
     The special part of this film is the filming of all old stuff in
a yelloow filter, giving it a bit of the sepia toned color style,
reminiscent of photographs, something the film starts with fifty years
before. And it only has a few moments of pure color, when Keita
remembers things, or is on his way to Kyushu.  A very nice film, well
directed, with some very nice touches. It really shows a culture in
disarray and change, not knowing how to deal with itself, in its very
new roles. The film deals with it magnificently. It is well thought
out and touching in many places. The performances are very nice and
the children are excellent all the way through it.

Title
Review for King Lear (1971)
If you like Willy, this IS as good as it gets.  Though it is a bit too
wordy for most of us, this is one of those productions where the passages
somehow make sense, and don't lead you astray very much.  I do recommend you
take a break somewhere in the middle of it, because it IS really intense.
Peter Brook got his start with theatre in England, and has specialized in
Shakespeare, though his best work is in the field of experimental theatre.
This LEAR is not set on a stage, thus freeing it from the overly confined
spacing which befalls all of Willy's work.  It is not a theatrical
production of any kind, for example, there is no music beyond what is heard
and required in the scenes ( the FOOL playing his lute, etc ) and the sound
effects are nature's wonders.  The usual stage allegories are done away
with, and the strong scenes, like the storm/thunder moments are actually
done outside in an environment that I don't think many actors enjoy working
on, and with, ... it is very difficult to act with robes that weight nearly
50 to 75 lbs. and on top of it are wet,... and the scene continues,...
The actors here are Paul Scofield as LEAR ( geesus h charrrist ); John Hurt
( ever wonder where he got started? ); Diana Rigg; Cyril Cusach; Patrick
Magee, Ian Hogg.  Stunning camera work and editing.  The most realistic
costumes you ever will see in a Willy production.  Filmed in northern
England in the area where it would have taken place.
It all makes for a rather 'brutal' presentation of Willy's, but one which is
reminiscent of the same appeal which Zeffirelli's Romeo and Juliet did in
the late sixties.  It is thorough, it is honest, and lays it on the line. If
you like literature, and an occasional Willy, take a dose of this.
        Meetings With Remarkable Men ( mid seventies, occasionally found
        in the shelves of the new age stores,... gasp,  GASP, ... ) based on
        Gurdjieff's books and life, with incredible scenery in Afghanistan,
        Pakistan, Egypt, and northern India.  And the ending will just floor
        you.  Features Terence Stamp, Athol Fugard ( he single handedly owes
        his fame to Peter Brook's productions of his work,......in SOUTH
        AFRICA, too,.... they weren't about to insult the best art in the
        land, were they,... take that DeKlerk... Athol is black,... Sizwe
        Banshe is Dead and several other plays. ), and many others.
Peter Brook's work is always challenging, and does not bang you over the
head  with 'heavy' meanings.  But the intensity of the work, and how it's
done will surely awake your mind up,...   highly recommended for serious
enthusiasts.

Title
Review for Zusje (1996)
LITTLE SISTER is a hard film to sit through, for many people not used to
film makers that love to take a total subjective point of view, for the
duration of the whole film. Not very many people have ever done this.
This film takes this point of view literally, and stays with it through the
end, which is a rarity in film making. For that alone, this film deserves a
special mention. It is difficult to find films that are capable of doing
this without ever having to go to the tripod for a standard shot. There  are
none of these in this film. The whole thing is hand held, and for what turns
out to be a superb reason, and magnificent conclusion, although some
will be terribly squeamish about it.
LITTLE SISTER, is the story of a brother and sister that have been close
friends for a long time, and at one time on her ninth birthday, perhaps a
little too close. But all of their adventures has been caught on film, by
mom and dad, and later by Martijn, who has taken up the camera for real,
although he does not discuss, or ever mention, that getting into film is
what he is about. The film suggests a slight abusive obsession
at first, and then begins to soften the stance once the story gets deadly
serious.
The older brother, still, appears attached to his younger sister, now a
woman, and he follows her around, in a rougher style than that of Mike
Leigh, another film maker for subjective ideals. Martijn keeps the camera up
close to his sister for the whole film, and follows her around.
Eventually it creates a few difficult situations, by walking in when she is
making love to her boyfriend, and also doing a no-no, later on, which
causes the transition in the film.
Eventually, the situation gets around, and Martjin, is forced to try and
figure out why he has become the way he has. He has failed in his
relationship or marriage ( not clear ), and the reason may have been that he
never got a sense of what it felt like to hold someone you really like, in
this case the situation going back to when his sister was nine years old,
and they got caught in the same bed.
The film now enters a very touchy area. And it takes the older sister to
literally sacrifice herself to try and help her brother. As it turns out,
however improper the situation is, it does not go beyond the point of no
return, and the suggestion is that Martjin has learned something, and that
Daantje, is finally freed of her brother with the camera in hand, who  tried
to break the relationship with her boyfriend, in what may have  amounted to
jealousy.
And in a fitting end, after the real touching, and touchy fifteen minutes,
Martijn gets up and out of the bed to turn off the camera for the last time.
For once, he was not abusive, and we can see that he has changed. He may not
have conquered his fears, but his following his sister and bothering her is
over for sure. She had to go through a rather uncomfortable moment which
might have turned the wrong direction, but it did not, and her way of
helping her brother displays a little bit more of love and care for him than
he has through his obsessive behavior.
At this point we can only hope that things get resolved, but there is no
reason to think that they will not.
It is clear that in those areas, sexual mores and attitudes are a bit easier
than the Christian morality found in many other parts of the world. But,
regardless, there are some things that affect individuals, and this film
keeps it strictly "individual", mostly because of its camera style.
While, very often, the camera can be a bit odd, and off the mark,
nevertheless, this is the strong point for this film in its desire  to make
a point. The point may be just this one person and his behavior have to
learn a lesson, and he does. The relentless use of the camera, to see things
like the eye truly does, is a refreshing style, over that of the average
film. And the director and actors seem to be aware of this and take it upon
themselves to make sure that this drama develops seriously and force a
serious conclusion to it.
It is the danger in these conclusions, that one, or both, could wind up
dead, but Daantje has succeeded where her brother has failed. His childlike
playfulness has been used as an excuse for his insecurities, and his choice
of moments defines that there is something there that he is in dire need to
resolve with his sister, although it may not be pleasant. His sister gives
in, but she doesn't fall apart at all. She is the stronger of the two, and
does not use a camera to hide behind her fears.
An absolutely riveting film, that is very difficult to accept and appreciate
because of its immediate link to what may be an incestuous relationship. But
I don't know that two children should be punished for a moment of innocence,
which may hurt them later, and in this case hurt Martijn seriously. And in
the end, when the situation has to come to a head, we are teetering on the
edge of our seats, scared shitless of what the outcome may be.
The film suggests here and there that the brother and sister have had a
connection before, but I really do not see that any of these moments were
any more than a teasing, or pleading to get attention, by Martijn.
Strong film that turns the tables mercilessly. Content may be inadvisable to
some. Other than that, it is very well done and thought out. Exceedingly
well designed by the director to bring about a turnabout ending to the
story.
Not for everyone due to subject matter of implied incest. Excellent film
otherwise.

Title
Review for Being There (1979)
This film was Peter Sellers' swan song. If nothing else, the master of many
voices and characters in radio, that achieved fame in film, but never for
his acting talent, gets to show here that under the right direction and
leadership, he can display, that aside from having the secret of comic
timing, he also has the secret, of characterization.  The sad part is that
it didn't help his career any, as the film industry
was more interested in making money from his bumbling character, the
Inspector Clouseau.  The sad part is that underneath it all, was a man that
really could act, at least in the sense of what acting was
essentially, ever, defined to be, which was to "become" that character for a
determined amount of time.  And Peter Sellers example here, in the art of
self control, which he always lacked in almost
all other projects he ever did, displays that this man really had it in him,
and could show it at any time, if only someone could come up with a script
that could show him that there was hope for
doing something much more than crap.  The two best roles ( actually six in
the first example ), that Peter Sellers has ever done, were  under the
auspices of directors that really knew what they wanted,
and weren't about to do something just because the star wanted it
differently.  And Peter Sellers went with it, and came out looking brilliant
on the other side. The first was, Dr. Strangelove, under the capable
direction of Stanley Kubrick, and then, in 1979, under the hands of Hal
Ashby, who, if anything, always knew when he had a good thing in his hand,
and how he could make it better.
This film, is, still, today, one of the very nice examples what a piece of
fluff in Hollywood can come out like.  A very enjoyable piece of work, that
can also have underlying meanings, not intentional,
but by just, pardon the pun, being there.  Several years later, the
subtleties in this film, are still quite apparent, and the acting, specially
Peter Sellers, is excellent.  Well, the others around him are not as strong,
but then, they don't have the meaty role amidst everyone else.  By
comparison, Shirley MacLaine is nice, but rather blase about the whole
thing, and the others are not as good, maybe with the exception of Melvyn
Douglas, who is rather entertaining as the old man, who is dying. But the
real touch of wonder in this film is that the character is so strong all the
way through, and so oblivious to anything that is happening around him, from
the realities about life, to a woman, whose own feelings she is learning to
get in touch with, and eventually, the outcome of the film. People like
Chauncy maybe lucky, but possibly, were it not for  his innocence, he may
not have been so lucky.
The film, stands out, today, more as a showpiece for Peter Sellers, who was
nominated for an Oscar, but didn't win.  His legacy of comedy goes way back
to the boom days of English comedy on the
BBC radio, where he is, still, a legend, with his excellent
characterizations for the GOON SHOW.  There are a lot of similarities
between Chauncey Gardner and his other various characters... the
uncanny focus, and ability to stay focused at a moment's notice, although
the out-take at the end of the film, does show, that even Peter Sellers is
human, and at times struggles with a few lines.... well, he did before, too,
but he could cover it rather easily.  This kind of thing he did day in and
day out as a Goon, and his ability to switch, is really scary. Here, in this
film, there is no covering up.  He just
delivers, that's all.
This is the story of a man who has been a gardener in a household since
heaven knows when, and he has been inside that same house for at least that
long.  When the man dies, he is told to leave.  And on his first walkabout,
he gets into a mishap that takes him into the hands of a rather well to do
family that is politically based in the presidential circuit in DC.  And
from then, the film kinds steam rolls into a bunch of fun bits and pieces.
The gardener, which he really is, just answers the questions in the only way
he knows how, and those around him, take his comments seriously, and use
them in various ways.
Chancy Gardner, may be a bit retarded, but his sense of awe and beauty, at
least keep him alive. He is harmless, and has a role to play in life.  In
this case, his is taken a bit to the extreme, but in the capable hands of
Peter Sellers, this role just out shines, what might otherwise have become
just another fun movie to watch and stay with.
Funny bits here and there.  Watch out for the deadly TV commentaries running
from the start, from the cartoons to the news, et all.....
4.5 GIBLOONS
Reviewed by Pedro Sena. Ygdrasil's Film Conference
Copyright (c) Pedro Sena 1995. All Rights Reserved.

Title
Review for Four Weddings and a Funeral (1994)
There is only one word to describe this film. FUNNY.
A group of friends have lived proudly of their ability to stay single for a
long time.  Their life seems to consist of school, and a few parties here
and there to entertain themselves, and their friendship.  But they are all
reaching the age, when the partying is fun, but the being alone part is not.
And they all set out to score a partner for marriage.  They all succeed
except our hero, who has fallen in love with an American socialite ( if that
is the word ) that has decided to take up with an Irish man.
And when all is lost, our hero has settled for second best, the woman that
has liked him for a long time, but is ill suited for his tastes.
Fortunately for him, he has just enough of the free spirit in him to not
forget the one person he has come to love, even if she is impossible to
reach.
The film is full of situations that are extremely funny.  The rookie priest
performing his very first wedding can't help mix up, and forget the words he
is supposed to say on account of his nervousness.   Our hero's younger
brother saying the wrong things at the wrong time.  And our hilarious and
crazy man who is the oldest of the group, who is
ever ready for a party and another drink.
In between, each member of the group gets acquainted with someone they end
up marrying.
The funny way this film is done is very entertaining, and while the language
is on occasion a bit on the fowl side, the film is very enjoyable.  These
kind of comedies do not come around all the time, and they are a treat when
they do.
Hugh Grant is exceptional, as is Andie Macdowell, and the various members of
the group, all of which have very extreme personalities. And to see one of
them hook up a Texan cowboy, is odd, but then, this group is odd.
Should see.  Very funny, and hard for a reviewer not to give away. The first
six words in the film tell it all.  Fast, funny, weird, and hilarious.

Title
Review for Children of Chabannes, The (1999)
(seen at the Portland International Film Festival)
 While this is not a feature film at all, and showing in a Foreign Film
Festival, there is one ting that this has going for it, that is subtle,
imaginative and totally engrossing. The compelling beauty in this film is
really the same survival instinct that has spawned so many other film
directors and creative artists, whose lives had been affected and destroyed,
during WW2. One might mention right off the blocks the likes of Andres
Wajda, or Roman Polanski, or Volker Schlondorf, and many others, but
comparing their emotional work, to this film, is something that is difficult
to bypass, and leave alone. This fine documentary film, even though it has
personal connections for Director Lisa Gossels, is a whole lot more.
 There is not much to say about Chabannes. Like many villages, and many
other people whose stories are still untold, both horrific or simply heroic,
some not so great, but no less valid in the context of things, this so
special of a film, makes a track that is difficult, that is exciting, and
almost makes one wonder why is it that many of these are not honored as they
should be. Not so much as a group of people that saved many Jewish lives,
but also as a group of people that believed in things far larger and wider
than simply a who's who of a religious world. Something that is still found
today, in so many places.
 Chabbannes, was a remote location that had the fortune of having some good
teachers and a feisty and energetic school administrator, that had more
passion for the same children that he supervised, and did what he could to
ensure he could do well for them. And when, in the unoccupied part of
France, this deteriorated with decrees that denied Jewish people a part in
their daily lives amidst others, this school and many of its teachers, some
of whom could have easily snitched, did more in the way of helping a lot of
children, be they Jewish or not, that is still remembered fondly, and
deservedly so, today. Films like this, do the one thing that allows this to
be stapled as one of the many monumental events. Saving 400 refugee children
may not have sounded like many, but considering the odds and the political
climate, it is a massive undertaking, that constitutes fortitude, heart, no
sleep, love, and above all an astuteness of personality that must always be
a step ahead of the pursuers and those in charge of making sure these things
do not happen, as did a befuddled Chief of Police, who from his quotes, must
have known what is going on.
 Of special attention in this well written and directed film, with
magnificent continuity, is the lively interviews with three or four of its
instructors who were alive at the time, and still are today. Their energy
and desire to do something more, was not what they were after. It was their
dedication to the children alone, Jewish or not, that shows up immediately,
and one can easily reminisce our own school days, today, to notice that
there were a lot of instructors that have never had an inch of heart
anywhere near these. The athletics instructor that made sure they all had
strength where others will not. The other instructor that told them all that
the cold could not beat them to win, and the other teachers that made sure
that many of these boys and girls survived, against horrible odds, in a
country where their livelihoods and rights had been revoked for political
reasons and gains.
 If there is a bit of a sad thing in this film for this reviewer, it is a
personal one. I was born in 1950 in Portugal, and these kinds of films were
ingrained in our minds as youngsters, and we were pretty much told a fairly
good sense of right and wrong. It helped that my own father was becoming a
well known name in Portuguese literature along the way, and his armada, was
not exactly Jewish children, but the arts, movies, paintings, the music,
that has marked the 20th century. By the time I was 10 and we had moved to
brazil, we had already met, house, and fostered friends and other teachers
and professors that had many connections to many events in Europe, some in
various concentration camps, some involved in other resistances, and some
that simply hid for a long time, and fought their own war. Their stories,
like this one at Chabannes, still remains vivid in my heart and mind, and
still the most scary part for me to tackle. It is not a fear, it is not a
love, it is not a life. It is something that people raised under the mantle
of a Walt Disney, and a yellow brick road, have a hard time understanding,
or really having much compassion for. Their guilt is only measured in the
acceptance of a Spielberg film or two, not in the people around them. I have
found that day in and out, many of the people around me, are far too distant
to have any sort of direct knowledge (and mine is indirect) about these
things and what they constitute to one's life. Vietnam came close, but the
denial of what happened then, or understanding of what it has done for many
lives, is not any different for me. People around me still play war games in
their life, and play war games in their computers as if nothing mattered and
it was fun. Quake and Doom and Half-Life still rule. I, personally, have
never enjoyed that attitude, since my own family was involved in the war in
these endeavors, still unspoken to this day, while they were under a Fascist
government not unlike the one in Spain. And I still do not know what it is
they did ... probably never will.
 It is wonderful to see that there are believers in the true human spirit,
that knows and understands that war is sick, and that people make a
difference. I wish I could say the same thing to many others today, who
still engage in conflicts with their neighbors, petty materialistic crap
that has so little to do with real life, that turns into sad destruction for
others. I imagine this to be a fault in the internal constitution that has
room for a God in a book, but no action in one's heart. If anything, the
thrust of this film, which can hardly be measured in the scale of human
dignity -- the one that is least discussed -- is that the future is always
in our hands, and that those who are most innocent are the ones that will
need it, and will have to live in it.
 Magnificent film, about something that many of us will never experience, or
fully understand. Well done, Lisa Gossels.
5 of 5 GIBLOONS
Reviewed by Pedro Sena, Copyright (c) Pedro Sena 2000. All Rights Reserved.

Title
Review for Vie ręvée des anges, La (1998)

FILM TITLE:       DREAMLIFE OF ANGELS
DIRECTOR:       ERICK ZONCA
COUNTRY:        FRANCE 1998
CINEMATOGRAPHY:  Agnes Godard
MUSIC:              Various. Well chosen material.
CAST:                Elodie Bouchez (Isabel), Natacha Regnier (Marie),
Gregoire Colin, Jo Prestia, Patrick Mercado
SUPER FEATURES:  The riveting, and astounding pair of leads. Acting rarely
comes better than this. Career roles for the two ladies.
(Seen at the 22nd Portland International Film Festival, in Portland, Oregon)
 Liking this film may be hard. But there is one thing that is astounding in
it and exceptional that is hard to dismiss. If the script did not have it,
at least the two women about whom this film's story is centered is too well
written and developed to make this film not liked, or not enjoyed.
 It is not a difficult story to tell. Isa and Marie meet at a deadend job
and they strike up a friendship, and Isa ends up sharing the place that
Marie is house sitting for a period of time. As much as they seem to become
friends, there are way too many differences between them, and no sooner do
they begin living under the same roof that things begin to take off.
 Like many French films, this one is also extremely dependant on the
dialogue. The old saying that French pictures are too talky is still true
here, but in this case, it is hard to do without it, and little in the
dialogue between the two women seems to be wasted. The chemistry, when
things start to go wrong is fiery and so explosive that we may get
exasperated wondering how is this all going to end.
 For reasons that are not really clear, but just happen, Isa begins getting
interested in the people that lived in the apartment, the mother having died
and the daughter in a coma. Isa's curiosity finds many things that come to
interest her, specially the diary of the girl. Isa decides to visit the girl
in the hospital, and eventually the film gives us the indication that it was
Isa's care and interest that helped the girl in a coma improve.
 While this is happening, Marie is entering into a very abusive relationship
that is not helping things. She is becoming hopelessly in love with a guy
that she knows does not care about him, but he is learning to enjoy herself
with him, and this may be the one thing that will break her inner anger and
loosen her satisfaction. Her happiest moments are towards the end of the
film, when she has her high hopes and it appears that things are improving.
But her choice of a man, is a bad one, and it leads to a very sad end.
Amidst the two ladies, is a pair of bikers, one of which comes to like
Marie, but unfortunately she is pretty indifferent to him, and eventually he
sadly has to let her go. They work as bouncers and tour with a band, the
distance of which is rather difficult for Marie. Isa, maintains her
independence, and never gives in to a relationship, with the exception of
her curiosity and attention to the girl in a coma. If Isa's inner need is
one of sharing affection and giving it away, Marie's is the needy one who
must have the affection that she needs to tame her indomitable spirit.
 And the film allows the two ladies to really tear up the screen with some
amazing acting fireworks. Marie has a temper. But Isa, will not back down at
all, and she maintains her own sense of self and independence. Strength,
even if she can not define it, is not something that she lacks. But she at
least has enough sense not to get involved in a relationship that has sex in
it, probably because she is guarding her own emotional state. Her appearance
is not clear, but we have the sense that she just came off a relationship
that left her guarded and protective of her space.
 The largest merit in this film is without a doubt the interplay between the
two ladies, who make the film move forward. It's the redeeming factor in
this film. Acting does not come any better than this, and the way that
things are shot around them is actually pretty well done, considering that
fiery acting work not done at a distance is not always advisable. In this
film, the directorial choice to go ahead and stay near them, is a
magnificent add on to the two characterizations that these women develop.
 Probably the downside of the film is its rather downtrodden ending,
suggesting that Marie and Isa are not the only two women that are alone and
unsatisfied in this world. The panning camera looking at other faces
immediately seems to suggest that any one of these could be another Marie,
or Isa. This, in of itself, is more than likely a statement about what the
country is making of people as workers than womanhood itself, but it really
is a sad end, compounding a sad end already.
3.5 of 5 GIBLOONS
Reviewed by Pedro Sena, Copyright (c) Pedro Sena 1999. All Rights Reserved.

Title
Review for Secrets & Lies (1996)
To watch this film, or any of Mike Leigh's films, one really has to
appreciate the finer points of acting, in its most developed moments, as is
done in the world's best stages. In this sense, Mr. Leigh is the best
theatre director in film at work today, if Peter Brook has retired.
Some say, that acting is a method, that is learned through a few clever
movements, and actions. Some say that acting is a living truth of some sort
that brings about an internal response, which the actor can not avoid in any
way, and acts with. Mr. Leigh's films, are about the best that one can get
out of the acting, in its furthest point. The result is rather unusual for
film standards, in that it is not exactly a "showy" exercise, or a "fun"
thing, specially when the moments get serious and troublesome for each
character. Taking a slight clue from film makers like Jean Luc Godard and
Francois Truffaut, this director keeps the camera on the actors longer, thus
avoiding the standard crossover conversational shots, and the results are
one of two styles... we either get bored because we have to live through
someone's catharsis, or we just get tremendously excited, because we can
really feel the whole thing, and the director did not quit on the story, or
actor, thus making the film come off much less as entertainment, and a lot
more as a serious exercise in some form of internal psychoanalysis. The
latter is not a favorite American style at all, where many audiences thought
the film "boring", and "slow'.
Life is not always a Hollywood movie on steroids and madness, or a Disney
fantasy, trying to help us escape our very own dreary lives, something that
Hollywood has been guilty of ever since its beginning. In Europe, film is
not always entertainment, and its directions tend to be towards the
"literary" side of things, or to the "artistic" sides of things, which is
always over looked in America due to its top ten money making film
mentality.
But few films can even stand up to the incredible ensemble acting work that
this film provides, that would make the best theatre people of the 20th
century so proud that their craft has developed so beautifully.... the
material may not exactly be Ibsen, or Shaw, or Albee, or Williams, but the
results are no less different and strong. If you had been through an evening
of such strong acting, you would have given the actors a standing ovation.
This is the story of a young woman that goes out to meet her birth mother.
She had been adopted when she was young, and her adoptive parents chose not
to hide anything and let her know that she was adopted, and where she was
acquired from. And when her parents finally die, her journey starts. She
goes after the company that took care of her adoption. The counselor ( the
weakest of all the actors in this film ), is a bit of the 60's mentality in
hipness, but not in content. Like all doctors she also lives in her own
world, and do not really believe people can handle their own affairs. But
Hortense is stronger than that, and she continues on her search.
It leads her to a rather dysfunctional family, who happens to have kept it
all a secret in regards to this particular adoption, that even the mother
does not remember, thus suggesting that she might have had other children
also given away. Cynthia, in her earlier days, seems to have had numerous
affairs, and enjoyed herself. But as she graces into her fifties, her
ability to deal with the past is catching up with her. When she finally
agrees to meet the young woman, she is convinced that she does not have
another child. She finally remembers, that when she was fifteen, she was
forced to put a child she had up for adoption, and that the father was a
young American black boy, she vaguely remembers. However, this is only the
beginning of the story. Here her family plays a major role. Her second
daughter is pregnant and about to get married. And she has a problem with
her mother, which seems to be stemming from some dishonest feelings. The
mother's brother has helped all his life, and has helped keep all the
indiscretions hidden from her family. But when Hortense shows up, the whole
thing gets rather complicated, specially towards the end, when the younger
sister realizes she has another sister, and that she is black, which is a
major shock.
If anything, one would have loved to see this film as a part of the "living
theatre" scene, since it's story and material could easily become endless.
Film tends to tie up things cleverly a la Moliere, just so we do not have
questions. And although this film answers the main questions about its
story, it raises others, and this is so true of life and its daily
moments... call this cinema verite, rather than just another entertainment
story.
What really sets apart this film, is without a doubt, Brenda Blethyn, as
Cynthia, the mother who has had a daughter adopted, but has never really
dealt with her feelings in he matter. She is un-employed and a "victim" of
sorts of the system, in that she is un-educated, and pretty much out of the
realm of possibilities in life to learn a whole lot more. But while she is
in denial, her maternal instincts take over, and she befriends Hortense,
which adds a nice touch to the whole thing... the problem is how to break
years and years of lies to the rest of her family. Hortense has always been
a part of the truthful side of her life and feelings... the others have not.
Few films stand out for their knicks and knacks. If one is mostly interested
in catching adventure stories and fantasies, please avoid this film, so you
don't have to say anything not nice. If one appreciates the further
development of the acting styles, as an art form, few films will ever stand
up to this one. And fewer directors still will ever allow such great
freedoms to let the characters be who they are.
Quite worth seeing. Very well designed, even from a conceptual stand point.
The camera is mostly on hand, and staying with each character... and even
though it can be "pressing" it never "abuses" the character at all. It
allows for the character to have some space, something that even the likes
of Godard and Truffaut did not do. by comparison, they were very mechanical
in form, style and substance, if not eccentric.

Title
Review for Tatie Danielle (1990)
Every once in a while there is a film that just plods along, and finally you
realize you like it.
This film, starts, and moves, as the grandmother you just hate.  No matter,
since she already hates you anyway.
Tattie D. lives in a small apartment in a small town and is bored senseless
with her maid, and the constant family visits of the terribly boring people
who are always nice to her, which she disdains.  The maid after much
teasing, finally gets to clean the dusty chandelier, and of course, falls
and dies ( or Tattie kicked the stepladder ) and now the old lady finally
gets her wish in going to Paris.  But she has to stay with her son, whom she
likes, but can't stand all the same.  As usual she gets to witness
everything in the house ( animals, she calls them ) and turn about every
good cause into a hellish nightmare for everyone.  The son has a vacation
planned and has to figure out a way to get someone to take care of the old
lady.  His sister is chosen.  But the old lady can't stand her because she
is a real dud ( gets pregnant and the guy walks ) and of course the real
story begins.  A maid is hired.  A young girl with a temper, but an ability
to stand up for herself, and not put up with the old lady's guff. Getting a
taste of her own medicine finally gets through and the old lady becomes a
bit more likeable.  The girl meets an English boy, they don't speak each
other's language, and the old lady happens to be able to translate.  The boy
is leaving, and the girl panics.  The girl wants to spend a few days with
him at the beach.  The old lady says no.  The girl speaks her mind and goes.
The old lady destroys the house, and tries to kill herself.  She gets taken
to an old folks home where she resumes her activities of nasty old lady with
a penchant for a good pastry.  One day she disappears.  And the next scene,
she is in the Alps with the young  girl, the only friend she has been able
to make, and share time with.
The film has a lot of funny gags with many people, and situations, and the
old lady's feet are lethal. And the actors in this film are fun to watch, as
they go through their motions. Rarely has an old lady dominated so much, and
then get hers in the end.

Title
Review for Leaving Las Vegas (1995)
American films have never been known for one man films.  The "auteur", as it
is called in the media, is the type that has defined film history, with its
eccentric directors, who wrote their own material, and defined an art form
with it.
Hollywood, has defined the art of entertainment, or better explained, the
art of figuring out how to make money regardless of what it is that is being
done.  The nice thing about this is that the technical elements in this
genre are always getting better.  The bad thing is that it really hurts in
the development of the art form, beyond any kind of standard which says
"give them what they want".  Thus American arts have not been defined by
their content, but how much they earn.  Needless to say, there is another
side to this whole story, that is finally making a serious move, away from
the studio controlled delivered machines.
Today, more independent films are made and earn decent honors that it may,
yet, change the quality of the film making, from a money making thing, to a
more literary, and artistic, point of view.
And it takes one man shows, like this film, LEAVING LAS VEGAS, to bring it
about.  Watching this movie, is like going to your local theatre, and
discover that this time, they DID do a great job, and they deserve some
serious consideration.  And if the credit is not given to the two actors
that pull it off, at least quite a bit of it needs to go to the man who
directed, who pretty much wrote the whole thing himself, and created his own
music for the film.
Nothing fancy, nothing showy, just solid quality work.
And it is the two actors here, that just about cook the heck out of this
film, and its inherent sadness. It is riveting, and worth every claim and
award it is earning.  This is what it is all about, and it all means.  This
is the power that the art form can have, to create literature, rather than
entertainment.  And this is what the history of film teaches us at every
school.  Hollywood, has rarely been on the map for its artistic successes.
This is the story of a failed film writer that pretty much has turned away
from life, and decided to drink himself down the drain.  And in doing so, he
meets a prostitute, that pretty much falls in love with him in Las Vegas,
who becomes dependent on him, for learning and leaning, when things do not
go quite right for herself.  The sad part, is that,
no matter how much she tries, she is not capable of changing this man, and
save him. She has come to understand that changing what is already set and
done, is beyond the realm of her ability, and human desire for that matter.
And in the one moment, when the love between the two is finally demonstrated
in the physical way that they have wished for, but hasn't happened, he
finally gets his wish.  She is left, hung out to dry, with a therapist,
which has been a going thing through out the film, which at first is hard to
understand and figure out, but becomes clear in the end.
It is a well written story, and very well defined in its design, and how to
carry it out.  And a lot of credit goes to the two leading actors that just
shine all the way through, showing us, that there  are actors in this
country that can hold their own to the famed West End style of depth in
acting.  This film, is an amazing evening, of what acting can be, but is
rarely, in much of the arts in this country.  What a great thing this is,
and hope, for the many, who try, but get washed by a machine that rarely
cares about acting, but for the sake of making money.  Nicholas Cage had
been advised not to do this film, and he sticks to his feelings, and wishes,
and ends up proving that what he is capable of doing, at least in film, is
something that most actors would dream that they had that ONE chance in
their life to prove they could do it.  In this case, they just grabbed fate
by the throat, as the saying goes.
Superb film, even if it is a bit depressing.  And deserving, in every way,
of its awards.  Excellently directed, with its subjective points of view.

Title
Review for Postino, Il (1994)
Without being pushy, and without saying much of anything, this film stands
out as a magnificent achievement in directing and acting. Few films will
ever  stand out in your imagination as much as this one does, with such a
wonderful story, though sad, but so very strong that it just hits you like
the wind. This, unlike most films, is really, in the Godard'ian sense, a
"poetic"  film, rather than a film about a story that happens to have some
poetry in it.
It is the story of a poet that has been exiled in his original country,
Chile, and he has been given asylum in Italy. But Italy's political
situation is not clear, and Pablo Neruda, was often accused of being a
communist, rather than a poet that lived his words. So he is given a place,
out in the middle of nowhere, where there is no media, and very little
brouhaha for him to attract any attention. Authorities often hope that the
writer kinda fades away, but leaves behind some of the writing.
And in this old, run down place, that still has no running water, no jobs
for anyone except fishing, takes to its famous person, through a young man
that has been hired by the local post office just so that he can bike up the
mountain to deliver the mail to the poet. And there, in time, they become
friends, or at least, as far as the postman is concerned a valuable friend.
As the story develops, the postman finally gets a chance to meet someone  he
is in love with, Beatrice. And the story really starts. The postman, becomes
a bit of a poet himself, although his words are not exactly as good
metaphors as the poet's own work. It works anyway, despite the  mother's
agitated concerns that the words are obscene. She takes the  words to the
local priest, who declares it a poem, but does not say
much else. He is convinced that communists eat babies and hate religion.
Even when he sees the poet in his own church... the scene is slipped by
rather quickly... nice touch.
The postman and the girl finally marry. And the poet gets his exile revoked
in Chile and he is off to his homeland.
>From here on, the story takes on really different proportions. While the
poet is here the words and the metaphors help enliven the place. As soon as
he is gone, the local politicians take over with lies. One promises to build
up the water system, and starts the program until the day he gets elected,
at which point the construction stops. He doesn't need the vote anymore. He
is in. It's a good thing, because the poet would have definitely said
something if he had seen this.
And in the end, we find that the postman, who has not received any letters
from the poet, creates a "live" poem for Pablo Neruda. It involves many of
the wonderful sounds that the place has, that one can hear at any time, from
the wind, to the waves, to the fishing nets.
One day, Pablo returns with his wife. The postman died. The wife was left
with a boy named Pablito after the poet, and a tape of the "live"  poem that
the postman. The postman had remarked many times that he is not famous and
that there was no reason for the poet to remember him. But he has made a
larger impression on everyone else. It seems that the postman fainted and
dies at the demonstration that would have been his crowing success. What has
become a "communist" party, mainly a direct opposition to the corrupt
officials, like the one that promised something and then
stopped it when he got elected, is having a celebration, and they intend to
have the poet's work read by the postman, who has become a bit of a well
known man. Unfortunately, the politicians do not like "anti-government"
activities, and they unleash the police on the crowd and the postman is one
of the victims.
Few films have the beauty, the desire, the care, to create such a strong
story and bring it to the forefront. And the two people that make it work
are Massimo Troisi as the postman, and Philippe Noiret as the poet. Even the
lines are read so beautifully that when we hear at the end of the video tape
an ad for a few actors doing the poetry, only one ( Wesley Snipes ) comes
off as good as the film's rendition of the lines of Neruda's work.
It is a treat to see something like this, and that Massimo Troisi was even
nominated for an Oscar for this role, is an incredible compliment to the
director's vision, and his work with the two lead actors. One wishes that
there were more.... and hopes for more, and the ending just leaves you in
tears.
But few films show you what the power and beauty of words can be. It doesn't
matter that anyone can tell you about anything in this film. The true story
is the words, and how they live. The film just floats on the words. It may
be considered a "bit talky" but it is never boring, and never out of
context, or away from the real point it needs to make. But one can easily
see, that this film has nothing to do with communist at all... it's about
poetry, and those who embrace the poetic muse for the love of the words and
the purity
of feeling.
This film is second to none in this department. Excellent work all around.

Title
Review for Tango (1998)

FILM TITLE:   TANGO 
DIRECTOR:     CARLOS SAURA 
COUNTRY:      SPAIN/ARGENTINA 1998
CINEMATOGRAPHY:  VITTORIO STORARO 
MUSIC:        LALO SCHIFRIN 
CAST:         MiguelAngel Sola, Cecilia Narova, Mia Maestro, Julio Bocca
(as himself), Juan Carlos Copes, Juan Luis Galiardo 
SUPER FEATURES:  The Dancing, of course. And the cinematography, too.
(Seen at the 22nd Portland International Film Festival, in Portland, Oregon)
 TANGO should either be considered one of the best designed dancing films
ever made, or simply an exercise in defining what the beauty of dancing can
be like that most of us will never catch in any theater in our lives.
 The inevitable comparison to this film, AND it is a distant one, is ALL
THAT JAZZ, and only in the design and mix of the Tango and modern dance. The
choreography is astounding, specially when devising the dramatic sequences
that this film creates for our imagination. I am not sure that many of us
can get this much WOW factor in the best show that we have ever seen. Add to
that a cinematographer that is capable of using light so well, and we have a
very beautifully made film, that even though it lags here and there, still
it comes off as great, and magnificent.
 There is a fine line when a film could be considered too artsy, to the
point of getting close to being a bore, and this film finds a way to tamper
that with fiery dancing sequences, that pretty much tell the story of the
film, even suggesting such dramatic opinions of history like it was the
Tango that helped people in Argentina come out of the depression in the
early 30's. A dance that helped people define and appreciate their culture,
if there is such a thing.
 The difficult thing in this film, is having the patience to sit through it
and make an attempt to find a story, which is rather lost in the film within
a film thing, that comes clear in the end, but is only suggested early.
However, in the early moments we only see the equipment, and not any
interaction with it. In ALL THAT JAZZ, the Bob Fosse character is totally
involved in his production to a level that is harmful to his health. In this
film, like many before for Carlos Saura, once again, this is the theme, but
Saura is not afraid to admit that it is his life that brings about the art.
Mario, is devising the show he is putting together from his own life,
despite the producers wanting a bit of a piece of fluff instead. Mario, is
learning as he gets older, that it is the women that inspire the Tango, and
it is his new found love that helps define the show. But he is by now well
aware that many of these women will be gone in the next day, and his taking
on a new dancer and lover is the defining moment for his production.
 But if this intricacy of story is not enough, an old story rehashed again,
one can at least take refuge in some of the freshest and best designed
dancing done on film since the ALL THAT JAZZ film. Well, there is more. If
the dancing is not enough, all cinematic styles of shooting are thrown out
the window to create a dazzling array of images with lights, scrims, and
camera movement, watching shadows of bodies dancing together. If this is not
making love to a dance, then the love does not exist, or the dance is dead.
 Carlos Saura has made mostly films that deal with dance, in his time. Even
in his early days, when he did Garcia Lorca's Bloody Trilogy all acted out
through dance, his style has only evolved in that in this film it hits its
heights as a visual art stunningly cinematographed by Vittorio Storaro. His
CARMEN, was very similar but lacked the outlandishly designed sets that this
film has. CARMEN may have the better story, but this film has the better
choreography and style.
 How, then is one to rate a film like this. It's really not a film, in the
sense that its totality is less a film than it is a magnificent evening at
the theater seeing a superb troupe of dancers amidst the best direction and
lights available anywhere. But Mario does tell his story, even from his
young days, when he became involved in it. His painful marriage breakup,
happens at a time when he needs the dance the most. The suggestion is that
his wife was the inspiration for much of his work. An older man, talks about
his days dancing, and how he has lost the joy of dancing since his wife
died. Mario, appears afraid that this will happen to him. While the whole
story is nebulously told, amidst the rehearsals and developing new moments
in his life, Mario manages to show us how his own design and choreography
takes shape. It may be simply the turning on of a fan, that immediately
shows us dresses moving in the wind, to immediately show us how an artist
can easily design and create his choreography. For Mario, it has been his
life, and it is continuing to be so, as Elena walks in.
 Carlos Saura has either elevated the Tango to a level that is beyond film,
or this film is strictly a tribute to it. The visuals add to that immensely.
I am not sure that this film would be as important, or as good as it is,
were it not for the design of the sets and the magnificent choreography that
it is centered around. For this task, three of the world's best considered
Tango masters took on the honors, and one of them is the tireless instructor
helping the young dancers go through their steps. Even though he is a much
older man, he still has the grace and the beauty that the Tango demands, and
he is not afraid to show it to his students.
 A truly beautiful film, if there is such a thing, although this reviewer
might have suggested that it need not be so darkly done. Colors everywhere
accentuate the dances and the choreography by Juan Carlos Copes, Carlos
Rivarola and Ann Maria Stekelman to make this a worthy candidate for the
Oscar for best Foreign Language Film. With masters like Vittorio Storaro at
the helm of the cameras, it shouldn't hurt its chances.
 If you like dance, of any kind, this film is for you. If you like steroid
films, please miss this one, or you will be bored senseless. But few films
are capable of elevating anything, specially when it comes to an art form,
and in this case it is impressive what one art form has done for another.
4 of 5 GIBLOONS
Reviewed by Pedro Sena, Copyright (c) Pedro Sena 1999. All Rights Reserved.

Title
Review for Belle de jour (1967)
Although this is considered one of Luis Bunuel's masterpieces, it really
isn't.  But it is, unlike many of his films, one of the easiest films to
follow along, and enjoy, something that some of his earlier films were not
easy to do with, and later, one wondered if we had missed out on a new style
of novel'ing a film....
And there are many reasons for that. It is filmed in glorious color, which
Luis Bunuel had just at the time started working with ( 1966 ) and it is
gloriously, and carefully, photographed for the best effect.  And it is
impeccably designed and written to get the most out of the main character,
though the novel itself is more pointy towards the  class divisions and
their life. The interesting notion, is that this film is one of the best
known of Bunuel's films in America, and was the one chosen to be touched up
and re-released. It is far less important a piece of work, as LOS OLVIDADOS,
or EL ANGEL EXTERMINADOR, or THE DISCREET CHARM OF THE BOURGEOISIE.
In this story, Severine ( Catherine Deneuve ) is the wife of a well to do
man, but their marriage seems to be not inspired.  She is bored.  And in the
process of meeting a friend she finds out that many wives of her  stature
sometimes visit a house or two and participate in some extra curricular
activities outside the marriage.  Severine, decides that she  will try that,
in the hope that it will eventually spark something in her own marriage, it
is presumed, although, it also appears that the whole thing may start out as
a bit of curiosity.
Severine had inquired from her husband wether he had been to one of those
houses and he admits that he had, and his answer is vague, and by all
intents rather vulgar for Severine.  The suggestion is immediately made that
the main reason why they just do not have an active, or interesting,
marriage, is because they just do not seem to enjoy each other's company
very much.  She seems to go along with him, and he is polite enough that he
does not force his wife ( a trend in many Bunuel films ), an unusual bit,
which suggests that he is also participating in some extra curricular
activities of his own.
In the process of being a part of the various customers she comes to meet,
during the afternoons, she ends up liking one man, who is becoming attached
to her, and she to him, despite the fact that he
is a shady character.  And when he realizes that he can not win her over at
all, he decides to take the whole thing in his own hands.  He waits for the
husband and shoots him, and eventually he gets shot by a policeman and
Severine is now taking care of her husband.
The hard part, is how it is filmed, and how Luis Bunuel gets into his
characters' mind.  The film is full of bits and pieces inside Severine's
head ( this is  a famous Bunuel trademark ) and we constantly see how she
sees things, or at least how she feels about them.  All is well here, until
the resolution of the film.  Her husband is better, and finally gets out of
his wheelchair, only to have Severine get distracted by
the sound of a carriage on the road, outside their mansion.  And the film
closes.
Luis Bunuel, through out his career of film making, had always entered into
any of his characters' mind, and show us how they thought.  And then we see
how they react, maybe based on their thinking.  The fact that we see that
these characters rarely do what they feel, is probably Luis Bunuel's
greatest comment in any of his films.  We know how Severine feels, but her
excitement seems to derive from a completely different feeling which her
husband does not provide.  Be it forced, or demanded, she responds.  But
given her chance, she tends to be shy and not take any initiative in her
personal enjoyment.
This style of filming, which is not well used nowadays, has almost  been
forgotten, and considering that this film is now thirty years old, it is
quite amazing how well his style survives today, in a world of fast paced
films, that do not have half the depth that Luis Bunuel comes up with in a
few minutes.  It all appears in front of us, so immediate, and so ready to
show us another feeling inside a character. By comparison, American film
making tends to use exposition, to show us these things, and then pretty
much tells us, with hints, what the most likely result is going to be.  Luis
Bunuel, himself, does not make judgements about what he thinks, or how his
characters will do.... they just do, and the result is always open for us to
figure out what it all means, and most likely -- my feeling -- to come up
with a way that forces an audience to make a judgement and decision for
themselves, rather than preach.... and this from a man who was brought up in
a monastery of Dominican Friars.
If you have never seen a Luis Bunuel film, take a plunge.  While they are
phenomenally well written, they also make for outstanding thinking pieces,
that never let up.  His style is smooth, and specially well thought out.
Never showy, never judgemental.  Just let the characters live, and watch the
details... sometimes they are important. In later years, Luis Bunuel became
a bit more unusual, and one of his last films ( Le Phamtome de Liberte --
The Phantom of Liberty ) appears quite disjointed with the exception of a
theme that repeats itself, in this case, freedom is an illusion, because
someone is always around to ruin it in some way.  I am pretty sure that many
times he felt this way about his films, when they were constantly being
criticized by the catholic church, and other institutions for their endless
attack on the hypocrisy that many of his characters partake in.  But, unlike
many directors, this man has a soft spot for people's errors, and their
decisions.... and he makes the best, and fullest, out of these moments with
a camera... an exceptional film maker, that rarely made a bad film, and they
are all unusual and truly enjoyable to watch....
Should also catch THE DISCREET CHARM OF THE BOURGEOISIE, THAT OBSCURE
OBJECT OF DESIRE, THE EXTERMINATING ANGEL, EL ( THIS SECRET PASSION ),
VIRIDIANA, TRISTANA, and just about anything he did. If you ever get a
chance catch his version of Robinson Crusoe... magnificent. And the early
Mexican comedies are very funny and totaly off the wall confusing stories.
Reviewed by Pedro Sena. Ygdrasil's Film Newsgroup
Copyright (c) Pedro Sena 1995. All Rights Reserved.

Title
Review for Cachetonneurs, Les (1999)

FILM TITLE:       THE  FREELANCERS (LES CACHETONNEUSES)
DIRECTOR:       DENIS DERCOURT
COUNTRY:        FRANCE 1998
CINEMATOGRAPHY:  JEROME PEYREBRUNE
MUSIC:              Classical Music
CAST:                Pierre Lacan, Marc Citti, Marie-Christine Laurent,
Serge Renko, Wilfred Benache, Clementine Benoit, Henri Garcin, Philippe
Clay, Ivry Gitlis, Sonia Manka, Faudel
SUPER FEATURES:  The music and the fun.
(Seen at the 22nd Portland International Film Festival, in Portland, Oregon)
 One of the nice things about French film, is the attitude "I don't care",
which not only pervades film, but also all the other arts. What does this
mean  when it comes to the making a film about music and its players? That
you are in for a very entertaining evening of fun. When the music is not
being played, the subtleties of characterizations are brought out in the
very independent attitude that many actors have. This film takes that for
all it's worth. And for you and I sitting in the audience, be ready for a
crazy evening.
 This is not a film, like Fellini's ORCHESTRA REHEARSAL, which is a farce
that gets out of hand, but it makes one point. Even the eccentric musicians,
with their personal lives, are not professionals to the point where they can
leave it all behind for a few minutes to create something really wonderful
for the audience, be it us, or any other.
 THE FREELANCERS, is a romp. And what it comes down to, is  a story of a
group of musicians that get hired for various events. Roberto has hired his
friends, and those he considers best in the orchestra they are a part of, to
do a concert in a mansion, for some rich old man. What he doesn't tell
anyone, until the end, is that he had been asked to bring a famous Viennese
Chamber Orchestra, and not the 6 people he has decided on. Presumably, he
will tell the audience that they are soloists, from that famed group. Alas,
the old man seems to be in on this. Out in the country, no one ever gets
good music, and the old man is trying to make sure his friends get to see
some, and he himself gets the pleasure of listening in to the rehearsals,
which is his favorite pastime. The old man is almost deaf, but not when it
comes to hearing the music.
 In between, we have the usual array of egos and problems, specially during
rehearsals. The director, a famous Austrian conductor is having second
thoughts and even his mistress is having a hard time getting him to come.
Eventually he does, but it appears he only stays for one rehearsal, which he
conducts very well, despite his desire to deal with professionals, and
obviously not just hackers, or at least one of his students, for whom this
appears to be a favor. Several rehearsals are done with one member or
another missing for various reasons, the most legitimate of which happens to
be Therese who is eight and a half months pregnant. By whom, it is in doubt
until later, although we find that one of the members is the father, if any
of his signs are the indications. Diane, is a novice and is taking violin
lessons from a master. She can never get the feeling right for him. The
clarinetist, does not read music at all, and has to take a crash course in
learning it from Therese, whom he has taken a liking for, and probably hopes
to be able to connect with in the future. It is here that we discover that
the old man is in the middle of all this. He selected the clarinetist to
join them. And the clarinetist tells the group in the first rehearsal that
everyone should just play, and all they have to do is tell him what to do
and he will do it. The viola player has a problem with the cellist, who in
turn has a problem with the double bass.
 These squirmishes  never stop, until the music is on. And one of the best
moments is when each takes a turn conducting the group and each one's
feelings define the quality of what they are playing. They may not be as
famous as the Vienna Chamber Orchestra, but what the heck, they can play.
And they do. And it gets them a new deal, too. But that's another story.
 A very funny film, that is obviously written and directed by someone that
really knows the intricacies in music and what is required for it to create
the awe and feeling that we buy into when we see these things. There are not
many film people that know how to work with music, and this film shows how
it's done, even if the subject matter is closely related. The French film
industry, probably has created some of the best films when it comes to
music, when one looks at things like TOUS LES MATINS DU MONDE, UN COEUR EN
HIVER, THE ACCOMPANIST,where music is so important, and so well defined and
worked on. This film, though a comedy, really fits in that group as very
enjoyable, and a true experience, when it comes to the value and beauty of
the music and its definition. Worth seeing, by all means.
 Excellent work all around, even including some Iranian musicians that put
on a fabulous couple of minutes, even though it is in a kitchen. It is the
only contrast that is out of place, but shows one of the musicians in the
group the value of music. From that point on, he is no longer a prima donna.
Well directed. Nicely defined vision and work.
4 of 5 GIBLOONS
Reviewed by Pedro Sena, Copyright (c) Pedro Sena 1999. All Rights Reserved.

Title
Review for Sřndagsengler (1996)
Seen at the 21st Portland International Film Festival
THE OTHER SIDE OF SUNDAY, was one of the Final Nominees for the
Foreign Film Oscar. And it made its first Portland appearance in this
21st Portland Film Festival, so others would get a chance to see this
interesting, not really great, but very well written film, that really
wants to make a serious point, despite its opinionated nature.
The subject matter itself, is a tired one, specially for American
standards, and it really leaves one with only one thing left... what
is it like in other places? We know through Ingmar Bergman that these
things are till strong, and that fundamentalists had a very strong
hold on their flocks for many years, in that area, and if this film is
any indication, it is extended into Norway as well.... not that we
really want to mix film and reality, but why would anyone try it,
right? One can guess that the problem still exists, although the film
points to the 50's.
The story is that of Marie, who is growing as a teenager, and is
finding herself in the midst of many pranks by other fellow students,
who pick on her as she is the priest's daughter, and quite naive. She
befriends a Mrs.  Tunheim, who is the caretaker of the church, and
they become friends, where Marie learns a few things here and
there.... like about makeup and a little different hair style, even
some earrings.
As Marie grows, her innocence begins disappearing, and she starts
doing things with a few of the other girls in the school. In one
outing, it appears that the other two friends of hers are ready for
sex, and Marie, is the odd one out. All of this, just adds to Marie's
rebellion, and she begins slowly by comfronting her father, at first
regarding her younger brother's flatulence, and later about lies. In
both cases she gets slapped hard. But one thing is clear, Marie is
beginning to win the battle, and she has not planned to give up, like
some of her friends have already done.
And in the end, Mrs. Tunheim kills herself, apparently she has waited
all her life for Marie's father, and has been a faithful mistress in
all that time, and he has not come through. His own wife's illness has
not helped things much, although it is not clear in the film if this
relationship involves anything beyond some intimacy. This is hard for
Marie, but it is the liberating force she really needed. Her father
has been a bit of a hypocrite in the pulpit, and she now has a chance
to shine on the father, and does so with a really nice of earrings,
that Johannes obviously recognizes. The daughter knows, and he knows
that she knows.
The film ends with the young Marie stepping out on her own... she has
fled the coop. Unlike most other girls, who never got over their guilt
feelings, for whatever they decided to do, and eventually became pure
Christians, Marie never quit on herself, or what he knew to be an
obvious sham, and nothing but a control game.
The best part of this film is the viciousness it attacks Christianity
with, in just a few well placed lines... the film treads quietly until
the moment for each line, and these situations are never set up in a
way that we can expect. Well, sort of. We know that they sit up at the
dinner table every night, we just don't know what is going to happen,
and that's when things tend to get out of hand. But the real loser in
all these confrontations is the Johannes, who is, in the end, noticing
that his own way has broken up what he thought was a happy
family.... one that he does not really love, it seems, although he
claims that it is his duty to do so... once again, ogligated to do
something, rather than wanting to be a part of it. This is what the
film is about, all the way through it, and us, in the audience, as
Americans, can only sit back and applaud that Marie makes it, rather
than fall by wayside like so many others have.  While, from a film
making stand point there is little that makes this film special,
still, in topic and design it is a nice one. The filming, or the
print, seem to be washed out, and there never really is any sunshine
in the film, with the exception of one moment... the ending shot. This
stark feeling permeates the whole film, and does make it a bit dreary
and heavy, and at times rather slow. But it is all from Marie's point
of view, really, which is akin to this feeling... but one need not
take it literally, I don't think.
Enjoyable in all this, is the way that the young girls are
growing. While it appears that a few of them are winning on Marie,
they really are not.  They just had the opportunity which Marie did
not. But, in the end, this opportunity does not amount to a hill of
beans, and all the girls that crossed the line, to find out what the
new world was all about, had pretty much repented and gone back to the
old world of the Christian design. Which is to say, that Marie did it
right, until she knew that she had the freedom to take such a jump,
and not worry about her parents, or anyone else. All the other girls
do not have this intelligence, and come off as dolls, by comparison.
A good film, depending too much on the dialogue to make its point. But
the chances it creates for its venom, are excellent, and really break
through well.

Title
Review for Jean de Florette (1986)
Every once in a while a great pair of films comes along.  JEAN DE FLORETTE
and MANON OF THE SPRING are just such a pair.
With a lot of the French dramatic slowness in these films, the story will
eventually grab you.  It won't be until the last thirty minutes of MANON
that you can quite understand what is going on, but until then you keep
wondering, where, what, and why are things happening the way they are.
There are some striking similarities between these films and the serialized
soap operas found on television.  In many ways, the twists and turns are all
the same, and the wrenches thrown in at various moments do not help the
characters very much.  They make the whole thing more difficult.
An educated young man, inherits a farm, and moves in from the city.  The
people who worked the farm before don't like the young man's ideas, and
proceed to do anything and everything they can to make sure he does not
succeed.  And they do it by making sure that the season's drought conditions
continue by plugging up the main well, which also feeds water to the town.
The young man is a hunchback, has a wife and two kids.  His fight for
survival is magnanimous on all accounts, but eventually it ends in tragedy.
He is the outsider, is ugly, is educated, and has no place in the country
telling the folk how to grow anything in their farms.  The young daughter
Manon, at the age of six or
seven, finds out that the old man and his accomplice have in fact plugged
the well, and are planning to wait for the verdict of the courts who will
decide to whom the property will go, and who will take care of it.  However,
the  girl is young, she's the black sheep, and her family is dead.
Gerard Depardieu is the city man and hunchback with many ideas, all which
work and are sensible, but he is the representative of the new order of
things, and the failed old order rejects him.
And Yves Montand is the old farmer, whose attitude is downright abusive, but
also charming.  He is as sneaky as he is nice to the young children, and the
town folk who admire him for being the best farmer, and at one time the best
lover.
This first part is innocent enough, though now something is established in
MANON.
Although a bit slow of a film and it has subtitles, this is an excellent
film and should be seen by anyone who appreciates great film making.  It is
similar in many ways ( to my eyes ) to a David Lean film, in that the shot
composition is pretty and nicely done.  And the country side is beautiful.

Title
Review for Peter's Friends (1992)
( Sidenote.. interesting that I would catch this the same evening that I saw
Glengarry Glen Ross .... pure theatre. )
If Glengarry Glen Ross was American acting styles at its very best, then
Peter's Friends is the English version of the same thing.  The finest
ensemble style acting that you will find, is in both of these productions.
American filmdom is afraid of these PLAY things.  The English, of course,
have thrived on it for a long time.
And Peter's Friends, despite its down ending ( not quite ), is a play that
does not need a movie.  But Kenneth Branagh manages to make it enjoyable,
and not an evening of heavy theatre, until the last possible moment, which
is nice, and makes for a fun evening.  One has no clue as to what is going
on, or what will happen.  So much the better.
Peter's Friends, centers around a group of buddies that used to spend their
college days doing little reviews for parties, with some burlesque thrown
in.  Several years later, all the members have gone their own way.  Peter
has decided that he will have a party to honor all of his friends, the last
chance that he might have to do so, for he is also losing the properties he
lives in.
And they arrive.  The actor and his wife actress, frustrated because he is
the star and she has to stick around with him until she gets her own break.
The spinster, who still picks up a bum here and there, and is trying to find
something of a spark in a relationship, to excuse her sexual escapades.  The
successful businessman in the advertising business, who is good, but has a
wife that is just about gone haywire about her child.  And Maggie, who seems
intended on coming over to the party to hook Peter into marriage.
And their interplay gets everyone in trouble with everyone, and insulting
everyone else in the process, but never losing the sense of friendship which
brought them together in the first place.  Like many years ago, they still
tease each other about their sexual anything's, and their choice of mates,
compared to their choice of friends ( never in question, now is it.? ).
And the disappointments set in everywhere.  Peter is not responding to
Maggie's advances, and she is hurt by it.  Sarah is still trying to bed down
the actor ( specially now ), and to get rid of the cold fish American wife,
who spells out clearly she is in it just to get her own chance at acting.
And Paul, whose marriage may have meant
something at one time, but has been a terrible disaster since the death of
one of the twin sons.  His wife has turned into a neurotic mess since.
All's well that ends well, is the norm here, and we won't disappoint anyone
with a spoiler's alert.  Needless to say that this film is excellent, and
the acting is above and beyond the call of any one's duty, and that it is a
very enjoyable evening, the likes of which many of us would love to have
once in a while ( well, we can forget the news.! ), just to appreciate old
friends, who really were better friends than we give them credit for, much
later.
The best one in this ensemble is Stephen Fry as Peter.  The smooth one is
Emma Thompson.  The most boring one is Kenneth Branagh. But the film is
excellent, and very enjoyable, and allows a theatrical play to live, without
having to resort to filmdom's very famous close ups.  Theatre still lives,
even if through the lens on a
camera.

Title
Review for Angel at My Table, An (1990)
The life and times of people who have made it into the world of the arts is
not always a pleasant story.  But it does make one heck of a film.
Janet Frame was born with a bit of an unstable mind, or so everyone thought
around her.  She is placed in various schools and eventually is treated for
being a schizophrenic person, something which she
has to fight all her life.  But as she gets older, and wiser, she discovers
that she is capable of writing, and exciting people with her style.  The
problem is that no one around her accepts her ability
as something worthy of anything except another of her tirades in what is
considered unstable mind.  She is placed in various mental institutions and
barely escapes the ultimate punishment of a
lobotomy.
But to her credit, along the way she manages to get something written and
published.  Which helps her cause... except that her capacity to believe in
herself and abilities is lagging far behind.  And with
the help of a couple of therapists, she manages to get herself a writer's
grant and spend some time travelling and preparing for another piece of
work.  This takes her to England, where she is
able to get a couple of pieces published, until one publisher makes a
comment that she needs something that sells, not another bunch of words on
paper.  She takes of for a sea side resort in
Spain where her abilities flourish, thanks in part to an affair with an
American artist, who is also trying to escape the personal assaults from
family and friends.
And from here on, Janet Frame becomes a writer, and although ( today ) she
is not considered famous and major, her work has place countries like New
Zealand on the map of the arts.  But the price one has to pay  to get this
far, is often too harsh.  Janet barely made it through
the cracks of the world in one piece.
And Jane Campion, found a person who could help.  She made a film about this
writer, no doubt to also illustrate her frustration at not being able to
direct film in a man's world.  She succeeds. This is an excellent film, if
not a bit long, but lovingly directed and caring, about what it means to be
a person that has visions and desires which are not common, or related to
personal belongings beyond those in words on a piece of paper, in this case,
as the only means to survival.
Kerry Fox is just a treat to watch as Janet.  An acting job that deserves
much more than it ever got, which was no mention, and ignored.  And the
director treats the material with such a nerve that leaves us realizing how
important it is to accept a person's desire to see and express feelings,
specially those
which are considered artistic, or literary  in this example.
AN ANGEL AT MY TABLE is really a sad film, and like THE PIANO done much
later, it is one that leads to a satisfying conclusion.  Janet suffered, but
she will be remembered, and she knows it.  And Jane made sure that her
literature was known, much later.  She's not a major writer, but she was a
person that was nearly destroyed by a society enamored with destruction, not
life.
A must see for anyone that writes, as an exercise that futility is never
around the corner no matter how bad things can be.  And without much fuss,
this film happens to be a stand on the merit and value of
woman writers in a world that tends to disregard them.  In one scene a
publisher wants her to create a pen name of a man... now  that's liberation
come a long way.  And a merit worth having earned, not only for Janet Frame,
but many women writers and artists, not to mention Jane Campion.
Copyright (c) Pedro Sena 1994
Reviewer and Moderator of the CENTIPEDE's THE FILM.

Title
Review for Kuningasjätkä (1998)
(Seen at the 22nd Portland International Film Festival, in Portland, Oregon)
 It's nice when one bumps into a film like this, without knowing what to
expect. One comes away relieved that in a Film Festival that sometimes has
too many pointed films, there is at least one that is not pointed, as much
as it is NICE, and the film has no pretentious to be anything nicer than
what it really is. A nice film.
 A SUMMER BY THE RIVER, is the story of Tenho and Topi, father and son
during one summer when things got specially harsh for them. Tenho's wife
died, and he did not have enough money to pay the rent and has to leave for
the country, in order to find work for himself and probably the boy. As it
turns out, this particular summer is the one that anyone could hope for, and
both gain a lot from it. But the life in the country is not easy. Probably
the only jobs around are those of lumberjacks, and they do not have it easy
in the new place they end up at. Tenho, being a city man most of his life is
not exactly liked by all the other lumberjacks, and he is picked on for a
long time, until he ends up proving his metal is actually much stronger than
some of the others. This finally makes him a member of the group, as the
season is coming to an end.
 The lumberjacking job is not easy. They have to guide many of the logs as
they move downriver. And these crews have their share of problems.
Immediately, one man decides that Tenho is a pain and he tries all he can to
make Tenho look bad. But Tenho doesn't quit. Pretty soon he is starting to
get everyone's respect, as he is not afraid to work a little harder than
many of the others. And towards the end of the summer, he has gained the
acceptance of the lumberjacks, as they leave for the season, probably to
return next year.
 Amidst all this, is the young man, who befriends an older lumberjack who
acts as an adviser and senior in the crew. It's on his advise that things
get done. And Hannes is full of stories, and tales about the woods, and the
work. And here we find is the greatest part of this film. Everyone of the
lumberjacks gets his five minutes to talk about his story. And what a toot
they all are. These, pretty much make the film a lot of fun, and almost make
the story secondary, even though all these stories are intrinsically tied to
the work that they are doing. It is what made "men" of them, and has allowed
them to be selected for yet another summer of work. That Tenho gets hired is
a lark, more than anything else. It's the son that the man is after, someone
to do the medial small tasks during the summer, and for that the father ends
up coming along.
 The story goes along rather well, and is getting to be fun the more we sit
through the film. And, eventually it has to arrive at a stop. This one here
is a town, that happens to dislike the lumberjacks, presumably because they
come in taken on the women and often leave with them. One of the town's rich
boys decides that it wants to make things worse for the loggers, and he
does, but not enough to prevent a party from busting up into one of the most
fun things that you will see in a while. The failed musician brought along
to entertain the group, finally gets his spot light and he makes the most of
it. And Tenho gets the chance to dance with a girl he has met, who has
become attracted to him, probably because it is her one chance to get out of
the place she is in, if not meet someone else other than those around her,
whom she does not like. Her father has her earmarked for the kid that is
better off, but she doesn't like him.
 A very beautifully shot film, that really brings out the country side in
Finland in the summer time, it is also a film that has excellent music all
through out, and very well done moments. One never gets the feeling that the
camera is doing better than the actors, or the actors doing better than the
scenery. It all fits together nicely.
 The most satisfying thing in this film is the excellent direction and care
that each character is shown. They are all one of a kind, and their tales
demonstrate it. And the funny stuff is so well balanced into the mix that
one will not leave the story or film behind. One will not find many films so
well thought out and defined. And this should be a tribute to a director
that knows what he is doing and can match all the moments at the right time.
We never get a chance to get bored with the logs, or the work. Something is
always popping up. Of all these, the old man Hannes is special. His
character is so beautifully defined and done, and a tremendous joy to watch
and appreciate. Acting rarely touches that kind of smoothness.
 A very good film, extremely enjoyable and beautifully done. hard to find
faults in this film.
4.5 of 5 GIBLOONS
Reviewed by Pedro Sena, Copyright (c) Pedro Sena 1999. All Rights Reserved.

Title
Review for Steppenwolf (1974)
Literary works do not always translate very well into the screen, and on
occasion, a complete interpretation has to be set up, to avoid the traps of
confusion, or complaints, by those who live and die by the words of a novel.
Herman Hesse's STEPPENWOLF, is not a good subject for a film.  But it would
make an excellent film if the persons involved believe in the work and the
process which the characters go through in it.
Fred Haines' film version of this very famous novel is not going to satisfy
everyone, but it should give a good example of what Herman Hesse was all
about, and the main ideas of the novel come through very well, specially
when it is set up by the thinking mind of the main character, played by the
veteran actor extraordinaire Max Von Sydow.
The film opens with a cartoon, which summarizes the whole thinking into a
small Cliff notes.  And then it concentrates on the voyages of the main
character, from his drug intervals, to his involvement with a woman who is
bisexual, and not specially in love with him ( very German if you ask me )
but likes the mind of the man who trips so much.
With the exception of the MAGIC THEATRE sequences, which I wish were more a
part of the novel than the film, this story is good, while it isn't as
interesting as the novel itself.  In the book, we get a feeling  that the
writer is going to continue, and will survive the forays into unknown spaces
of the mind and body.  In the film, I don't remember that this is as strong
a point as it could be.
The actors are very good, and Dominique Sanda is very attractive and
seductive through out, and we wish there was more to her in the story, but
there isn't.
A FILM FOR THE INTELECTUAL FILM GO'ERS.
IF YOU KNOW HESSE, SUSPEND YOUR IDEAS FOR A WHILE.

Title
Review for Ermo (1994)
ERMO is one of those films that we just about expect to see in the western
countries. And, really, it may signal either a commentary on the outside
world, or it may display something about human nature and its fickle way and
style.
It is a story that can best be described as "keeping up with the Jones' and
doing it a step better".
Ermo, is a young married housewife that is a bit frustrated, because her
husband is disabled and she has to do the work. She spends much of her time
making noodles and taking them to town to sell them. In comes up a
neighbour, whose own wife he doesn't get along with. And he helps her go to
town to sell her stuff.
Ermo's child is constantly going to the neighbor's house to watch TV,
something that irks her to no end, and she resolves to get the biggest TV
that she can find. And instead of selling noodles, she ends up getting
another job and also giving away blood for various causes.
And although most things in this film happen accidentally, like the blood
giving, it is clear that Ermo is decided that she is going to go one up on
her neighbour. And she will do whatever it takes to get there.
And get there she does. And the whole town is now parked in her house
watching TV, and her disabled husband is no longer made fun of, except
lightly.  And the film ends in a note that is disconcerting to say the
least, although it may not mean anything. Ermo got it, but did not expect to
catch the "snow" on it in the middle of the night, when the stations are
signed  off.
It is a really well done, and written satire in many aspects, and it spares
no ideas when it decides to make fun of the people that are so dedicated to
the world of television. But above it all, the film, is really a knock on
the new life style, that is TV ridden, and not work oriented. Everything
seems to be planned that way. Work so hard to get to this point?  It becomes
a subtle statement about an empty society, and it is presumed that the  west
is looked at this way..... but the people are seeing this stuff in a totally
new light, and this time in color, although we were never shown the
neighbor's TV, which is obviously smaller.  To them, the outside is a  brand
new world.
While this is not a great film, with outstanding values in production like
Zhang Yimou, or Chen Kaige, it still is a sign that the vitality of the
Chinese film industry has been active, and not wasting its time. And it
should hit a much more lucrative larger market, as soon as China learns  to
work with the west a little better, through Hong Kong, if this is the
path that it takes.
Other than that, this is a nice film where the eccentric live, and the poor
come and watch. But it has some rather nice moments. And the dedication to
its goal, in Ermo's mind are worth the sight.
Very enjoyable film, although there really is nothing fancy, or artistic
about it... it just is.
3.5 GIBLOONS
Copyright (c) Pedro Sena 1997. All Rights Reserved.
Member of the Internet Movie Critics Association

Title
Review for Azúcar amarga (1996)
SUPER FEATURES:  Awesome story. Beautifully told.
 I don't know that there are too many films that know how to attack a failed
system so well as this one does.
 Yes, it is easy to take a love story and blame its tragic consequences  on
the youthful exuberance of the kids, or whatever. But few films have done it
with an unbelievable style and dedication that this film shows. And if the
Cuban system thinks it has done something for its people, maybe it should
wake up and realize that if is failing miserably, and that it is going to
destroy its own revolution if it does not do something about it.
 Like so many other cultures, the hope is always away from home and Cuba is
no different. Except that a few people admit that they stayed because they
thought things would get better, only to find out later that they didn't get
better at all. Most of it was deception. Or perhaps the system did not have
the resources to do the things it promised and can not find a way to tell
its own people that it does not know how to do things, and is trying to
figure it out. No. Instead we hear a yet another political speech about the
great success of the revolution, and how the imperialist powers have not
won. Yes, says Fidel in the end, things are tense, but he is not offering a
solution, just marking his time in power.
 Wether this is true or not is not for me to say, but one thing is clear. It
has affected the lives of many in the streets, and prevented them from
living to the best of their abilities. It has curtailed educational chances,
and potential gains in that system, by not providing chances, and instead,
infusing these hopes with lies and deceit.
 Gustavo, one night meets Yolanda, at a rock concert, where his brother's
band is playing their version of Metallica hard rock. The concert gets
busted and broken up, of course, but Yolanda and Gustavo have met. And they
seem to be falling genuinely in love. He is considered the "new man" in the
cuban revolution, and his teacher has hopes for him. Alas, these hopes are
false, and it takes a while before Gustavo wakes up to it.   They do agree
on one thing. To not discuss politics. Gustavo believes in the system,
since it has done him good, while Yolanda is less interested in these
things, although we are not told why at the time.
 What ensues is a tangled mess, a web of destruction of the human spirit in
every form imaginable. Gustavo's brother is on a war path, and decided that
injecting himself with aids tainted blood is his solution to the motto that
he abhors. And Gustavo is seeing his own beliefs in the system crumbling
moment by moment.  His own father, a psychiatrist, ends up playing piano in
a bar, where he makes ten times his wage.
 But the pressures of every day are getting to Gustavo. Yolanda is beginning
to take on to others, since her boyfriend is not interested in her  any more
than he is in his ideals, everything he was brought up to believe. And this
gets Gustavo to go and discuss things with his brother, who is in an aids
camp. And the unbelievable moment in the film happens here... Bobby says
that he must be in paradise talking about life to people that are dead.  The
outcast, have a life after all, and it is not bad. It may not know how to
say it too well, but it has a point. And this is the turning point of the
film. Gustavo decided to go and marry Yolanda. But there is a problem, now.
Gustavo's main reason for not marrying Yolanda before was that he was going
to Prague to school, a promise that his teacher had made at his graduation,
a reward for his scholastic achievements. But now, Yolanda has found a way
out with her mother. If he wants to marry her, he has to do it in Miami,
because she is leaving in the early morning.
 She leaves. And he is seen at a rally where Fidel Castro is delivering
another of his notable addresses to the country. Gustavo's hopes are gone,
nothing that he has been promised has ever come true, and he sees the
emptiness in Fidel's words. He undertakes to do something about it. He
happens upon a security guard's gun, and goes after Fidel, and a
sharpshooter kills him on the way to the podium. The film ends with the note
that he was said to be a "traitor to the revolution" and that Yolanda and
her mother got intercepted by the US Coast Guard and are now living in New
Jersey..... and we are sitting here crying and stunned.
 There are not many films that can speak so much, in so little time as this
one does. It keeps the story simple, and hopeful, until all the hopes
becomes shattered one by one.... not just Gustavo's, but everyone else's
including the lying teacher, whose own family is in Miami. His own father
had been asked by his wife to leave before the revolution but he thought
things would get better... here they were, steeped in lies, and shit.
 While this film flows, it does not let on early that it is the political
causes that are hurting people, but it ends with a massive bang, and closes
the curtains before you can say anything. It is brilliantly directed, and
shot in black and white, which is an interesting statement in itself. B&W is
the "old" style and film. And by doing this, Leon Ichaso, can easily say
that YES, the revolution may have had a few good points, but the days of the
good points are gone, and it is time a system wakes up. With a film like
this, one could hardly disagree.
 Excellent film, with unbelievable music all over, it really deserves a
larger audience, so people can get a better idea of what closed political
systems really do to their people. The middle east is full of these kinds of
situations.... I like it in the black and white it was shot.... but would
have loved to see it in color...
Reviewed by Pedro Sena. Ygdrasil's Film Newsgroup
Copyright (c) Pedro Sena 1997. All Rights Reserved.

Title
Review for Corsa dell'innocente, La (1992)
There are films that are done just for fun.  And then there are films that
are made to make a point.  And once in a while you get a film that is much
more than a film.  It is not only a meaningful exercise in the use of the
cotton celluloid, but one of those moments when the human spirit and
strength stands out, in such a way, that is truly magnificent.  And
rewarding.  And despite all the drawbacks, all the bad times, there is
something to be said for those who have the will, and the inner strength to
survive.  The child is this poignant, and sad, story, is just such a one.
Amidst the Italian wave of kidnappings of children ( the innocent ) for
extortion of the richer parents, some make it, some don't.  The majority
does not.  And the extortions continue.
The film starts out with what appears to be a vengeance murder of some sort.
The retaliation ends up getting the whole family killed, with the exception
of the young boy, who manages to outwit the killers.  And he hides in the
countryside, and ends up in
various spots. some of which have been places where other children
previously  abducted have met their ill fated death.  This child happens to
find a backpack of one of the dead children and takes off with it.  And he
sets about getting to the whereabouts of this dead child's family.
The story takes him to Rome, where he ends up in the house of a cousin, who
is also involved in the mess, and gets himself killed as well.  The kid,
disappears again, but this time he came up, by accident with the loot from
another extortion.  The kid makes his way to where he wanted to go.  And all
is well, and seems to be working alright.  He stops by a harmless kid soccer
game in the street, and eventually sneaks his way into the well to do
family's house, and the dead child's room.  Eventually the mother discovers
him, and in her emotional state, she thinks that this is the right child.
The father realizes it's not.  And there is another phone call saying that
the father should bring the money with him to exchange for the child. The
kid sneaks in the car and goes with the father.  The rest of the story I
will leave with you all, because it is a magnificent story of the strength
of the human spirit, and its ability to do the right thing.
There are many outstanding moments in this film.  It treats the visionary
aspect of the character's mind with respect.  And it helps use that ability
to keep the young man alive.  As if saying that those who use those
abilities will make it.  Those who do not
are bound to be hurt.  During a train ride, the kid gets his face caressed
ever so gently by a young child, the appearance of which recalls immediately
a guardian angel.  The smile of this little girl pretty much says it all.
This kid is blessed, and will make it, somehow.
Despite the gruesomeness  of the film, it is violently brutal, and
intentionally so, the child has grown to become a much stronger entity.  Be
it based on a slight amount of fear or not, the resiliency with which this
kid works and thinks is quite above average.  A product of a system that is
threatening kids like him, he manages to transcend it, and take it to
another level.
Few films will do something so powerful, and yet so magnanimously great.  It
isn't a film that was made to be a super hit, or to tell people that
something is really screwed up.... mainly GREED.  But it does so, by just
being who it is, rather than preach, and that is a small treasure in its own
right.
In the middle of it, there are many humanitarian moments, and odd ones.  The
church getting caught in the middle is an example of the helplessness that
many adults feel.  The priest does what he can.  The rest is providence, and
not much that he can do about it.  But there are those who really defy the
odds, even if innocently so.
The victory is one to remember, and one of those films that just forces many
of us reviewers to run for their keyboards. If you don't you just ain't
human enough.
Absolutely outstanding film, despite its sad content.  Extremely violent,
but concise, and clear, in how it deals with it's violence.  Those that are
in it for the brutality of it, get
it the harshest.  The rest seem to fall innocently.
If you can stand it, and appreciate the victory of the power of beauty and
right, this film is for you.  If it is simple entertainment you crave, go
for a swim somewhere else.  This
is a film for the strong.
5 GIBLOONS
(c) Copyright Pedro Sena 1994. All Rights Reserved
Member of the Internet Movie Critics Association

Title
Review for Richard III (1995)
Shakespeare has rarely been displayed on the screen so well. It might do the
bard proud.
This version of the play, is really what West End has been about with
Shakespeare that film has not come to yet, or only recently has it gained
the guts to recreate the stories. And it takes a staple of actors willing to
share the vision, to make it come about. This is riveting Shakespeare
at its very best, taken to the x-factor, to display even better, the
rudeness and the beauty of its characters, villains included.
The story of Richard III is not new. The bastard king that killed his way to
the throne, one day, eventually, finds himself on the wrong end of the
stick. But what makes this special is the time period that it was created,
and what becomes a serious attack on the British crown, in a subtle way,
that really states, that the English also are guilty of the same stuff....
we know they were, even if Shakespeare is the only one that will describe
the events. The history books seem to soften things up.
In this version, it is a sort of pre Nazi area, that to this reviewer  could
just as easily be Germany, as it was in England. There is, and there
was, no less manipulation in the golden years of the English crown.
But if the story is not enough, what the actors do in this play is worth the
price of admission. Few will actually think of this as a movie, though,
for it is a "play" and it works like it, and not as a smooth film story
that Hollywood would ever touch. But the bits that Hollywood would enjoy,
that the play has, like the asides, really are what makes this film so
enjoyable. We see Richard at his villainous best, and the line delivery
is comparable to Sir John Gielgud's lines in PROSPERO'S BOOKS, another film
that takes Shakespeare to a level that is way and above its own abilities on
a stage.
With some riveting acting, by Ian McKellen, this film is very good, and,
really, off the wall. I almost would prefer to see this on the stage, so
that I can give it a standing ovation, which it merits. But, in no way, does
it mean that the rest is not well done. Annette Benning, as the bought off
queen is very good, as is the rest of the cast.
Excellent production, but don't go see it if you like traditional
Shakespeare, or you will be disappointed. Other than that it is magnificent,
and fresh.   Would love to see "The Merchant of Venice" done this way....

Title
Review for Danzón (1991)
Danzon is one of those films that is actually pretty nice, although you
wonder what it is getting at.  It dedicates much time and attention to the
little things that make a good dance, or dancers, and to the
sensuality necessary to make it work between two partners.  But Julia, has
not only lost that partner, she has also lost what could be her one and only
special love, although it isn't clear that the lost
partner is her lover at all, although she would wish him to be.
After winning many dance contests with this man, she is now troubled because
he has disappeared.  And she starts looking for him.  And gets teased
miserably by her friends in the process.  Her chase
leads to a different town where she ends up caught up in a small  pair of
lies, and also has an affair with a younger man, who works in one of the
boats, she thinks her lover has gone, or has he.?
When the time comes for her to accept that she is running out of funds and
can no longer stay in this town, she leaves her younger  love, leaving him
in the same predicament that she was left with before she came here.  And
when she returns, her partner is there, and silently takes her and they
dance, what is obviously a very smooth combination..... still not clear
wether he is her lover or not, but it is clear that they move very well
together.
The film is slow, and the music is the Mexican variety used in the dance
halls, and is not what we might like to appreciate, but it is the
background, with very nice and romantic touches of what
appears to be a very well designed film about dancing..... though we wonder
if the chemistry is about sensual pleasures, or more than that.... Julia is
about more than that, as is her partner, even if they are not connected.
Very interesting film, slow at times, and very subtle.... all the ship names
at port have a hopeless ideal in love, and the lyrics in the many songs in
the film are shown in the sub titles as a meaningful
way for Julia to think.  Not a great film, but a very nice film that is very
slow developing, but the main character's desire and acting ability just
keeps us tied to it... and curious to find out what will
become of it all.

Title
Review for Bande des quatre, La (1988)

FILM TITLE:       La Bandes de Quatre
DIRECTOR:      Jacques Rivette
COUNTRY:        France 1988
CINEMATOGRAPHY:  Caroline Champetier
MUSIC:              Claudio Monteverdi
CAST:                Laurence Cote, Fejria Deliba, Bernadette Giraud, Bulle
Ogier, Nathalie Richard, Benoit Regent, Ines de Medeiros
SUPER FEATURES:  The filming style is excellent.
The great thing is getting a chance to see this film maker's work. The sad
thing is that seeing his work means that one has to put up with people
complaining about another director who does not care about his reputation as
a commercial film maker, and only does what he pleases and wishes to see and
learn about.
As one gentleman in the bathroom said, "the French don't make movies, they
make talkies ...". I never felt that "talkies" were a condition that made a
film bad, but it is by some standards where the "action" content tends to
take down the quality of the words and their meanings, into quick ditties
and idiotic lines, in lieu of CONTENT. Unfortunately for American audiences,
Jacques Rivette is totally CONTENT.
La Bande des Quatre, is not so much a "film" per se, as it is a real
advanced acting exercise, for any actors in training and learning. The
advanced side of acting is very explosive, and tends to tap into one's
personal life, something that various acting teachers, do not think should
be mixed with life itself, as it tends to confuse things, rather than help.
And in this story, most of the ladies are affected and they tend to copy
their experience first, and create another idea for the staging, second. We
do the same thing in life, don't we ... we take the easy way, rather than
think through to something else.
And during the 2 and three quarter hours, of what is a slow film, a story is
created, since the girls mostly are friends and live in the same house,
regarding one of their mates who is involved in what appears to be a rather
serious affair that is hitting the French news casts. This adds to the
ladies' ability to inter act on stage, but the teacher Constance ( Bulle
Ogier ) makes sure that the girls do it right, rather than fall into their
everyday mentality, which is not what acting in theatre is about at all.
This fine line, is difficult for anyone, audiences specially, as it is a
subtlety that is rarely seen, more often than not mis-understood, and
vilified by most commercial pundits. It forces a director to maintain the
focus on the actor and person, and this is something that audiences are not
ready for, and never have been ... PATIENCE. It is too easy to criticize
something special, and specific, which 99.9% of film is not about. The other
percent, are the ones that create the new styles, invent new things that
push the envelopes in the creative form of the arts, and in this case, film.
Mike Leigh, with "Naked" and "Secrets & Lies" does a similar thing, although
he ties it to a story a lot more. Rivette's style is a bit of the film noir
style, and the story may even take second place here, and not be important,
compared to what is really happening, another tough thing for film watchers
and their seriousness, to accept and follow up on.
Much of the subtleties in this film are lost in the translations. Horrible
sub-title goofs, eat away at the fabric of the sensitivity of what Constance
is discussing in a rehearsal scene, and this is tough on the film. The
points come off jaded, and pushy, rather than serious and meaningful, which
as an acting and directing major, I can tell you, is MOST important, in
helping direct a person into a spot where they are creative and free, with
the association with their character. Still, a lot of it makes it through,
and the girls, one by one, are seen improving their delivery of the lines
into a more cohesive set of moments, in their rehearsing whichever work they
are doing. Underlying much of this was the actor's ability to stay with
their lines, and know them ( memorize them ), which is something that
Constance hammers on the actresses. We do not often do our homework in life.
Other than that, the film has some unusual touches, many of which I believe
tend to detract from the real meat of the product. Various scenes of the
city from various places, mostly the moving metro train, seem to indicate
that life moves on, a slight lesson to the actresses in this film, but a
rather un-needed point to make. I tend to think that this diminishes the
quality of the film, but perhaps at the time, one may have felt the need to
justify one's movements, so that an audience can see what one is doing. I do
not believe this is necessary, and later, in LA BELLE NOISEUSSE, Rivette did
not compromise one inch of film at all to make his opus. In this respect, La
Bande des Quatre, displays a nice foretelling of this director's ability and
body of work.
Magnificent film, with Bulle Ogier's style of acting really neat and well
defined, and often showing the girls how one can really deliver a line.
Calm, cool and collected is the word, in the face of "action, lights,
camera", something which the acting students are trying to learn.

Title
Review for Gazon maudit (1995)
French sex farces can be hell. Well, for American audiences, anyway.
Unlike the American attitudes towards sex, France seems to take a more
lackadaisical attitude towards it, and by doing so, it is able to create
films like this one. And this type of situation, is not one that the
majority of America, away from the big cities, is likely to appreciate on
any  level, least of all a sexual competitive situation.
But if one can get out of the inner turmoils that religion, or any form of
idealism can add to a relationship, then this film is funny and spends more
time discussing the commitments that people make to themselves and each
other, than it does anything else. And in this case, the two people who are
better decided on their sexual preferences are the ones that seem to do
better.... well, they are also the two extremes in this story.
A married couple finds themselves with a guest, who happens to be gay. And
she wastes no time making friends of the wife. As the film wears on, the
wife is enjoying her probably as much as the husband, but there is one
problem. The opposites are trying to create problems for each other, by
confusing the woman in the middle. The husband is having to swallow his male
ego, and the woman is having to swallow her female ego. Caught in between,
of course, is the one that can not make a decision, and can not figure out
what she really wants to do. On one hand she has a family and husband, and
on the other she wants to better fulfill the sedate life that she obviously
has been a part of.
As the film moves on, it really becomes a sort of boring farce, and all the
characters are getting worn down. No one can win the battle, and no one is
prepared to lose it. And when one has a victory, the wife feels guilty and
moves in the other direction.
This film might have been better suited, and accomplished its aims, if the
director might have placed someone else in the role of the woman that comes
in between the married couple. Her staying in the middle of it all, is
really a problem in that the film never really provides an objective enough
choice for anyone... these are always subjectively made emotional decisions,
which at least the film shows that can not be good and long term
decisions... that is, they don't last. A director on the outside checking it
as she goes along, might have made the film less emotional and at the same
time more interesting... as it is at this point, it is just a farce, with
many bumbling and crazy decisions, that no one seems to have any desire to
hold up, which, for this reviewer, just makes the whole thing more
confusing... what's the point? Lead a mix-married life?
Funny film in that the situations are crazy, and the characters are crazier
still... other than that, don't take the whole thing too serious, as I don't
think it is meant to be.
3 GIBLOONS
Copyright (c) Pedro Sena 1997. All Rights Reserved.
Member of the Internet Movie Critics Association

Title
Review for Remains of the Day, The (1993)
The best the English have to offer, is not always a technical piece, but one
can never, ever, fault the outstanding performances that one gets when one
see an Ivory & Merchant piece of work.  They just have the
innate ability, perhaps it is novelist Ruth Prawler Jhabala's talent, to
come up with some pieces that just tear your heart into watching something,
even if it is the downfall of an anthill.
THE REMAINS OF THE DAY is just such a piece. One realizes that there isn't
much that is going to happen, except the end of the old fashioned standards,
and yet, we see the valiant servant and butler do his very
best, despite the most unfortunate odds, and pressing of situations.
In the process the butler, and the leader of all the servants hires a woman
that has a bit of the independent spirit, but is capable nonetheless.  And
she proceeds to help make the house run a bit more efficiently, so Stephens
can concentrate on his duties.  In the middle of it, we see him show what
makes him so special to any lord that owns the mansion.  He is the mansion.
Be it a politically sensitive situation, or just serving yet another drink
to a guest on a fox hunt, the ever faithful servant who never loses sight of
his job, manages to maintain his position, and those of his master.
But he has a failing.  His job is so important to him, that he never has the
time to check into the chances he has to meet Mrs. Kenton, whom he has come
to like, but his position will not allow him to do anything with.  It just
isn't his priority, it seems.  And in the end, with a new tenant, he takes a
trip, and tries to lure Mrs. Kenton back to the fold, but she is married,
has come to appreciate her situation, and now her daughter is on the way to
have a child, which prevents her from joining the lonely Stephens, and help
once again to make the mansion run as smoothly and efficiently as ever.
Anthony Hopkins, once again, shows why he is such a master actor. His
portrayal of the aging butler, who is very much in control of his faculties,
is a pleasure to watch.  Even when in the midst of very sensitive political
discussions he manages to keep his opinions to himself, and show himself a
truly exceptional servant in every
way.  His lord seems to have some affiliations to the Nazis in a business
sense it seems, and although it is becoming a fast, and harsh fact, he still
manages to pour yet another cup of tea, and not discuss anything of a
political nature.
Later, a brash American business politician retires to the same household.
Earlier, in a meeting of the minds, the senator had made comments that
displaying his unpopularity in this very formal group of upper crustaceans.
But he had an idea of what the future might bring, rather than accept the
norm of the present at the time.  His brashness may have made him unpopular
with the other guests, but it signaled the change of the guard as well.
Stephens has it all, like they all do, but he has no sense of personal
living, or appreciation for life as a normal man would. This is the part
that the subtle Mrs. Kenton provides, although never passes past the point
of asking Stephens why he does not display his feelings.  by the time he
does, he can no longer connect with the woman he might have loved as
faithfully as he does his master.
It's hard not to enjoy this VERY SMOOTH film, and fail to appreciate the
nature of the acting.  It is blended smoothly with very gentle angles, and
never uses the camera as an intrusive detail of the story.  It stands aside
and shows us how live moves, and lives, and in Stephens' case, how it is
served.
Beautifully conceived, with exceptional dialogue, and very well written
exchanges that never reach a boiling point in the most extreme, and
sensitive of situations.  Few films will ever stand up as well as this one
does.  Pure, and true literature of film, if there ever was anything of the
kind.  They should teach things like this to film makers.

Title
Review for Fantôme de la liberté, Le (1974)
There are a lot of films, in the course of history of film that have stood
up, for many reasons. Some of them are radiant stories, some of them are
vivid adventures, some of them are acting showcases. I think we should add
another element to this list. A non-story, or in the Godard'ian sense, a
non-film. But one that speaks so much in so many ways, that it is even hard
to classify it.
Luis Bunuel, must have gotten to the point where he was tired of telling a
story, and decided to make a film that had no story per se, just events,
that somehow came together, by whatever circumstances. And in doing so, he
creates a film that is really free, but as the title suggests, it is also
not free,  because its characters, are trapped all the time. Thus the nice
title, the "phantom" of liberty, or the illusion of liberty. When it comes
right down to it, none of his personages, in his 45 years of film making,
are ever
free in any way, regardless of the fact that some of them feel that they
are free. There is always behind it all an underlying "reason", or
"organization", that somehow ends up messing things up.
Is there a story to this film? Well, it doesn't matter if there is or not,
but for all intents and purposes, this film is really one about discussing
the social mores that we are so accustomed to. And for Luis Bunuel to be
able to do so the way he wanted, he may have to create a situation, or a
sequence of situations,  that allowed him to move from moment to moment,
without  having to deal with any character's emotional catharsis. And of
course, when this freedom is decided upon, the rest is a total surrealistic
nightmare for any character in the film. Starting with the husband that is
having
nightmares, and can not make sense of anything, from a rooster, to a
mailman, to a peacock, to a woman, that appear in his dream. So much for
liberty and freedom, it seems... we are trapped regardless. We will always
create something to entrap ourselves in, a familiar theme going way back to
Los Olvidados, and even further.
But the thing that makes this film so special, is the premeditated
hypocrisies that people get themselves involved in, and the social mores
that tend to circle those things. In specific is the searing attack on our
dinner behavior, or maybe we should say, our privy room's behavior. The
reversed situations create immediately an amazing juxtaposition that makes
this film weird, and hilarious at the same time.
>From that point on, the film ends up taking up a Police Chief and his
adventures all the way to the end of the film. In the process he is also
caught having delusions about his long dead sister, and then turning right
around, he goes with the Police Commander ( France uses to, one a policeman
and the other a civilian ) to the zoo, where they end up overseeing a
violent and bloody riot, where their feelings towards death is who cares,
and they order the police to shoot at will. This savagery, combines earlier
with a mass murderer, who killed people at will, was convicted to death, and
is immediately freed, where he is immediately mobbed for autographs, and
then walks out in the street.
It is really difficult to see Luis Bunuel's point, away from the individual
point of view for each character. But one thing is for sure in his last ten
years. He was less pre-occupied with his character's inner feelings, and
decided to take on the institutions that gave him a hard time, most notably
the church, so well known for its hypocrisies in Europe, but still looked at
as saintly in America, or having some "values". And here the group of
priests that appear earlier, are smoke totting card gamblers, who are using
coins that have a virgin in it ( old roman coins I think ), for money as
they gamble the night away, until a couple with some very personal
enjoyments decides to show them all off. One up them as it were.
It is really difficult to discuss this film, and its many "symbols".
Everything is a symbol in this film, every line, and every moment is some
kind of act that will display the total opposite of its nature. And Luis
Bunuel, decides that this opposite is worth exposing.
One thing is for sure. Other than the very off beat stuff that Peter
Greenaway is doing these days, there are not many film makers that are
taking the art form into another era or level. And film makers like Luis
Bunuel, are  really missed for it. By comparison, many films today, some 23
years later,  are made just for symbolic junk, rather than a serious
question about what each person is and sees, both to himself and herself,
much less adding to it their connection with the social order, which is the
real kicker.
A magnificent film, although a nightmare for top ten enthusiasts, because
its action is not in the screen... it's action is in us trying to put it all
together, and that's just the beginning.
A should see for film students, and enthusiasts.

Title
Review for Swimming to Cambodia (1987)
Stage shows do not translate very well to film....
But then again, there are certain things you can not exactly put on film, or
on the stage, for that matter.
Spalding Grey, all by his lonesome, has an attitude about the stories he
tells us that are a t first weird, then get better, and then, they hook us
into laughing.  This whole thing is actually one man's view of his
experiences in Vietnam, and the various incidents and accidents that
happened, even when he was an actor on the set of the film THE KILLING
FIELDS.  And the adventures go from totally crazy, to being far out, to 'you
got to be kidding me...' and then some.
For a one man show, this is excellent, it really doesn't get any better than
this.  It has an easy setting, and is augmented by some very good music by
the artist Laurie Andersen, and well co-ordinated by the  director to keep
us as in tune as possible.
There are some incidents that aren't pleasant, but then, the description of
the events comes off so surrealistic, that it is difficult to distinguish
where the event stopped and the writer started with his literary license.
And license, he does take.  From the discussions of the beach Hiltons and
the holidays with bullets a la carte to the prostitutes and their ways about
the foreign men, who paid them better than any job might in a whole year, of
course, if there were jobs... after all this was a war, and the jobs were
non existent.
But amidst all this, there is at least one man scared out of his wits, and
his comic demeanor manages to save the day on occasion.  It is all somewhat
of a distant memory of Spike Milligan's wonderful stories about his part in
the fall of Hitler, and Hitler's part in Spike's downfall.
An evening of delightful entertainment awaits you if you get to see this
oddity of a show.  It isn't an action movie.... unless you have
the imagination to be sooooo active.  And for some of us, there are a few
visual aids to help us figure out what he is talking about, which at times
is a problem.
Extremely fast paced, it gives you no breaks at all. Worth seeing, as a
reminder, that even if we make mistakes, we not only
can learn from them, we can also laugh..... and cry.

Title
Review for Dracula (1992)
Dracula films, have always been on the edge of showing people what exactly
they feared in their time.  During the BELA LUGOSI era, the film dealt with
the shadows and things that just seemed to lurk everywhere, which would
scare people, specially when film was such a new adventure.  By the 50's and
60's when we were introduced to the awesome battles between CHRISTOPHER LEE,
and PETER CUSHING, the films begun to take on a new tone, that of the gory
details of death, and the more sexually promiscuous side of things.  And for
the 90's, the film story has progressed from the gory and the specially
disgusting, to the elements which we understand very little of, but which
are a big part of it all.  This Dracula, has desires, and his shadow lives
them, right in front of us, though these bits are subtle, but obvious.  He
also has something which the novel does not get into.  He is now a full
story, a true love story, as opposed to an evil entity, who has an acute
thirst for life.
The novel by Abraham Stoker, is exceptional, in that it is a series of diary
letters between Jonathan Harker, Lucy and Mina Murray.  And what brings
Dracula to London, is not quite clear, since the story is never seen from
the Count's point of view.  This film, almost exclusively, lets us know the
story from the Count's feelings, and what has led him to London, which was
undoubtedly his inner feeling that he had to move, only to discover that the
reason to move to London was because the incarnation of his beloved is the w
oman who is about to marry the real estate agent who is closing the deals on
Carfax Abbey.
All of a sudden we have a love story, and when the injured Count finally
asks his beloved to 'save' his life, she does, and releases him to the
spheres.  The new problem is that Mina will not be able to have
a satisfying life with her beloved, but the chances that a sequel will
follow are nil, and none.  The Count's tale is over, though he has not been
able to meet up with his beloved as he wished.
In many ways, it was a sign of things to come, if this were the novel that
Abraham ( Bram ) Stoker wrote.  The lessons of love are no longer dependant
on the past lives, and the beings merely interact without thought to
anything else.  Were they able to do so, their lives would be fulfilled and
much more satisfying than what is evident.
In between, the film pretty much dwells on the part of the Count which we
can least explain, or understand.  The novel always suggested his bat, wolf,
and mist life ( quite a shaman ), but never could delve very much into it.
This film, unlike the previous ones, gets into it full blast, even if it
isn't quite right.  Lucy is being ravaged in a dream stupor, by a being that
looks like a wolf, and she is enjoying it.  The feral Count is insatiable,
and does what it has to, so it can get to his real target, which in this
film is Mina.
The other well done thing in this film, is that it finally, for the first
time, looks at the country side, and London, as it may have appeared, at the
time of the turn of the century, rather than the almost/quasi
medieval look which it always had in the many films prior to this one.  We
see the trains, and a much more modern London, with an upper class  that is
entering the 20th century, rather than earlier in time.  And this upper
crust of a class has some education, and is less driven by emotional
standards, which the other films worked on in detail.   Lugosi's film
appears very dated.  Lee's films always had a bit of the  18th and 19th
centuries feeling to them and never delved beyond that.  ( I have never
found the Spanish version of DRACULA with CHRISTOPHER LEE, which is said to
be 100% like the book, with absolutely no deviations.. directed by the famed
director Mario Bava. )
With an excellent cast, and well directed, this film is actually less scary
than it is beautiful to watch.  Excellent music replaces the shock horror
classic music of the likes of Charles Martell and company that always scared
us in the Hammer Films.  And a superb costume and make up job, keeps us very
much wondering what will come next, which is actually a pleasant surprise
next to the other films.  And yes, unlike the previous films, there is also
a bit more skin to be shown in this film.  But it is well done, and never
mis-used.

Title
Review for Immortal Beloved (1994)
Few people liked this film, either for the music or for the story. How dare
a film maker make a genius look like such an idiot, and not act like the
great composer and bad person that he can be/was.
Like AMADEUS, and many of the other films that have been done about any
composer in the past, there are a few literary licenses in this story, but,
there is very little else that is implausible or not well done.  while
scholars may disagree as to Anton Schindler's
whereabouts and doings, the film decides that a nice little story, however
far fetched is may be, is better than two over weight professors discussing
the merits of the thirteenth bar in the Adagio of the Third Symphony.  And
like AMADEUS, we see the story in retrospect, through the story telling of
his own son.  And he is the real story.
Beethoven left his estate to the mother of his son, but he had a hard time
admitting, and let anyone else know that it was his own brother's wife, with
whom he had an affair prior to her leaving for his brother.  He never
recovered from that, specially when they knew the child was his.
And much of the music seems to be designed around the life story of the
growing of this child.  In the meantime, Anton is searching for Beethoven's
Immortal Beloved, the woman he wrote some poetry and much music about.  And
some of his paramours, and various patrons of the arts, do not really know
who she is.  All they know is that he always leaves for her, whoever she is.
If anything, Bernard Rose's story gives us a nice ending, to the story that
has gone unforgiving and forgotten for so very long.  What triggered this
man to write so much, and so well, given his terrible condition and curse of
deafness in the field of
listening.
Gary Oldman is excellent as Beethoven, as are all the women in the film.
And the music is beautifully directed around the events, or otherwise. It
comes in and goes out quietly, and teaches Hollywood one thing it can not
do.  Choreograph real soundtracks with meaningful stories.   We know that
these two go together, and it is many people's opinions as to how they
should.  The invisible part is how it all got written behind all the anger.
Hollywood only uses fill-ins.  It hasn't had a real composer since Bernard
Herrman, whose music could be considered better than any movie ever made.
The same is the case here.
The music isn't worshipped. It is just played and mixed and matched to the
various people. And the result is excellent.  Even if the story may not be
true.  Who cares.  It still is a very good film with excellent acting and
costumes.

Title
Review for Castaway (1987)
Of all Nicholas Roeg's films, there is one that stands out very nicely and
shows that you don't have to say and do something meaningful to make a film
that is very good, and get the same things across.
CASTAWAY, is pretty much like that.  A simple story, that in itself is
meaningless, but as a whole, it is important, because it is about the way we
relate to each other, before, during and after all the games we play just to
communicate with each other.
A reasonably well to do gentleman wants to go spend a year in a desert
island, and he places an advertisement for a lover for that year in the
'paradise island'.  In comes Lucy, a very independent woman, who decides for
her own reasons that the idea is an exciting event for her own growth.  She
wants to do this for herself, not for another person. And off they go to the
island paradise.  Because of the English and island laws, they are forced to
'marry' so they can get their passports in order.  And to the chosen island
they finally arrive.  It really is a paradise of sorts.
For the duration of the year, the two manage to withstand each other, amidst
personal crisis, and territorial problems with each other. They learn to
fish and what they can eat.  Things get tough, and Gerald is getting
diseased feet, and she is losing weight.  And he is even more disappointed
in her because she does not live up to her 'marriage' agreement, by denying
him sex.
The film is a veritable gourmet of visual images, aided by a few lines here
and there.  In between there is more tension that a bunch of shark infested
waters.  And the camera never takes sides, although in the end, Lucy's
decision to leave after her one year is up, is looked at as a cop-out, but
she has her reasons.  She has experienced what she wanted to try, and is
finished.  Gerald has dedicated himself to this lifestyle, and has pretty
much left the social milieu behind, although he does now mix in with the
indigenous cultures in various other islands.  He has become an important
fixture in their lives because he can fix the old boat engines, and has a
mechanical ability which few are capable of.
Beautifully photographed, with very fun moments. ( " Isn't it better than
sex " says Gerald about an imaginary meal he is talking about ) .  Amanda
Donohoe is excellent, and not self conscious in a role which is not
convertible to all, and to someone like Oliver Reed, who is known to be a
rebel rouser. Even he, locked up in an island to make a film, seems like an
odd thing.  But both of them are excellent, and really show a lot more
acting ability and communication than most people will ever have in their
own lives.
And it is the type of film that I personally wish Nicholas would do much
more of.  Like WALKABOUT ( 1972 ), it just does its thing  without having to
say very much.  It just speaks for its own actions, rather than have to
hammer us with meaningful situations, which are more showy than they are
helpful.  And a lot of it may be
because the diary which this is based on, is an extensive study of two
people's minds, which really helps the story develop.  We already have the
changes, and the actors only have to play them. And I think the independent
Ms Irvine, would even enjoy the film, maybe even Gerald, if ever a film
theatre would moke it to the
'end of the world'.

Title
Review for Shadowlands (1993)
It's nice to see a literary tradition taken over by a film community that
respects it.  The American literary tradition is usually based on how many
millions it sold, not anything in the past.
As is the case of the Ismael/Merchant group, this is another excellent
example of what loving an art, and an expression can do for any film. C. S.
Lewis has provided some beautiful stories that have been made into film.
None of them stand out so beautifully as this one, that pretty much explains
how a writer, and thinker, works.  The words have meanings.  The dialogue
speaks.  And the film floors you.
C. S. Lewis was a writer and lecturer at Oxford in England.  And he was able
to maintain the usual Oxford tradition for many years, until one day he
reads a letter about an American woman that had a dream about him.  And she
comes to England to visit him, and see what the old world has to offer.
Their relationship is nothing but a friendship, until she leaves back to
America. A respectful relationship that displays a few things that affect
Jack's methods of teaching.  The student that gets criticized
in one of his classes turns out to be a real writer in the midst of them.
He knows why he reads.  The other students do not.  All of a sudden, Jack's
life is the same way.  And the American woman has returned and drops in one
of his many lectures and sermons.  They meet again.  She is in a dilemma.
And to help her, they marry on paper, just so she will not be deported with
her child.  And one day, it is learned that she has cancer on her right leg.
Even though the new treatments of the day were rough, they managed to keep
her alive.  Jack comes to understand something about love, and people, that
before only felt like words.  They remarry, this time meaningfully.
And as she gets worst, it is Jack that is catching the worst of it, and has
a hard time talking to her son.
The film ends amidst a sheer attack of beauty, the kind that Jack loved to
discuss with his students, and wrote about many times.
There are many love stories in film. And there are many of them in novel
form that have yet to be filmed.  But this one, is one that had film all
over written in it, and stands out as a very special moment, for a writer
that had a magnanimous heart, even if he is not remembered as such.  And it
took the wildness of an American woman to bring out the humanity in him.
The appreciation of it all.  The shine that much of his work has.
The performances by everyone in this work are excellent.  And the beauty
with which they are delivered is something to behold, even if one thinks the
film is very talky, which I do.  For once, even the talk grabs you full
tilt.  And you feel the power of words, that became one of Lewis' best known
trademarks. The poetic description of a moment.  His wife was gone, but the
feelings he learned were not.
A must see film, with a outstanding styles by both Anthony Hopkins and Debra
Winger.  If you miss this one, you just do not know how  to appreciate
anyone who really has some loving to share.  Few of us, the lucky few.  C.
S. Lewis, is one of them.  The performances here, are the other part of the
equation.

Title
Review for Gas Food Lodging (1992)
There are not many films that explore the way women interact.  Theatre tends
to bring out much of the emotional side of women, and rarely give us another
view of things.  Film tends to create dolls out of many women, and never
allow us to see them as anything but the pretty things that many women can
be.
Allison Anders has opted for something else.  This is more of a film  about
the interaction between a mother and her two daughters, than it is about
anything else.  How they get along, and how they last together, is the real
story.  This may seem that the story takes  a back seat to the many changes,
and sub plots which might take
place, but Allison seems right at home, and showing us how all three of them
get by, from day to day, even if nothing ever comes out of that one moment.
Nora has been left behind with two daughters, both in their teens, and now
trying to make friends and learn to live in a rather rough area in New
Mexico.  The mother has become a bit callused and bitter since her husband
walked out years before.  The oldest daughter has become an incarnation of
the mother, something which the mother doesn't like, but has to face
everyday.  And the younger daughter is becoming a total romantic, in a world
that has basically lost that feeling, except in the movies.  Trudi
spends much of her time checking out the films of a Mexican film star, whose
body of work is every woman role and predicament  that you could think of.
The ultimate silver screen soap opera star.  At least, the film seems to
point out, the character in those films is a real woman, and she fights for
her beliefs.
Quite a bit of this is found in all three women and their relationships,
although we might be more choosy about their getting along.  Shade ( the
older daughter ) finally finds someone she has come to love, but like
everything else, it moves on, and she is left pregnant. Trudi, finally gets
to know that young man that she has been facing all the time, and although
he is Mexican, he is nice, and not the generalized depiction that everyone
around her  thinks of them.  And the mother.... after a serious altercation
where she is told by the older daughter that she hates men, finally grows up
a bit from her anger, and learns to appreciate a little of life herself.
The intricate, and well done, thing in this film, is the way each character
moves, and goes about their daily lives.  The mother is always mothering,
and never enjoying herself.  She is basically unhappy as a person.  The
older daughter has been raped and is basically looking for love, and instead
gets the results of it thrown in her face, right or wrong. The young one,
takes her time, and at least seems to be better
adjusted than the other two.  She has a hard time, but she makes it.
The inter mechanics of these relationships adds a nice interplay for the
three actresses, while also showing something about the life in the areas of
the country where we might feel that there is none.  In most cases, the
women are grossly abused, and taken advantage of, but in several situations,
as the film points  out, there is the opportunity to learn, and develop into
something far worthier as a person.  The older daughter may not have
survived it as well, and it might be said that her fault was that she could
not figure out when to start and when to stop.  Both the mother and the
younger daughter take their time, and do not get involved in the sexual game
which obviously befell the mother in her younger days, and is hitting the
older daughter.
Maybe this is the point.  And some get hurt in the process. But, Allison's
point seems to be, how do you get strong out of your own infallibility....
Wonderful film to watch, despite its obvious short comings of  small budget,
it takes its time, and might even be considered a bit slow, but it is not
boring.  Life is not easy in many walks of life and some people do get hurt
in the process.  And the real strength, then, is about to appear.

Title
Review for Prospero's Books (1991)
BUT IS NOT WILLIE SHAKESPEARE FOR THE MASSES.
And in many ways, Shakespeare's works are perfect for the movie screen,
because his characters think, dream, and have visions, in other words, have
such a visual acuity, that it actually can be shown in the celluloid, where
it can not on the stage.  One can make all the wishes, dreams, and visions,
really  live in any character's mind--- and the play gets better and
stronger still.
And the way the director shows this freedom, is with as much nakedness as he
can get away with, under the boundaries of good taste, and possible
censorship.  The nakedness here is an excellent symbol of the freedom of
mind and word, which Prospero wants, and keeps under wraps at almost all
times. It is a really good analogy for the whole play, and one that most
people are afraid to tackle.  And Greenaway does, like no other.   And in
one film he manages to ditch down the drain all the good actors who were
capable of helping you see a truth through their perfect diction........and
done by a true master of diction himself, SIR JOHN GIELGUD.  It is truly
beautiful at times, and odd at others, but the end result, is an evening
that ends with one wondering what is it exactly that we have just seen, and
what exactly was it about, and how, and how does it all come together...???
All in all, the very thing which film has forgotten under the guise and
direction of people who only do and show entertainment, instead of art.
In his island, Prospero rules.  There he has all the arts to his disposal,
and the ability to make anything happen.  And there he also has the ability
to outgrow himself, thus making possible his ascension as a magician of good
capabilities, which is all well and fine within the confines of the play
itself.   And in this island every nymph, satyr, and angel that has ever
lived owes it to be a part of a man's vision.
The film moves back and forth between images and pictures from Renaissance
texts to actual image on the screen, thus also blending the creativity, and
avid curiosity, of a time that has appeared very boring in the history
books.  The books on magic and any kind of experimentation was plentiful,
and the likes of DaVinci, were a part of it.  And Prospero wants to be in
league with the best of them.
Aside from the fact that this film is really unusual, and not specially made
for everyone to see and learn about Shakespeare, it is without any doubt a
very serious, dare I say Busby Berkeley- like, show about the thinking
of a man who has much depth......and we are let into his chambers of mind
and depth, to learn about him, and his world.
I HIGHLY RECOMMEND THIS FILM IF ANYONE IS INTERESTED IN TRULLY MODERN
ADAPTATIONS OF SHAKESPEARE'S WORK.  IT IS EXCELLENT.  JOHN GIELGUD REALLY
DESERVES A MENTION FOR AN OSCAR AT LEAST........HE IS ONE OF THE VERY BEST,
and his eloquent delivery, so gentle, so powerful, so clear, will leave you
gasping....the words are so alive.....
THE BEST GREENAWAY FILM YET, and for once it isn't psychotic, or sickening.

Title
Review for Belle époque (1992)
Belle Epoque is a fun film to watch, but one better be prepared to get a
handle on the political jokes, or this film will simply come off as a bit of
a weird, and unusual story.  What really drives this film, is not the story,
or the lucky young man, but the political upheavals that even the family is
going through, from the father, to the daughters, and finally, the mother.
It is the story of a young man that deserts the army because it has gone
crazy on him, and is fighting too many political battles that don't make
sense at all.  And he wants out of it.  But his wanting out of it, only
lands him in a place where politics reigns supreme, even if not honorably.
When he is ready to leave the place he wound up in, he finds out that the
old man he has befriended has four daughters.  And he decides to stick
around.  In no time he makes himself helpful in the
household where he cooks up some specialties that everyone enjoys, from the
priest to anyone else, even if their politics are all screwed up.  At least
they agree on something.... food..... and well .... sex.
But what starts out as what might appear as a good intention on the young
man's part, becomes either a joke, or just another conquest. And everyone is
on a conquest, except Don Manolo.  And he is the
best part of the story, and the most interesting.  Surprisingly enough he is
the only not walking around thinking of sex.  Well for good reason, if we
can appreciate the fact that his own wife is also on a conquest.
But BELLE EPOQUE is a fun film to watch, as things turn so quickly and get
so mixed up that it is a wonder that worse things do not happen all the
time.  While well directed, with almost all the political stuff as throw
away lines and bits of comedy, Fernando Trueba's terrain seems to indicate
that the area of love is never to be mixed up with politics.  One of the
daughters lives a terrible ( is it.? ) mess because of it, but takes
advantage of it when it serves her.
Eventually Fernandp finds his match, well, the one that he got caught with,
anyway. And the film comes to a nice close.... nothing changed, it seems.
And politics are still alive and well. And maybe Juanito and Luz will make
it and have a better time for it. But after three sisters, this may take
some doing.
Unlike some other spanish films that take the political situations
seriously, this one makes a complete mockery of them, starting with Juanito,
who has a terrible problem with his mother.  But even their politics only
last as far as the guns seem to be aimed at certain political factions.  In
1931, and after the second world war, this was a serious problem.  Many
country folks did not take to the new system as easily as the town folks did
under the pointed guns.
BELLE EPOQUE is a fun film to watch and stay with, even if it appears to
drag here and there.  All the girls are interesting and everyone of them is
well defined as a character.
3.5 GIBLOONS
Reviewed by Pedro Sena. Ygdrasil's Film Newsgroup
Copyright (c) Pedro Sena 1995. All Rights Reserved.

Title
Review for Educating Rita (1983)
This film, when it was first made, was essentially a re-union between Lewis
Gilbert and Michael Caine, who both came upon the scene fifteen years
earlier, with ALFIE.
And the main thrust of the film, then, was the character that Michael Caine
was playing, which came off a bit as a modern day Restoration play, complete
with asides.
EDUCATING RITA, is a bit of the same, but the story, this time is not  about
a guy picking up women, or the proverbial middle class ageing stud
philosophizing about his successes and failures.  The character is now a
professor of poetry and literature, who has become bored with his own
teaching and his students.  In comes along a new student, an irish lady in
her twenties, who wants to learn something else about
life, other than the usual thing, get married and have kids, which her
boyfriend is pushing for.
And the well meaning, but generally drunk professor, is starting to enjoy
his tutorship of this spirited lady.  She doesn't have all the knowledge and
studies that all students do, but she has verve and nerve.  And she has
original ideas, actually, fresh ideas, with
a point of view that is more often than not ignored.
Eventually the professor does himself in, and the film has a chance to turn
into a love story, but it does not do so. Rita, has not gotten this far to
stop her studies now, and the film is not going to stop her.
This film, today, is better remembered as one where both leads were
nominated for the Best Actor and Best Actress awards.  They didn't win, but
their work is well remembered, even if Julie Walters has never really hit
the big time as she did in that film.
Wonderful showcase of acting, for both leads.  This is a really  good film,
that shows what a director can do when he helps his actors do their thing,
instead of creating a film that is about the crass of entertainment and
money that Hollywood usually creates.
Internet Movie Critics Association
Copyright (c) Pedro Sena 1995. All Rights Reserved.

Title
Review for Little Buddha (1993)
It's hard to dislike this film.  It's also hard to say that it is a
masterpiece.  But it is easy to say that the film has a nice touch,
something that is endearing, and lovely, and is not a pushy political film,
or religious whatnot.  Slow at the start, but very vibrant and moving, and
enjoyable later. Bernardo is the David Lean of our time.
One can not help thinking that unlike many other religions, this story of
the Tibetan Buddhism monks, and their lineage, is a very interesting one.
Unlike many religions, their sacred ground has been taken away.  And they
have been forced to co-exist against tremendous odds, and have managed to
withstand a lot.  They still thrive, and will forever prove that having it
in the heart is more important than having a country for a home.  But above
all, they will teach something that most do not see.  They have learnt to be
flexible, and to be a part of other lives, and styles.  How these things
will develop in time, is really what this film is about.
The story is simple.  A monk, in Seattle, happens to come across a child
that appears to have all the indications that he is one of the incarnations
of the leader, who is dying.  And the monks, are excited enough to have to
try and bring this child to their temporary home, to see how the child will
behave next to the other candidates, and how things will develop.
The start of the film is awkward, and a bit slow, if not bland, which may
have been intentional.  Seattle is a modern city, with its modern
inhabitants, and its modern everything.  But it is STILL.  Nothing moves.
There is no action.  All is un-exciting.  The lifestyle appears to be
illusory, and not real.  The colors are bland.  And the two parents ( Chris
Isaac and Bridget Fonda ) are approached by one local monk, and eventually
they are introduced to a Lama, the high representative of the group.  The
child shows every notion that he is indeed a great candidate.  He is alive
and curious about the story of Buddha which the monk is telling him through
a few books.  And the story comes alive for us.  A great example of how our
minds can be ever so much more lively than the reality  surrounding us.
The monks finally convince the couple to allow the child to come to Tibet,
for a period of time, for all the monks to see him interacting with everyone
else.  And maybe some incidental training along the way, depending on how
the parents allow it.
The couple is having a hard time, their life is beginning to fall apart, and
Dean is losing his job, and has to figure out how to salvage it all into
another job.  Perfect time to take a breather. He decides to go to Bhutan
with the child.  And the film changes completely.  All of a sudden there is
breath, life, space, and time.  Everything moves.  The monks breathe and we
can hear them. The children play and we can enjoy it.  The story of Buddha
finishes and the new story takes over.
The child is placed with a couple of other candidates for lamahood, a young
boy and a small girl.  Unlike Jesse, Raju has a bit of the Hindu upper class
crust in him, and the little girl is very much brought up by the same class.
They were prepared for all this and are expected to fulfill that role.
Jesse is more independent, but also less manipulated.  He enjoys his
freedom. The father, in the meantime is just watching life all around him.
He has become a non-character, it seems, in search of himself. He is still t
he father, and never too far away, but he seems to have gained a trust and
faith that he didn't show before.
Jesse is indeed the apparent incarnation that the monks have been looking
for.  And he is treated and revered as such.  The little boy hardly
understands any of this, but he has an aptitude to connect with some of the
monks that is rather nice to watch. The father and son leave for Seattle,
and on the story continues. A few subtleties, which are un-important to the
life of the film are shown, but even the mother does not realize it.  Jesse
says that he can hear his new brother.  The mother does not know yet if it
is a boy or girl that she is carrying.  End of story.
The prettiest thing in this film, hands down, is the acting ( well unfair to
call it that, but ... ) of Sogyal Rinpoche, a renown Lama and emissary of
the Tibetan Buddhist movement.  His character, no matter how similar to his
own duties, is a treat to watch,
undoubtedly a pleasant person regardless.  He is gentle, never forceful,
respectful, and very lively to watch with the children. And he has mastered
the character's inner strength to lead himself into the Bardo layers as he
is in the final moments of his stay
in the earth.  The suggestion is that Jesse will be the one carrying on his
knowledge.
Another magnificent thing in this movie is RYUICHI SAKAMOTO's score for the
film.  Outstanding music, beautifully designed and blending into the colors
of the film, in some quiet and subtle ways that just slowly crop up, and
start to make you feel it
all.  Truly beautiful music.  Few soundtracks are written with such care,
and design in mind. One gets the feeling that the scenery was built to
match.
And the last great thing in this film, is the cinematography of Vittorio
Storaro.  There is some magic about the way this man colors a Bertolucci
film, but perhaps it is the director that helps design it all.  It is truly
beautiful to watch.
Chris Isaac is good.  Keanu Reeves as Siddartha is also good, even if many
people have had a hard time seeing an American actor in this kind of a role.
And the monks are extraordinary.  One could only hope that the Catholic
counterparts showed this much poise, character, and beauty.

Title
Review for Before Sunrise (1995)
There is an attraction for this film, and it isn't the actors, although they
do very well.  It is Vienna.
The story centers around Jessie who seems to have lost out on a romantic
marriage with a Spanish woman.  He borders a train to Vienna where he is to
take a less expensive flight to the United States ( haven't heard this one
before.. ) and return home.  While en route he meets a young lady who is
also moving on.  Situations get strange on the train with a couple who is
having a bad day.  She switches seats and meets Jessie.  And he is in the
mood for something different, and romantic, before he leaves.  She accepts,
and despite her wants, they eventually decide that sex is not in the best
interest of the situation.
And they spend the whole night walking around Vienna talking about
themselves and their lives.  Nothing fancy. The film, here, takes on the
attitude of a spectator, and merely shoots the two as if they were another
monument in this city. And their discussion, while lacking the usual
dramatic stance of conflict, just seem to get along.  They manage to become
very good friends and perhaps meet again next year at a specified time. If
they do, that's when the story really will start.  Until then, this whole
thing seemed like a nice exercise in preparing actors for a performance.  It
doesn't feel ad-libbed, but it also does not  feel rehearsed.  The freshness
is nice, and the chemistry between the two comes off as very pleasant, and
enjoyable, making for a nice film, but one that may bore many a viewer, if
they are
expecting something to happen.
Beautifully filmed, and with a very nice touch for the background, this film
walks, much like the Kieslowsky films, but the comparison ends there.
3.5 of 5 GIBLOONS
Reviewed by Pedro Sena. Moderator of Ygdrasil's Film Newsgroup
Copyright (c) Pedro Sena 1995. All Rights Reserved.

Title
Review for Alfie (1966)
Seeing this film some 25 years later is an interesting experience. One can
either watch Michael Caine have an interesting rave up through out the
piece, or one can get caught up in the process with which the film works.
Alfie, then, and now, is, still, a breakthrough film.  Few ever try what was
done in that film, and done it better, or attempt to recreate it.  Using the
well known English stage device, the ever glowing ASIDE, Alfie takes us
through his adventures, and misadventures, as he tries to meet the perfect
"bird", or just plain getting laid.
And each time, when he reasons things, he is always talking to us, letting
us know what he thinks, and what he might hope for.  Things rarely work out
perfectly, and never are totally satisfying to him, and we end-up hearing a
bit of the Alfie philosophy.  What's it all about, is still the theme today.
If we think that it was for sex, then even Alfie got taken for a ride.  And
if it was for an honest search for a little love and loving, then he failed
as so many of us have done as well..... and settled for second best.
There are other things that make this film a very good, and original, one.
It was photographed, for the most part with a hand held camera, and with a
small budget.  And the hand held camera, creates a very nice feeling of
intimacy, which helps in us getting to like the main character. One can't
help feel for him, when he is so close to us, and having the same problems
we are.  When he helps one woman, he ends up losing her. When he takes
advantage of one, he also ends up losing her.  And what's the point and
answer?  That's what Alfie is asking us in the end, although he does,
finally, make a friend, with no conditions... a dog.
Today, this film is a classic, and should stand out as one of the very
refreshing, and original pieces of film.  It brought us all Michael Caine,
who is excellent, and a veritable who is who from the London stage at the
time, with the exception of the American actress Shelly Winters.
The best things to look for in this film are the well designed camera
angles.  The personal stuff all gets close up angles, even for the personal
exchanges, something which Jean Luc Godard was fond of.  And then there are
the very lively angles which seem to add a rather distinctive and unusual
style to the film.
Worth seeing, and very well done, even if the color, today, appears too
bright and washed out.  But it still shows, what many films can not do
today.  Originality, and excellent acting... the English kind.

Title
Review for Ikiru (1952)
This is one of Akira Kurosawa's earlier films.
An elder gentleman finds out that he is going to die soon, and begins his
depression.  After his affair with the drink, one day he comes face to face
with one thing which saves him.  He becomes a bit of a child again, and sees
an old run down area, and decides that a park should be built there for
children.
And much to the chagrin of anyone who gets in his way, the old man succeeds
in bypassing all the red tape, and gets the job done.  One good deed which
made his life seem totally worthwhile.  He was no longer empty.
Simplest of stories, simplest of shoots, and yet, as is customary of
Kurosawa, the combination of the two makes for an extraordinary film which
few people get a chance to see, and which our local video store probably got
by accident.
There are many touches through out this film that differ from the Kurosawa
mold. One keeps expecting to find a grandiose film with magnanimous gestures
and filming, and instead one finds a rather intimate film that uses the
close up, not for acting this time, but to get us to understand what is
happening around this man. The directing touch is so sweet, that it is
difficult to dislike this film, and it makes it very deserving of its
awards.

Title
Review for Exotica (1994)
SUPER FEATURES:  Well photographed film makes it attractive.
Atom Egoyan, is a bit of an oddity.  His earlier works, were generally
centered on thoughts, and characters' thinking.  The film basically stopped
so we could hear these characters think.  While this was interesting, it
usually made for a film that might drag on for a  bit too long, and of
course, would often end up in a rather  unsatisfying style.  One got the
feeling that the story couldn't possibly have an ending ( life DOES go on ),
and he always added one anyway, just so we would think that it all meant
something.
EXOTICA, may be Atom's departure from the student style of film as his
previous work pointed out, or to.  Unlike his previous films, there is a
sense that there is a budget here, and that he is finally dead set on making
something that makes sense to  anyone else, least of all himself.  And
unlike his other films, we can safely sit down and tell you that there is a
story here  that goes from a to z, where as the other films, it was a bit
difficult to do so.  They appeared to have a story, but did they really have
one.?
A man has been hurt since the death of his wife and daughter in an accident
some years before.  And he spends some of his off time in a nightclub where
the girls dance nude, and have moments where they can dance just for you for
a small price. What we don't know is why is a man who has a good job, and is
reasonably well paid, not gotten together with someone else, and "mellowed"
out.  The film avoids all reason, until the
very end, when it kinda puts all bits and pieces in one basket, and lets us
in on the rest of it.
But in between we face the tension and intrigue that one particular dancer
provides.  She looks very young, and in her act she  dresses as a school
girl.  And she has an enjoyable time dancing for this one man, when he shows
up.  But there is a slight problem.  The dancers are helped along their
performances by a disk jockey who plays music and occasionally adds dialogue
to get everyone interested in checking out the girls, for whatever reason.
He is a bit of a live psychologist, doing something, which at first appears
to be sexy and fun, but is turning rather sour after a little, or perhaps we
have heard enough of him.  But he does know how to use his voice very well,
and the attraction often brings about a catharsis for us as well.  The DJ is
also trapped in his own world, in many ways in the same way as the gentleman
of the story.  In its own way, this is also a rather nice touch, and it
never implies that everyone is the same way.  The DJ also happens to be in
love with this special girl, and though their relationship has come to an
end, he has had a hard time letting go of it.
When the film comes to the end portion we finally come to find out a little
more, but unfortunately, by that time, the story has lost its flavor, and
what might have happened, or was going to happen, does not, and the film
ends in a rather oddball note, which is a bit of another Egoyan'ism.  But,
unlike other films, this one is better tied together, and holds well better.
Still not totally satisfying, but quite a bit less frustrating than the
other films.
But the film has some very good acting, and some rather interesting moments,
which are actually very nice directing touches. In special is a moment when
the thoughts waver from one person to another, and all of a sudden we are in
the nightclub at the early morning hours where the disk jockey is
philosophizing about his feelings.  It is
a nice touch.  At least, none of the characters are totally dishonest which
helps the film along.
Atom Egoyan may not be the best director around, but he is proving that he
has a touch that may be developing into a style that is unusual, but is
touching, and deep at the same time.  At the pace he is displaying, chances
are that his future work will be even better than before.  His stories are
showing a maturity that we do not always get to see in many directors.  It
does help when the director is, an auteur, as is called in France, meaning
that he also has a hand in writing his own material.  This is the lost art
form of film, in America and in the world where entertainment and money rule
what the mass market must see.
It is this kind of work that gets many of us thinking and understanding
ourselves better. but does anyone really care.?
3 GIBLOONS
Copyright (c) Pedro Sena 1995. All Rights Reserved.
Member of the Internet Movie Critics Association

Title
Review for Stealing Beauty (1996)
This may not be as strong a film by Bernardo Bertolucci as many other in his
long and illustrious career. But it does have a few touches of beauty in it
that make this film stand out, although, compared to many of his other
films, the themes here seem trivial, and not as important, even if the young
girl doesn't think so.
It's not much of a story, other than a relative on vacation in Italy, ends
up spending time with a group of people whose attitudes vary and their life
style is very different from the American style. The young girl befriends a
older man whose life is on the decline, with whom she can at least have a
few conversations, although what he might want out of her is not what  he is
going to get. All in all a rather lecherous group of people in a  society
that is rather free in sexual mores, but at the same time a bit on the
scavenger side of things to get that freedom.
It's almost like that freedom is there as long as the individuals can get
what they want, when they want and for their own reasons.
Unlike many other films by Bernardo, the main beauty here is really the
countryside, with its very clear oranges and greens all over them. The rest
appears somber, and not as lively as nature, certainly not as pretty. The
young girl does eventually come of age, but not really the way she expected,
although she seemed to have fun and made a new friend. In the older group,
it seems that sex is the excuse to make friends. The same thing happened
here with the younger ones, although we may be more forgiving since they are
young.
Not a great film, by any means, but it does have its own little beauty. If
you have the patience to stay through it, at times a very talky film, this
is not bad. It's just not as good, as some of the stronger stuff that
Bernardo has done in the past. Compared to those films this would seem to be
an earlier film, rather than a later film.
I suppose that we all have to search a little and learn something...

Title
Review for Jésus de Montréal (1989)
It was a final nominee for best foreign film of the year in the March of
1992 Oscar race, and it didn't win because Journey of Hope was a much
stronger film in the stomach wrenching stakes, where Jesus of Montreal tends
to get to a point where it doesn't know how to end, what begun as a very
nice piece of work by a dedicated Bible scholar and film maker.
This film is not for Christian fanatics who don't like literature and
history, as this film makes sure people know the difference between life and
theatre, and yet, it is this medium which sends this film flying.
It is a reminder, if not a tribute, to the late Joseph Papp, who used to do
Shakespeare around Manhattan, the same way,... by having the actors live it
all out through the whole day, in different locations.  Here, the actors
begin doing a passion play in a local park, at the bequest of a local
catholic church, and end up doing much more through out the city, until its
size becomes a threat to the church officials.  Even the devil is portrayed
as a gung ho agent, lawyer, accountant, who knows much can be made here.
Heck,
with a good promoter, have you any idea what the real Jesus could have done?
Scary premise.  It is a question Jesus of Montreal is asked by this guy.
The play starts out innocently enough, and the actors involved begin to get
into their roles seriously, as the material is indeed, very serious.  When
the play gets bigger than life, the church begins trying to close it,
despite the hypocrisies ( the priest sleeping with the leading actress
playing Mary Magdalene ,... clever,... ) the news media is now enjoying the
dramatic  endeavor and the lead actors strange, and powerful ability.  It
becomes the toast of town, to the chagrin of the church, which closes the
play on the spot, immediately after a very successful outing.  The lead
actor is serious. And
the priest is having anxiety problems.  The actor is killed by an accident
stemming from an over eager police force preventing the public to see the
play. A large pole ( looking like one that would have been used for a
cross ) falls on the actor killing him.  The priest has a heart attack.
They end up  in separate hospitals ( Jesus in a modern day hospital, and the
priest in a catholic hospital ) but the actors' heart ends up in the
priest's body to give him a second chance.  He gets up one day, saying, that
he had a dream  and that he wanted to do a play,... a passion play.  And the
film closes.
The premise is clear.  The church authorities refuse to accept history, as
they feel they wrote it, the way it should have been, with all the miracles
and events.  Scientific discoveries are finding that the writings are far
from the truth, specially now that the Dead Sea Scrolls are available, even
though church authorities have denied its originality, and proceeded to
denounce  those who continue studying it.  There were fourteen books found,
and only three have been translated, forty five years later.  FORTY FIVE
YEARS LATER.  The Vatican libraries have all this stuff buried in their
basement.  Why don't they fess up.  Even their own cardinals don't know what
all of what is down there.  It is a form of work like the Sean Connery film.
The acting is unusual, in that one finds in the early stages a satirical
tone towards theatre in general, with over acting, 'ham'ing, and lack of
general direction.  It ends up taking all those bits, and putting them in
the correct place, and making a heck of a film while at it.
If you are an open minded Christian, this film is for you.  And by the way,
the history does not deny Christianity.  It just validates it as a faith
based on truth and a strong spirit. Not the ideas of man, which was Jesus'
real fight.  The ideas of man meaning the written down doctrines, which had
nothing to do with the real spirit of man.  An idea, is not the same as a
real vision.

Title
Review for Mariachi, El (1992)
Some films are not great, but they display a desire to do well, and the
detail that could make them great.  El Mariachi, is nicely done, with no
budget to speak off ( hell, a Hollywood meal for a week for a star would
cost at least twice the amount this film cost... ), but its ability to
dedicate its style, and well designed continuity of the director, make this
film work from the very beginning.
It is a bit of a comedy, so it seems at first, but slowly works its way into
a serious film.  The new visitor in town gets mixed up by accident with a
drug dealer, and the accidental mis-match almost  costs him his life were it
not for his instincts and ability to
walk out of trouble.  In the process he befriends a young lady who has been
kept in business by a rival drug lord just so he can not only get to her,
but keep his eyes on his rival.  The young mariachi is trying to find a job
just playing his guitar and singing... and the gun toting drug dealer
carries a guitar case with a few guns to take care of his business.
While many films take a lot of money to get everything done, this is the
quintessential student film, if you will, in that the director is also the
writer, and the cinematographer.  Were he at UCLA, or at the USC film
school, he would get a heck of a passing grade just for getting his project
done ( who cares about the other grades when the  competition alone would
prevent it from getting done...!!! ) and delivered.  It is an excellent
first start, and shows a promising director in the works. He deserves a
budget and a studio to back him for a few films.
The film itself is not great.... it is just there, and consistent.  It isn't
slick.... just filmed.  It has no great looking actresses or dolls,  just
real women.... it doesn't have a slick soundtrack.... just a few songs  on
the guitar of the lead actor.  What else does one want from a film...???
Copyright (c) Pedro Sena 1994
Member of the Internet Movie Critics Association

Title
Review for Hola, żestás sola? (1996)
 I guess not all films that come out of Spain are top notch productions, or
deserve the acclaim that Spanish films have been receiving in Film
Festivals, where they seem to be doing so well.
 Hi, Are You Alone? is not a great film, but it is a slight fast paced romp
that allows us to flow through an hour and a half without thinking much.
For that it is a nice film. If it has ideas, notions and themes, they are
not grandeurized in the tragedy of life, or made much fuss over it, beyond
each of the girls' desires, and flow. In this sense the whole film takes its
attitude and style from the two girls' generation. They are impetuous,
undecided, dreamy, and willing to try different things, and learn from the
knocks along the way. And of course, these prices, often cost some to each
person.
 It is a rather simple story. One girl gets caught in bed with her
boyfriend, and dad gets mad. She leaves home. The other girl gets no
exposition per se, but apparently she has no parents. They both end up
living in the same place, when one day they get thrown out by the landlady
who has found someone who will pay the rent with money.
 And the two girls end up leaving for the south of Spain, in the hope of
making a better life for themselves, but not after Trini meets a Russian
fellow, with whom she ends up being in love. At the critical moment, when
she is leaving the guy also disappears, a sign that he may have been an
illegal immigrant anyway, and the girls go south. They end up visiting
Trini's mom, who is trying to open up a bar. The girls end up working for
her, until one day, they realize that the mother is not going to pay them.
They leave, and decide to return back north, where Trini is going to try and
find the Russian boyfriend.
 While the film has moments of enjoyment, the interplay between the girls is
what makes this film work, to what is a rather quiet, unassuming film that
just wants to go through a day without a hassle -- just like the girls --
and trying to show off its intellectual verve. IN this sense it is a lesser
film than many others we have seen, which tend to be "meaningful" and
"pointed". This film might even be considered a B movie, if the shooting
style, film stocks ( terribly faded and old looking ), and directing are any
indications at all.  the film has a hurried look, which works fine for the
girls, and a decided lackadaisical attitude towards the many things and
ideas when it has a chance to comment on them.

Title
Review for Ridicule (1996)
It's a terrible shame that this film can never be appreciated by larger
audiences. This "talkie" extraordinaire, is a magnificent example of how
words can kill, in exchanges of "wit", in a film that shows a historical
tale about a time, when impressions in court were centered on the vanity and
depth of one's words, rather than content. Indeed, what cuts through, and
eventually eats into the story is the content, and also shows why the French
revolution came about in a slight lesser reason, but no less valid. The
court, and its people were insipid, vague, vain, and not there for
"government" but for their own agendas and influence. The court was not
there for the people or governing anyone.
It's still the same today, isn't it? That ought to put your mind at rest,
and make you want to see this film. It is excellent.
"Wit" was a style of conversation that was pretty much around the time of
Shakespeare and Moliere, and mainly involved the use of clever words, used
to gain one's advantage. Shakespeare made fun of it, by using the
"gentleman's game" and also having the girls fluent in this area, and use it
to gain their own wants. Later the Restoration theatre, would make this a
world of affectations, and later still, France ( and others I'm sure ) would
engage itself in these things, as a way to avoid dealing with anything that
government is supposed to do. But royals and royalty are not government, and
their function is not service ...
It is the story of a gentleman, who finds himself in the court, trying to
get funding for a project in Versailles, which should help take care that
area and its need for some form of irrigation and funneling systems, so that
the water that it gets from the rivers does not sit still, which has now
been polluted and diseased, and is killing people left and right. But trying
to get to the court, and getting nobles to pay attention to Gregoire is
something that he is prepared to do, although it forces him to do some
unsavory things. But the girl that falls in love with him, can find the
forgiveness in her eyes, when she sees that this man means well, and intends
to see through his foremost convictions, and that unlike most of the
courtiers', his are important.
This is the basis of the story. The content and wit with which it is carried
out is another altogether, and makes this film stand out. The lines, the
deliveries, are "delicious" and totally phenomenal. It's just sad that not
enough people will get to see this, because the exchanges are so dynamic and
enjoyable that this film stands out, even with a throwaway ending of sorts
.... typical of comedies that depend on their stuff to get through.
Of excellent appeal here, and shown to its fullest, is how the church really
conducted its business in France, something that Cardinal Richelieu himself
was most famous for, but never really displayed in many films. The "wit" is
supposed to show that the person has some intelligence and knowledge behind
his/her words. But affectations had grown and most people were using the
words to gain movement in their own areas of interest, and the depth of
their words degenerates into a fancy word game for the rich. As long as they
do not take themselves seriously they will do very well ... warning, the
best part of the moment is the cardinal falling on his face.
With some magnificently directed acting, and well designed exchanges of
words, this is a very entertaining film, that deserves much more than it has
received. It got a slew of Cezar's in France, and well it should, since the
wording in this film is bombastic, to say the least. Well directed, and
thought out, in the courts the camera becomes another voyeur. Away from it,
it is personal and takes on, and stays, with Gregoire, the real hero in this
story.
Worth seeing. Superb dialogue direction. Outstanding acting work.

Title
Review for Az én XX. századom (1989)
There aren't many films made today that have a sense of wonder, of, what is
all this about anyway?, and that keep you wondering what is all this leading
to.
 My Twentieth Century is one of those films.  The best way I can explain it,
is that it reminds me ( A LOT, too ) of Luis Bunuel's style of  film making,
which was surrealistic, and bounced from the person's mind to
external action without any reason, or idea, but all based on the whimsical
nature of the character, or characters, involved.  Or the director's of
course.
 The only real theme, this enchanting and very curious film appears  to
have, is a small subplot, related to Thomas Edison, who is trying, nervously
and once again, to prove to people that his telegraph is not a joke, and
neither is it a ghost, or trickery, which, is very likely to have happened
to him, by people who feared modern discoveries, or the unknown.  This film
plods along, never explaining anything, although it does have a story of
sorts.  There is a birth of two girls, twins, Lili and Dora, and they grow
up to be separated after they were orphaned, and one has become a spinster
and high class prostitute, while the other is a revolutionary ideologist.
And a man, whose talents lie in writing, or studying the psychological
behavior of people, through his observation of animals, happens to have had
an affair with one of them.  Along the way, he accidentally bumps into the
other sister, whom he thinks is the original, and gets even with her by
taking her to bed ( he was robbed before ), ...  but in the end there is a
sequence full of mirrors, where he gets a look at the two girls, while a
voice talks, the seer of his thoughts, perhaps, or is it an alien form which
has talked from the start, and plays with the stars, animals, the girls,
and him.
 And the film, shot in black & white, has an aura of wonder, like the films
around the turn of the century did, which makes it really nice.  The  film
floats, easily along, while you wonder what is happening.  Amidst all
the visual scenes and events, you end up thinking things like this: 1. If
this were a film around the beginning of the 20th century, then you would
think you were seeing something which was alien. 2. The 20th century was the
time when psychology took hold. ( A sociology professor delivers a lecture
to women on sexuality and psychology of. ) 3. Do we like seeing 'floating'
fantasies, instead of politics, or serious and meaningful faire .?  One of
the sisters almost drops a bomb on a political  figure, but she freezes at
the last moment and keeps running off with the  bomb in her hand.  The fuse
ends.  The bomb never explodes. 4. And finally, if we are going to see
something, give them something which  they can never explain.  Which was the
main theme which led Salvador Dali, Luis Bunuel and Andre Bretton to create
the surrealistic movement of art, starting with a manifesto, and a film,
which had sequences which may or may not have matched to anything.  It
defied convention, and your ability to decipher any meaningful
understanding, except that it lived, on its own.
 The fun part of seeing this film is that you can not tell if it is being
funny, weird, off the wall, or just plain serious.  And it carries you all
the way to the end, because it never goes back to explain anything, although
it repeats three visual sequences that have each person 'listening' to the
stars talk to them, much like people may have thought the telegraph would
have done.  In fact, this is the only real link it has, the only  thread
which makes any sense, and it also is the catchy theme, which makes  this
work, although it is a bit odd.  We would have to be transplanted to that
time to 'feel' what the wonder was all about.
 Nice film. A bit too artsy for those that like entertainment and a good
escape or romance.  This film is for the free thinkers of the world, and the
real appreciators of the fine dialect of film, ... by a Hungarian artist
with a surreal boot on his hand.

Title
Review for Chongqing senlin (1994)
This film has been hailed as a new style of the French New Wave, and at
least, in Quentin Tarantino's words, is very much a reflection of Jean-Luc
Godard and his pioneering work in the 60's and 70's.
If so, at least the film is not as idiosyncratic as Godard can be, but it
does have a few touches of the old master. The totally "reckless" shooting
style, which creates a faster paced movement of the action, makes for a
film on steroids, that is hard to keep up with. Jean Luc Godard, always gave
you a rest, by stopping the camera literally, as the action even walked away
from it.... in this film, there are no pauses, and there is no time for
characterization, which was one of Godard's strong points, and led to film
makers like Mike Leigh, who do similar work with the camera.
So, is ChungKing Express a good film?. As far as a pioneering piece of work,
I would say no. Perhaps what it does best is display a society that is
moving so fast that is on a crash course, when it comes to its own inner
direction, and attempt at finding itself. The pace is dizzying, not to
mention the ever continuous camera movement, that at times is actually nerve
wrecking, and I believe takes away from the film.
Like the story of the film, the main character is shy and can not keep a
relationship, all characters are restless and not ready for any kind of
relationships. He Quiwu has lost his girlfriend, who has left for someone
better, presumably more fun than this guy anyway. And the girl that he  is
beginning to like is a bit on the strange side, likes him, but like him, is
also afraid of discussing things.
And then, there are the intrigues.... the film starts with a woman in a
blonde wig, a killer, and it is as if this is not a part of the story,
which is very Godard'ian, but in a way it is. The characters through out the
film are in a world where "excitement" is lacking, and this woman is almost
like a film symbol... she exudes the excitement, and takes it as it comes.
We can only assume that when she lays down for a rest at He's apartment,
that the end is near for her, or for the characters... that they have to
eventually face the enemy, themselves, rather than the outside.  She wakes
up, tosses the wig, and we don't see her again in the film. And the story
now focuses on He Quiwu, and his attempts at self analysis, and getting over
his asking a girl he sees everyday at the Midnight Express cafe.
Other than the very typical French New Wave usage of names of places and
people, this film is not that bad, but it is not for everyone. It is a film
maker's film, in that it goes through an incredible array of intuitive
camera work, that is very difficult to keep up with, specially American
audiences with their canned style of entertainment. But the way it is shot,
in blazing color, will add an element that Godard could not do. By
comparison, Godard's camera style is a slow crawl.
But like the Truffaut's and Godard's, that paid homage to the film noir,
this film pays homage to the French heroes. It does so, however, in a far
subtler way than we care to notice, and one has to be a film enthusiast to
catch on to it. The name of the cafe is Midnight Express, and it is a place
where nothing happens, and lives just go by and get wasted. And the constant
mention of California through a Mamas and the Papas song that keeps
repeating itself, as the only real image that the girl that works in the
cafe has.
Not specially a great film, it does have a story, but it is hard to discuss
per se. A security policeman, works his daily shift, and has lost his
girlfriend. He goes through his "menopause" in trying to figure out what he
did wrong, but in the process he fails to notice that someone has an
interest in him. And he never notices that she has been in his apartment,
and cleaned it, etc, etc. But a lot of this is hidden in the film's pace and
shooting style, which, while exceptional, it still has not figured out how
to make a complete film. Like a Godard, it has an edge that says
"unfinished", or as Godard himself loved to say, " a work in progress ".
Unfortunately, this film comes off as unfinished for the audiences, and we
do not seem to be asking for more. Godard films, kinda gave you a  "wow" and
left you there. This film wants to make a serious move, but it seems to shy
away from doing so. Perhaps it was just a nice piece of fluff to do, that
almost worked to perfection in the film maker's head, but not for this
reviewer.

Title
Review for Bewegte Mann, Der (1994)
Copyright (c) Pedro Sena 1997. All Rights Reserved.
Like French films, German films have no qualms discussing anyone's sexual
preferences. MAYBE, MAYBE NOT, fits into the category that has the toughest
time getting into the market. Gay films. But as much as there is enough
gaiety to keep many interested, this film is really less about the gay
subject, than it is about how many people make friendships and how some of
these may turn out to be homosexual.
And in between, this film is a comedy of errors, where no one can get their
things right, and they are all over the place. And the gags, are funny, and
add a lightness to the film that otherwise might be considered heavy and
boring.
It is a simple enough story. Boy and girl live together, and work in the
same place. And one day he gets caught in the bathroom having sex with
another woman, by the girlfriend. It breaks the relationship. And he has no
place to go to, and eventually winds his way to a friend's friend who is
gay. And the fun starts. It seems that the whole group of friends are just
all excited about this new one. But he has no interest in the at all and he
sets off an array of jealous bits amidst the group at the place where he is
staying.
And as time goes by, the girl is reconsidering her relationship. Axel is
busy enough and is trying to figure out what he wants to do and get a place
of his own. Norbert, who has provided him with living space, likes him and
would like to do more than just be friends with Axel. Several weeks later,
Axel returns to his old place to pick up a few more things, and ends up
showing Norbert his photographs. And wouldn't you know it, here comes Doro
and she finds Norbert almost naked in her bed, next to Axel.
And the whole thing explodes. It turns out that Doro is pregnant and they
make a go of it. All seems well until one day Axel bumps into another  old
flame, and he tries to set up a date. As it happens, Doro has cancelled her
weekend plans, and all of a sudden there is a problem with the
communication.
Axel keeps his date, at Norbert's place, and that's when the fun starts.
Doro decides to check it all out. And as she gets there, of course, her
pregnancy is hitting the water stage, and Norbert has to take her to the
hospital,  which creates a problem... but Norbert and Doro seem to get along
ok along the way. And as it turns out, Norbert is the one that gets forced
into helping with the birth of the baby, not exactly what excites him.
Norbert's friend, who also had a crush on Axel ends up taking him to the
hospital, and by that time it is too late. Doro has already decided to throw
him out. She thinks that he is having a gay affair. As it turns out the date
he had brought along some excitement and used it on herself  and him. And
when the movie that the boys went to  make room for Axel and his date, goes
awry, they all return to Norbert's. And Norbert's
living in friend, goes to the bathroom where the date is in the bathtub. And
they get it on.... comedy city.
The film ends on a note that does not state, or suggest that Norbert and
Axel will become a pair, but if this doesn't happen, they at least have
become very good friends.
While the film is not great by any means, there are moments that are funny
and weird and keep you going from minute to minute. It is a total comedy of
errors, where nothing seems to work right, even if the end suggests that
here is the right'est thing that has happened in the whole story.
Funny acting all along, although most of the gay men are played for laughs
and have a tendency to over act. it does not take away from the fun that one
can have with this film, even if the subject matter can make many of us
uncomfortable, including this reviewer... but it has funny moments.
Check it out, but be careful with your jealous mate.... 

Title
Review for Journey to Spirit Island (1988)
Like many cultures, the NAHKUT ( northern Canadian Indians ), have always
dedicated a special area for their burial grounds. However, modern days and
the speed of progress and commercialization are threatening one thing which
many cultures have respected for so very long.  In this case, the group has
had their burial ground in a remote island, which is becoming increasingly
more attractive to many outside interests.  It seems that someone has an
idea about turning the island into a tourist spot with a resort and all the
trimmings.
And as is the usual case, there are some Indians who have been convinced
that this is a good idea, and a chance for success, and much more money for
the poorest tribe.  And this film is really about the extremes one will go
through just to try and speed up the process.
But Hawk makes a misjudgment. His hunger for progress is caught up in the
Reaganomics of his area.  Cash in.  And at any price.  He, however, does not
seem to realize that there are other forces working and that he needs some
support, other than the villagers.  They have come to accept his ideas, and
are ready to sign a deal for the resort, and in the process, show that they
are in danger of cutting off their very
livelihood to their once glorious past.  The real question is: future with
no spirit, or future with A spirit.
The film's obvious content is that there is no future without the full and
complete spirit, regardless of who we are.  Lucky for us, the white man has
not been too oppressed as yet, so that they too will lose their burial
grounds in this day and age.
Mixed into this is a wonderful child's tale of becoming an adult.  The young
woman, is on a walkabout of sorts with the younger brother and two friends.
And they are to go to the island.  Jimmy seems to think that the young Maria
is the person who can lift the veil of doom from their own people, and help
save them from the oppressing modern forces.  She doesn't tell us this, and
she does not explain much of the mystical
goings on either, but in many ways that is what makes the film even more
attractive, and not pushy.  Disguised as a story, and adventure for four
kids, is much easier than tackling the livelihood of many indigenous tribes.
While in the island, the children help Maria discover what her dreams really
mean, and why they came to the island.  They take care of what they have to
do, and in the process dismantle the bad intent of Hawk's, who has been
going to the island and
making sure that the eagles, and various other animals move from the area,
so that it can not be considered a natural habitat, and therefore a
protected area, which of course, helps the commercial development, if there
is going to be any.
An excellent film, never boring, not pushy at all, with no spiritual
pretentious.  It just does its thing, lightly, and in a subtle way, and in
doing so, it keeps us interested, rather than lectured.

Title
Review for Knockin' On Heaven's Door (1997)
Seen at the 21st International Film Festival in Portland, Oregon
        I suppose that this film is a bit like trying to define dark comedy, or
black humor as it is often known. The problem is, where does one define the
beginning of the tragedy, or sad story, and the end of the comedy.
        And one thing, that some French and German films DO have, is a lot of this
who cares style of comedy, that invariably is more unffortunate than
enjoyable, but it does help us laugh a little. Maybe that's the only point.
        In this fine, and very enjoyable film, Martin and Rudi find out that they
do not have too long to live. One has an inoperable brain tumor and the
other has bone cancer. So they set out to take a trip and enjoy whatever
time they have left. And what a trip this is. They begin by stealing a car,
and then make their way to the coast, which has to go through Denmark.
        And the misadventures along the way, are hilarious, and very enjoyable,
although Martin seems to be having seizures every now and then. In the
chase, of these two are two hoods, the victims of the stolen car, and later
by the police. And towards the end, the film pretty much allows a Deux ex
Machina to work, just so that these two can have their quiet end.
        Several things make this film enjoyable. All the characters are eccentric
nuts, and have their own agendas, and the are always crashing into someone
else, which makes for a bunch of odd ball situations, that are hilarious.
The whole thing starts with the first time they have to fill up the little
car with gasoline. But a bigger hint for tings to come, was shown in the
room that they were both assigned, where they met. As soon as they decided
that they were going to enjoy their last days on earth, the cross falls off
the wall, and the cabinet opens up to find a bottle of tequila, ready for
them. And what seems to start out as a drag of a film, slow, and down
trodden, all of a sudden turns up to be one of those that you got to see to
enjoy it.
        Rudi has never been to the coast, and never seen the sea, and Martin tells
him abnout it. In the end, we discover much more, and this is the main
motif in the whole film. Nothing will stop these two from getting there, it
seems, specially when the police is bumbling on its own wheels and
adventures, and can't get things together. As it turns out, these guys get
a break from the news media, which allows them to continue to their
destination, where the film ends.
        If this film is not well directed, at least the two characters have worked
out together really well. And it is their interplay that makes the things
so enjoyable. With their bit of luck, they manage to make happen one of
their wishes from their list, thus adding a slight fullfillment to their
lives, even if it is at the end.
        With some excellent music, through out, and a supreme version of Bob
Dylan's song at the end, a la German rock super style, this film is
actually a very nice one, and one that is worth seeing. It is not a fancy
film, in shooting style, or anything major, but its two characters are
infectious, and do take us along for a ride.

Title
Review for Fiorile (1993)
It's hard to fault this film, aside from a few moments here and there where
it appears slow.  But the slow-ness, like Claude Berri's, is not waiting for
something to happen.  It is letting the actors shed their tears, for us to
see.  Which makes for a film, that is as
gut wrenching as the Jean de Florette/Manon of the Spring type of story.
And as sad and tragic as the events in this story are, the  film still comes
up with a bit of hope, even if it is a bit jaded, by  the innocence of a
youthful desire to play, or to follow through on
their own wishes.
It is a story that encompasses almost 200 years in the life of a  family
string.  It starts during one of the many franco/italian  conflicts a young
man in charge of a brigade carrying some gold,  gets attacked in Italy by
the noblemen who take the law in their
own hands. In the process they hurt one of their own daughters.  And the
French officer who is actually resting, helps her.  During  this time they
come to like each other after each other's original  fears.  And apparently
they make love, after her leg wound is cleaned.   Sadly, the young man was
the guardian of a fortune in gold coins,
which is taken away, by the girl's older brother and hidden.  The  young
man, Jean ends up facing a firing squad, and the young girl is  left
pregnant and in despair.  And this is just the beginning.
The story continues, being told to the two Bennedetti children, in today's
environment, as what is probably clear that these are people related in some
way, to the legends.  The man telling the story to his children, is on the
way to visit his own ailing father.  During the drive, the children learn of
this story which has many chapters and goes through nearly 200 years.
And at this point in the film, the outcome is still not clear, but it is
becoming evident that the innocence of youth is always getting scramble
somewhere along the line and in this case a sour old man, may be just the
thing for the playful children, who find out a thing or two in their fun.
They come away, mostly  untouched by the events and the old man's emotional
state, with  the exception that one child managed to get his hands on one
coin of gold, which may signal the continuance of the misfortunes in  the
family, although this particular generation seems to be doing  fine, and the
coin is taken as a souvenir, rather than any act of ill will, as has been
the case before.
With incredible attention to detail and shooting design, this film is a
marvel to watch.  It's hard to fault it for anything, or find anyone that
just seems out of place.  Both directors, brothers, are just a touch above
any others when it comes to attention for detail and story line.  Even the
continuity of this film is smooth despite jumping many years from chapter to
chapter.  A very rare event, indeed for the art of film.  There are bits and
pieces of nice touches here and there that just stand out every so often,
and the subtleties are apparent all the time.  It feels like a story of a
family that is intended to get back to its roots, the common people ( if
there is such a thing!!! ), but it is always stopped before it returns.  And
the acts that stop this return are always tragic, and not always obvious.
We usually find the answers as to why things happened but the characters
mostly do not, and this has caused tremendous pain along the way.  A series
of revenges and returns to what has become a "cursed" family, with a nice
double take on the family's last name in Italian.
An absolutely well photographed film, with not a frame that seems out of
place, and with some subtle shots that just leave your heart moved.
Wonderful story, and told as only an European could.  A sense of history
that Americans have not yet acquired, or acknowledged.

Title
Review for Blowup (1966)
Michelangelo Antonioni has been around quite a long time, and though he does
not appear to do many films anymore ( I don't know if he is still alive
today ), the majority of his work pretty much ended with the film ZABRISKIE
POINT.
Antonioni's style, from his earlier work, and specially vivid in BLOW UP is
that of a person looking through a key-hole, something which he has alluded
to many times.  It is his curiosity as to 'what else is there,  that we
can't see" that defines his films.  BLOW UP is that and more.
It is the story ( more an event, really ) of a London modeling photographer
who spends his time working models for the many magazines he works.  And on
occasion, this photographer gets more than what he bargains for, or  is
intent on getting anyway.  The shoots with the models usually end up in a
veritable orgy, with the camera clicking away.  And one day, during a
stroll, he is simply shooting to his heart's content.  When he finds a
particular negative which stands out, he proceeds to make a larger
print of the negative.  Lo and behold, there is a small detail which catches
his curiosity.  Just a few feet from the people he has caught on the camera
is a detail which he has to investigate.  And it turns out
it was the detail of a woman, who was killed.  And the scene he caught may
have been the continuation of that event or not.
And the film develops the idea, with the photographer ever more intrigued by
the event.
Perhaps, what makes Antonioni, a good film maker is that his camera is a
very active subject.  There is always a hint of more to come, or happen, and
adds to our curiosity.  As a story itself, almost all of
his films are simple, which may hint that the story itself is not as
important as a single detail which misleads us away from the main thread,
and adds another.  And at times, these are not resolved.
Aside from that, these films are good to watch, because they really are the
windows into what created a 'mod' generation in the 60's, of which  film may
very well have been the defining form.  If not, at least it
showed others another way of living, since the films around this time, with
the French new wave ( Godard and Truffaut ) were exposing newer styles of
filming and story telling.  Godard even went so far as to make sure that he
never told a story, just caught moments of action, and played little
perception games with the camera, which at times were annoying, but always
refreshing, in that we could never really predict what would happen.  This
type of feeling is very prevalent on Antonioni, even in Federico Fellini,
and the majority of the well known film makers of the time, aside from
Hollywood, which stuck with the technical developments more than the art, or
literature, of film itself.

Title
Review for Ladyhawke (1985)
Some films stand out as love stories.  Some just die in the throng of the
glut for yet another romance.  This story, and it may be because  the film
is so well done, is better than most romances.
There was a time when the church ruled.  And there were many knights  who
fought for these rulers.  And, on occasion, one knight falls prey to the
greed of the church.  This knight, Navarre, has made the mistake of falling
in love with a woman, whom the cardinal is also interested in.  The result
is that the knight is doomed to never meet this
woman again.  At night he turns into a wolf, and during the day she turns
into a hawk.  They can never share their time again.
It was all the work of a priest who, eventually, fell out of favor with  the
cardinal.  And this same priest, has to live day and night with his sin.
And a hope that one day he can do something about it to save not only the
love affair, but also destroy the glut and evil of
the cardinal.
Involved in all this is Garcon, the mouse as he is known, who has escaped
the dungeons of the law which oppresses the weak and the poor.  And it is he
who becomes the messenger between the two loves and connects them with the
aging priest who is trying to forget his old ways.  He lives in a castle in
ruins, amidst his books and torments.
And, the story develops to decipher the riddles and the meaning of the many
words which the potent magic contains, but they do not understand.
Cast very nicely, and in a very well photographed film, are all the leading
characters in the film, starting with both Rutger Hauer and Michelle
Pfeiffer.
While the directing in the film does not appear obtrusive, or overly
typecast, it is the cinematography that makes this film stand out, along a
very nice soundtrack, which, although modern, still adds a nice flow to the
film.  The impressionistic style of Vittorio Storaro and his magnificent use
of color makes this film appear even better than it really is.  But it is
nonetheless a good film that stands out.

Title
Review for Da hong deng long gao gao gua (1991)
Aside from Japan's Akira Kurosawa, I had not really seen too many Chinese
film makers up until the time I wrote this review. And, as I sat and watched
this film, I really wondered what I was going to find.
Very powerful story, and way to tell it.
A scathing political film denouncing the feudal lord system, who takes the
law into his own hands.
A style of cinematography, which is not boring, but is really quite
symmetrical.  All the shots are perfectly framed, reminding us of a  David
Lean film.  And the director allows us to feel the space, before he enters
it, much like David Lean did.  No surprises necessary, except for the
unsuspecting actors..... we are on the outside of the 'box' as it is called
in theatre.  In many ways, the style of cinematography is out-dated, which
could have been intentional, since the life of the Master, is also fading.
A nice mix of art and life, which is rarely portrayed as a unity, but as an
entity which interferes with life.
RAISE THE RED LANTERN is an excellent film, and although a bit slow for
American standards and tastes for most film, it replaces the slowness with a
theme, which fits the film.
The story is about a young woman who finally gives in to her mother's
wishes, and becomes another concubine for a rich man.  By doing so, she has
to give up her life, as a student, to become a slave to a past
( literally ) which she despises, but she has little choice.  The mother can
not work enough to afford the education of the daughter, and the father has
recently died.  And by trading in her vows as a concubine, she is
helping the mother with a dowry, which would keep her taken care of for
life.  And so she becomes the fourth mistress of a rich lord.  And no soon
does she enter into the marriage, she discovers that the house is
laden with petty jealousies, and evening politics, to try to entice the
master to one of his wives' beds.  And the competition, as she finds out is
as brutal, as it is vicious.  And the girls will not stand for second if
they can help it, and will go to many lengths to get their desire taken care
of.  The ultimate goal is to bear the master as
many boys as the wife can.  And between them all, they are not doing  very
well.  The last two have only produced one child each, and one of them is a
girl.
It is nevertheless, very soon that the fourth mistress discovers how to deal
with the others.  The third mistress was a professional opera  singer, and
is truly beautiful, but does not have a disposition to deal with competitors
( they say she is spoiled ) and in the middle of the night feigns sickness
and stubborn behavior, until the master leaves whom ever he is with to go to
her.  And the fourth mistress one day says that if he leaves, don't ever
return to her bed.  This time she wins.
The indiscretion of any one of the wives ( the third ) begins to show the
cruel fate of those caught in the act.  The young fourth mistress being
educated, has a knack for curiosity, and walks the immense grounds, and
checks out all she can find.  And one day she finds in one corner a small
place which has been used as an execution room for those who get involved in
bad acting, and get caught.  On one fateful day, when the master is out, the
third wife goes out to have her affair with the house doctor, and the
disappointed fourth mistress, who has been  drinking to celebrate her
birthday, accidentally mentions the indiscretion of the third wife.  In the
next few days, she is hung in that small room, on the far end of the castle.
The fourth mistress goes to check out the room, where she saw them take the
third mistress, and when she comes out screaming, she is changed.  She is
now 'mad'.  And soon, the master has a new mistress, a fifth one, younger
still.
The red lanterns, the central focal point of the story, refer to the
lanterns used to light up the street where the mistress lives, leading up to
her house.  The master likes the lights on, so he can see.  It is also a
custom which goes back many years, used to make sure no enemies of the
master walk in unawares.  Now it has decayed into a  symbol of decadence and
attention which the master uses to get the other wives interested in his
company.  It doesn't work for the first mistress, she has become the wise
old lady, has borne him a son, now full grown.  Despite her wiseness, she
can not seem to control the young ladies and their fierce competitive
spirit, which is so detrimental to them all.  And every evening, in front of
all the mistresses, he announces publicly, in whose house he will spend the
night, whereupon the red lanterns will be immediately lit, much to the
chagrin of the competing losers.
The film's outcome is as brutal as the competitive nature of the three
mistresses, culminating in the loss of two in the end, one to death, and the
other to 'mad'-ness.  In between, is an array of images set up very neatly
 it is the tradition!!! ) which keeps the house alive, and its servants
busy, from the aspiring maid who would like to be one of the mistresses
 the master does visit her once in a while ) in contrast to the fourth
mistress who does not.  She is also accused of an indiscretion and punished
by the matriarch of the family when the master is away.  Her indiscretion
was a desire to be one of the  mistresses, and her fate is that she has to
serve as mistress to the one wife she does not like, the one who is the
exact opposite of her own desire.
The film spends a lot of time, walking out of plot traps, with its favorite
line.... it's the tradition -- and it seems they even try to create new
ones... but it only shows the length to which many feudal lords will go to
keep their families in control, and profit from their own needs and desires.

Title
Review for Journey of Honor (1992)
It isn't often that we see many collaborations with Hollywood.  This time,
with Japanese money another film on the honor of the samurai warrior, and
their way of life, during a time, when changes had to be made.
The Japanese warlord has not lost his battles with the rival Shogun who
wants his post, but he is rapidly losing men to the invaders guns.  A stroke
of luck allows him to buy time, and keep his enemies down for a longer
period of time. It rains, and the guns that once only fired on a flame, are
all of a sudden totally dead, and useless.  The warlord wins this battle,
but he knows he will lose others without the weapons of fire.  Amidst the
shuffle, and the  treachery, he decides that his heir to the throne is the
best candidate to  go to Spain to buy some guns.  The heir is under constant
attack, the
enemies' one hope to end a family tree, and chance the start of another.
While this film doesn't have the emotional strength of an Akira Kurosawa
film, it does have a little of a curious twist to history.  It implicates
that even the Japanese were involved in the history of the world in the 16th
and 17th centuries, in ways that our history books never indicated.  It
seems like there only existed Portuguese and Spaniards, and Brittons around,
then.  Gee whiz, a few Japanese, too.
Basically the film shows that the world of a shogun, and the Japanese
warlords are coming to an end.  Their need for fire arms, is a small threat
to the Spaniards, but then, so are the volcanoes.  The Japanese, after all,
were too far away to invade Europe, or vice versa, though the Christian
church movement did far better than any conquistador.
Of interest in this film, is Christopher Lee in a bit of a listless role
 nothing like Scaramonga ) and Toshiro Miffune, in a role which he looks
bored doing for the umpteenth time.  The youngsters carry the day, though.
The young regent, and protector uncle, are strong enough in their martial
arts abilities to keep many a dishonest Spaniard, and Moroccan scoundrel, at
bay, and  eventually gain access to the guns they wish.  The title is the
definition of their voyage, and their ability to stand up for the honour and
valor of an English sea captain who helped them, and a tribute to their
courage, in a world where they were a definite minority.
It's good entertainment, not as intense as RAN, or the original TV series of
James Clavell's SHOGUN, but it is rather nice, and enjoyable little stroll
through a few ruins and old ships.  David Essex, as the Spaniard bastard
baron/lord with an ego the size of Spain at that time ( half the world ) is
good, though one gets the feeling he is over playing the role.

Title
Review for Ofelas (1987)
PATHFINDER is about a child that one day returns from his daily playing
around, only to find a group of 'evil' men are in the process of destroying
his family.  The young man, manages to escape, and get to another
group of people, where he immediately helps set up a small rebellion in
order to go after the evil men.
And finally they do so.  Amidst horrible weather conditions, extremelly deep
snow, and unforgiving grounds, they set out to destroy the evil group of
'men who have lost their way'.   A medicine man, in this type of grouping
they appear to be called the PATHFINDERS probably because they can use
intuition as a method to lead them to safety, tries to get the 'revenge'
factor out of the young man, or he would become just like them.  And they
proceed, until they come in contact with the evil group, and put quite a
dent on their manpower, before succumbing themselves.  The evil group knows
who the pathfinder is and try to get him to speak.  When he does not, they
begin torturing him until the young man can't stand anymore.  The young man
gives himself up and says he'll guide them only if they leave the old
pathfinder alone.  As they leave the evil leader kills the old pathfinder.
The young man proceeds to lead the evil group into a mountainous area where
they know the other family members are hiding.  Some menbers of that family
are now convinced the young man was bad luck, and
when their scouts notice the evil men being led, the general feeling is that
they have been betrayed.  Only the young girl who nursed the young man's
wound earlier in the film does not accept this.
In the mountameous  area, the evil men spot the campground.  Their prey is
in sight.  But the terrain is very rough.  The young man using his nimble
movement and superior strength manages to lead them quite a ways, before the
first one falls to his death.  At a given point, he pulls the rope, and
runs.  In the giving of chase, a few others die.  In the process, a mess of
tangled  bodies are left all over, with the leader having to cut the cord
which is linking them all, thus allowing others to die. And eventually a
major snow slide overruns the whole hillside. There is silence.  Back in the
campground, the family realizes, and thinks the young man has sacrificed
himself to save them. But the resilient young man, knew how to cover
himself, and avoid the landslide, or got lucky, it doesn't matter.  He
manages to get out of the cliff area and save himself, and then
walk to the campground where an astounded family watches him. He delivers
the drum of the old pathfinder, and he himself is  crowned the new
pathfinder.
A real brutal film, in that the evil never stops, and is as rough as the
terrain and the weather itself.  For some reason, and it is never clear,
they are merciless, and never stop. Filmed on areas that are extremely
beautiful and so full of snow as to make many of us jealous, this amazing
endeavor in shooting a film in the middle of the worst places, is a  triumph
itself, regardless of the story.  It is almost impossible to carry equipment
that is not designed for that kind of inclement weather.
And this film may have been filmed by a tribe, whose name seems to permeate
the credits.  Without any information on this film, this is all I can
deduce.  The film is a triumph of good over evil, despite the bad odds, and
natural elements.

Title
Review for Much Ado About Nothing (1993)
William Shakespeare is fun to do, even if the stories are a bit on the
deus-ex-machina side of things.  And the English theatre has for many years
been known for its interpretations of the master thespian, in various ways.
Some are adventurous productions that defy the imagination, like Macbeth
done in Nazi outfits.  Some other ways are unusual, like  Peter Brook's
fabulous interpretation of A MIDSUMMER NIGHT'S DREAM...  and other
productions simply try to innovate the style with well placed dialogue and
beautiful visuals, namely Franco Zeffirelli.
And then, there is Kenneth Brannagh.  His productions, like HENRY V, are, by
all standards, plain and simple, period pieces, with excellent acting, and
well thought out film scenarios to help the play come across as
well written, and well thought out.  On stage, MUCH ADO ABOUT NOTHING, is a
mess.... you have to know the play, and know the meandering, to stay in
touch with the story, and the eventual outcome.  The "funny" and "fancy"
dialogue, at times distracts the whole thing.  But, on film, one can
manipulate things just enough, to make the story comprehensive and clear...
so did Franco Zeffirelli at least twice, and so has Kenneth Brannagh, at
least one other time.  One gets the feeling, that, since he is a well
trained Shakespearean actor, he knows the plays so well inside out, that he
only has to decide what he wants to do with it.... and make sure that people
can follow it easily enough.
Needless to say, this production of MUCH ADO ABOUT NOTHING, is probably as
clear as you will ever see and understand the whole thing.... it is
simplified to the chasing of the two main characters in the story,
Beatrice and Benedict.  And the rest that is brought to light, is just the
stuff that deal with them, either coming apart, or coming together.
What is left, is an incredible array of well cast people, in very choicy
roles.  For the lover Don Pedro, Denzel Washington is cast, and being a dark
man, he brings up the well thought out stories of the moor being good
lovers, and the other fantasies that had been around for many years, in both
Italy and Spain.  For the crazy,
Dogberry, an American is cast, and they let him run amuck with the whole
thing, pretty much stealing the show.... it is a shame that HE DIDN'T get
the a nomination for any awards, because his rendition of the nutty
Dogberry, could keep an audience on its feet the whole show.  In the English
isles, the consensus has always
been that Americans are a bit too wild.... excellent cast.  And for the
sharp witted, star crossed lovers, of course, you got to have  two
Brittons.... Kenneth and Emma.  And Beatrice gets the better of the two
roles, for she has a much sharper tongue than Benedict.  She doesn't have to
show off to the girls around her. He has to keep up with his image.  And in
between, are many other well cast people, that make this play so enjoyable
that it may very well be the next best Shakespeare that you can enjoy, other
than ROMEO AND JULIET.
With a beautiful set up, and great period music, this film plods along,
although I ( personally ) might find it slow, since I know the play. And it
makes for a wonderful evening of entertainment.
Well directed, and well designed from a camera point of view to make the
whole thing clear ( the play does not offer such wonderful insights ), one
can appreciate the dialogue between characters ( and who is saying
something in the middle of anyone else's lines -- the main cause of the
confusions on stage )much better, and realize to whom each line  is
delivered, and which lines are the character's thinking.
Well worth your consideration, for a very entertaining show... beware that
the exchanges of dialogue are extremely fast at times, and your appreciation
may be lessened because you didn't hear what he, or she, said.
But even if you didn't catch it, the way it is set up, you know what it
related to..... directing a play, specially one so well known, and make
these things SO CLEAR, is not easy, and is a great achievement.

Title
Review for Yao a yao yao dao waipo qiao (1995)
SHANGHAI TRIAD, may not be the best film that Zhang Yimou has ever done, but
one thing is for sure.  He has matured his shooting style into a more
westernized concept.
Like most eastern films, the cinematography is usually still, that is, not
moving very much, and the actors do most of their movement within the
confines of the camera's angles, until the next shot sequence. SHANGHAI
TRIAD, shows that Zhang Yimou is becoming quite westernized in his style,
and is learning to make much smoother films in the process. Before, the
style was a bit on the mesmerizing side, sort of like watching their Chinese
master singers, who take twenty minutes to reach the center of the stage and
one can not even shake our eyes from them.  This attitude, has changed much
since RAISE THE RED LANTERN, several years back, when the camera rarely
moves, much like the characters inside the story never really do.
This film, if anything, is a statement, that places like Shanghai, are much
more westernized than the rest of the country.  And the story, is similar to
one that we might find in New York, or Chicago in the thirties. Basically,
Shanghai, is run by a trio of Mafia lords.  And while they appear to be
friends on the outside and in front of others, they all seem to be doing
something behind each other's back, to hurt each other as much as possible.
And caught in the middle are those smaller people that apparently do not
obey the rules of their individual boss.
Amidst all this is a singer, who has become the mistress of one of these
lords.  She is given a young man to be her servant, and while he is young
and learning, he is, unlike many others, a bit more curious, and
inquisitive.  He is the new member of a family that has long taken care of
this particular lord.  And, as expected, the mistress is having an affair
with someone whose connections to the inside of this particular boss seem to
be rather dubious.
As it happens, on a fateful day, the young man's father is killed in an
assault, and the clan is forced to flee to an island, to protect itself and
gather enough strength and direction to figure out what to do.  In the
process we find that the mistress is losing it, and that there are outsiders
that are trying to do away with this particular lord.
And in a bitter end, the lord wins the war, after many battles are lost.
And he has to dispose of many people along the way to protect both himself
and those around him.
Story wise, this is, as is usual in most of Yimou's films, a very sad film,
in that there is very little that the smaller, less powerful people can do
under the hands of the bosses who take the law into their own hands.... and
there is no government strong  enough to work with it, or to undo the feudal
system that runs much of the country.
The singer eventually meets her death, just like her lover.  Their
indiscretions revealed as a sign that these people were much better aware of
what was going on that was originally apparent.  The film even suggests that
the affair with the mistress was set up to catch one of these men unawares,
and catch him in his role as a traitor
to this family.
The film ends on a sad note, and although there is hope for one little girl,
and one eager boy, the system has won yet again.  The victims are the people
of the country that do not mean anything.  The beauty of the film, is the
subtlety with which Zhang Yimou sets up his film. We do not really know what
is going to happen until the
end, although we can suspect that something is up.  And the acting is sneaky
enough that it adds to the difficulty at figuring it all out. And perhaps,
this may be one of the reasons why Zhang does this.  By keeping the film
insidious, that is, in the hands of a system that was deplored by the
government, and done away with ( one hopes ), Zhang can do much work and
place the Chinese mainland on the cultural film market.  One wonders how
long he can survive doing it, since he is always under attack and pressure
by over eager government authorities who are constantly worried that his
work is subversive.  Well, were he allowed to leave China, chances are that
he would make a film and decry the injustices of the government, in stopping
the film community for petty ego ideals.
TO LIVE, still Zhang's most important film, although not his best, is the
perfect example of a film that the government does not wish to see or show
at all.  But as is the case, when something is made to be subversive,
everyone wants to see it.  Peking may not like it, but everyone in Shanghai
has seen it, though it is illegal to show
it and sell it.  China's government, like the bosses in this film will
eventually get theirs one gets the feeling.  When their cause wonders into
the needless realm where people are getting abused and used, it will fail
sooner or later.  Had the bosses, not been so corrupt, and fighting so damn
much amidst themselves, communism
might not have succeeded so well as it did. Everyone feared the gangs, and
the feudal lords. The new revolution provided a respite from that
viciousness.  But what the new people didn't know, as TO LIVE shows, is that
the bosses were about to get all centralized under one iron fist.
And films like SHANGHAI TRIAD, are a sign that the hold these powers have is
really tenuous, and will soon crack.
There are some wonderful touches in this film. The color filtering of the
camera for effects, is magnificently well thought out, and adds a certain
lyrical style to the film that Zhang has not displayed  before much.  And as
mentioned before, adding the moving camera to this mixt, makes the film even
more interesting.  Like the film noir style, which this resembles in color,
the camera moving in oddly lit spaces, creates a feeling of tension and
wonder..... and surprises always lurk in the corners.
Much can be attributed to the story in the film, which is, essentially told
from the boy's point of view.  He is the story.  And he sees it all, and
tells us what he sees.  Thus the camera, thematically, moves, just like we
see the boy move... a special touch, that adds so much style to this very
nice, and special film.  Replace the bosses with
the rulers in Peking and you still got the same story.......
Excellent film. Beautifully filmed, by a director that you can tell, knows
how to handle a camera.

Title
Review for Rikky and Pete (1988)
Every once in a while, there is one film, that sort of pops out of nowhere,
and one's curiosity is ticked.
Well, when you see a picture on a guy sitting atop a Bentley, steering it
with two cords, in the midst of the outback desert, it's got to be
interesting and hopefully fun.
A bit weird, the recluse Pete, is the oddball in town, a genius actually,
whose best stunts are saved for the 'copers' and the vindictive police
chief, who is trying to land his prize catch in jail.
Pete has a sister, and tired of the stuffiness of his father, takes of with
his sister, in mom's gift, the Bentley.  And his creativity begins coming
around, as he has to find a way to earn a few bucks for gasoline, and a
place to live.  The sister is a good singer, and picks up a few bucks
singing in the local pubs, for a dollar or two.  And by the end of the film,
they have become slightly rich, with the help of Pete's ingenuity.  And they
end up getting the best of the police chief still chasing him, and having to
put up with a maddening Christian lunatic.
The film is fun, the film is weird, and the film is very good.
The music is actually very nice, and well situated, with the songs always
linked to the moment at hand.
Bruce Spence ( the gyroscope pilot in Road Warrior ) is excellent as a
miner, who joins up with the duo and find a slight gold mine in the
process, based on Rikki's details, and knowledge.
Should See It.   The inventions and ingenuity are great.  Check out the
EXTERMINATOR, and when it is used.

Title
Review for Powder (1995)
This film, if not a power house, is really a surprise. It catches you when
you are not ready for it. And it is a heart breaking story, the kind that
one wishes had a better go at it, though we can see from the start that it
is nearly impossible.
And it takes a cast of focused actors to bring something like this to life,
and make it work.
With a terrible title, that does not do its story, or anything in the film
any kind of justice, this film really hits home at the differences between
many of us, be they just ethnocentric, or just plain, physical conditions
that are difficult to overcome.
Powder is the story of a boy that has been kept in captivity since his
birth, because he has a terrible skin condition that prevents him from
catching much sunlight. And he has been kept in a basement for most of his
early years, until one day when the caretaker grandparent dies. He has been
well taught, can read, and do many things, that otherwise, most can not do.
He also has some apparent abilities with lightning, or most forms of
electric energies, which he is capable of exchanging energies with.  And it
is the psychic abilities and powers that eventually gets him some attention.
He is placed in school, and becomes the laughing stock, but he also learns
there, that while those who are physically stronger than him may hurt him,
he can hurt them with something else. And he wastes no time putting that
energy to good use, from teaching a sheriff's deputy a large lesson in life,
about the misuse of guns, and the breaking of the law.
And, as the sad story continues, he meets a girl that comes to like him, and
vice versa, only to have her taken away from him in the end of the film,
like he is not deserving of anyone at all.  And this sends the film into its
climactic end.
POWDER is a sad film, but one that can not be ignored much, as its strengths
are beauty, of the kind that most films, can not even touch.  Some hint at
it, this film shows it. And though much of it is in the characters' minds,
sometimes, the moments are just breath taking, and totally special, to the
point of making your skin crawl.  Were this not handled deftly by a director
that can understand these things, this would have become a who cares story.
As it is handled, with so much affection, it is inspiring, something that
just isn't found in to many movies nowadays.
Mary Steenburgen is very good as a bit of the protective mother that she is
becoming. Jeff Goldblum, though always appearing fake, comes off as
interesting as a teacher  that is just surprised, as is the whole class, by
the example of electricity that they have been shown.  And he spends the
rest of the film trying to figure it all
out, at least the connection between mind, body and the electrical happening
which he witnessed.
But the spoils in this film go to the character of Powder, and the young
girl he meets, with whom he can not have a relationship on account of a
terribly protective father.
But the rest of the film is amazing, and a terribly enjoyable trip. We can
sense that this film, or character can not win, but we know that while he is
around, everyone is going to sample something that they will forever
remember. I dare say that we will, too.

Title
Review for Daens (1992)
Some films come around once in a while, and rather than re-affirm an
entertainment value for your money, they, give us, instead something that is
less fun to deal with, but no less important. This film, walks into that
category, and instead of trying to be politically correct, where an American
audience might enjoy it, it uses every inch of baseball bats to punch its
point home... and nothing is sacred here.
The story of Priester Daens, who in the late 19th Century, found himself at
odds with his peers, but most of all, he was not at odds with any
parishioners, who enjoyed listening to him. Like many priests, they talk and
talk, and never say anything of value. Daens has woken up to listening to
those around him, even if they don't understand him, or vice versa. And one
day, he is walking the streets and sees a little girl, who had frozen to
death over night. She was another victim, not only of most people's moral
stance of hypocrisy, but the local church's desire to support only the
causes that it is favored for, that is, the rich people's causes.
Priester Daens, becomes involved with the a couple of families, and
eventually takes up a stand in favor of the families, who are now raising
children simply to put them to work in factories, at a very early age. The
wages are horrible, and the working hours are worse. But this is a dangerous
fight. The rich class, is powerful, and they own the government. The workers
are being manipulated, and moved around, and their emotions played with. But
Daens' efforts, bring about a Government Commission, to visit to look at
things. No one believes them, but Daens thinks it's a good first step.
But the war only starts further down the line. An adversary, Charles Woeste,
is a hell bent politician, and his best work is in deals with the church. He
has been asking for the church to defrock Daens, and make an effort to stop
him. Figuring that the defrocked priest could not pull off what he is doing
as well, and the public will forget about it. But Daens, doesn't quit. He is
eventually asked to go to Rome, to see the Pope, but this is nothing but a
stalling tactic to try and make him lose time, and effort in his work in
Flanders. When he comes back, he becomes a part of the local election, and
finds that the vote was inordinately in favor of him, which gets the
parliament worried. They lie, and invalidate the vote. Another vote is done,
and Daens is elected. His war is just beginning. Charles Woester, is his
bitter enemy, and while discussing the plight of the poor, he never fails to
comment on the poor's needs for more money. The worst one comes later when
Daens wants schools created to educate all people, and Woester states his
vile breath .. "what are the poor going to do with an education ( all laugh
around him ), buy another _____ ( bigger laugh )" ... and we know that the
real stench that Daens is fighting is not going to be over very soon.
Amidst serious political games, this film plods along. Its tightly packed
story, becomes all the more confusing, but never the less powerful. In many
ways, it shows us how busy Daens was all the time, and how so many things
tried to help him and stop him at the same time. There is a serious sub plot
between a socialist group and the other mainly catholic group, of which a
Romeo and Juliet story is developing. And Woeste has his own "bucks", who
are the sons of rich people, who take law into their own hands many times.
But worse of all is the renegade cavalry, that also takes the law into its
own hands, assaulting people, and probably telling parliament that the
people scared the horses. The "bucks" are bent on hurting the socialist
activities, but worse, they decide to work on Daens' activities instead.
They go after Daens' brother's newspaper, which Daens has been using for a
while and writing his articles that are inflaming the upper class.
The worst thing in this film, and something that the church will never
repent for, is its inability to be worthless and pray on people's emotions.
In a sermon, Daens speaks of Christ, and the rich class begins walking out
of the church right in front of all the poor people. In Italy, the Vatican
comes off as petty, political, and just a painted building. And in
parliament, Daens, finds himself ridiculed amidst nobles that couldn't
careless but for their own fortune. And the king, who sits above it all and
says that all those beneath him are responsible for all the troubles.
While not a very pleasant film, this is so strong, and unrelenting, that it
is difficult to look at it and think it is not good. The balancing act,
works, between the political fashions, and how Daens is lucky enough to get
both of them to break, long enough, that they can find a cause that they can
fight together to win, rather than lose... and the fight for the worker's,
has to be fought with them, not without them, or their bickering. Daens
states, in a heightened moment, that this is not about ideas, or beliefs,
it's about your faith, and your life. It shuts their arguments out
immediately.
The film ends with an epitaph, telling us that Daens won a second term in
the parliament before he dies just prior to the First World War.
A very powerful film, that does not let up. Words are important here, as
they are used as vicious weapons all over the place. And the inner workings
of the factories, a game that rich people played, is even more unpleasant.

Title
Review for Campanadas a medianoche (1965)
Pauline Kael said " Welles ... has directed a sequence, The Battle of
Shrewesbury, which is unlike anything he has ever done on screen before.  It
ranks with the best of Griffith, Ford, Eisenstein and Kurosawa -- that is,
with the best ever done. "
And, truthfully, were it not for the stuffy professors who promptly junked
this film as blasphemy, and were it not for the timing of the  film, it
might have been received today as quite an original, and exciting
masterpiece of writing as well.  All in all, this is the story of FALSTAFF,
the happy go lucky Shakespeare character who felt slighted when his best
friend, Henry, became king and stopped being one of the boys.  Taken from
the various plays in which this character appears, a complete story was
written by Orson Welles, and wrapped up neatly into a small film, in black
and white, to show the side of the story of the character that Shakespeare
didn't
have time to work on.  And he is the only character that appears in more
than one play.
And we follow the young Henry and his escapades with the drunken fool and
exciting, and never boring fat man, Falstaff.  Through the many bars, to the
many women, to the few battles they went on, the young Henry is a good
warrior, and also a wild young man.  But it all changes the day he becomes
king.  He forsakes his friends, and leaves them all behind, and in one
scene, he doesn't even recognize them.  And the older Falstaff, is crushed.
He is hurt. Henry was one of his few friends, and while the drunkard, and
crazy Falstaf, may have wished for better times and life, he  can never get
out of his rut.   Henry seems to be aware of that.
While a fascinating acting exercise for many, since the combination of
various plays into one script creates a new character per se, this film is
very memorable, specially the battle scenes, where Falstaf has to depend on
his wily, cunning, and even accidental, ways to get things accomplished.
While the dialogue, and film, never
make it quite clear, nevertheless it is inferred that the main  reason why
this man is not worthy of the royal class, is because his only royalty ( and
loyalty ) is to drinking.
IF EVER RELEASED ON VIDEO, THIS IS A MUST SEE. IF YOU ARE A WILLY MAJOR
FORGET THIS FILM.  It was the same professors which went on an intellectual
rampage to destroy this film, which caused
much harm, and sadness, to Orson Welles, who plays Falstaf.  And Orson
Welles's versions of Shakespeare were somewhat neurotic, but they were never
boring, or worthless.  This film is the same.

Title
Review for Bandit Queen (1994)
Few films will ever punch you as hard as this film does. Perhaps it is not
the film itself that matters but its story and subject matter.
This is an extremely brutal film, one that speaks for many women, although
how it does so, is not something that many people in a western society is
willing to go through, even in a movie.
Phoolan Devi, is married off at age 13 to support her parents. The man who
buys her, is more interested in satisfying his own social status than he is
interested in a woman, or marriage. But he succumbs to the tradition, and he
takes up his wife, even when people make fun of him for not finding
anyone but a child.
Phoolan is raped. And she runs away. In the running away, she manages to
find some work, but ends up in a place where a few young boys are expecting
to get their satisfaction out of her. She has very little taste for men,
specially patience, and one of the boys makes a strong pass at her. She
fights her way out of it, but ends up in the village court where she is
found guilty and jailed. Here her assault continues and she is raped by the
guards as "penance" before being allowed to leave. She has to leave town
because it is basically run by a family that does not like her caste. They
continue the abuse.
By chance, she ends up joining a group of outlaws, whose job seems to be to
chase food for their own members at the cost of the authorities. And here
she seems to get better known, and respected, and even finds a lover that
she can take up with. However, it is not without pain and struggle with
herself that she can finally give herself to him and not suffer from her
past abuses.
Phoolan eventually becomes a leader in the gang, something that many men do
not like at all, but for the most part, they realize that this is an
important move as it gets her heard about and famous. She returns one time
to the town that abused her seriously, and she gets her revenge in an awful
display of carnality, not unlike the abuse that she suffered. She even says
so. The Hindu authorities begin going after her, and use the brother of the
one man that accused her in the first time. They do not succeed,
but by this time the press is all over the situation, and the Hindu leaders,
now know that they can not kill her, or risk a serious war, or political
upheaval. Although many of the local people do not care
for this situation, they give in. She is asked to turn herself in, and to
her credit when this happens there are thousands and thousands of people
waiting for her, and the news media.
We know that now she will be heard and that her suffering may not exactly be
in vain, although most of India is still involved in a caste system that the
British fostered as a way to keep many of them under control. And Phoolan
Devi's story is heard.
This is the film of a true story. And her story had some very serious
consequences in the political life of many people, specially those who were
the authorities in the areas she came from. Many are still in prison for it.
Eventually, Phoolan was released and she has been treated since then as a
heroine, who stood up for something very important, dignity, and specially
that of WOMAN, in a system that doesn't give a shit about women, but uses
them mercilessly.
One of the most powerful films I have ever seen, and the abuses that it
displays is no less serious that a reality the whole world over. It is
indeed sad that for these situations to get an ear, many have to die,
and that one has to suffer such a hard punishment, but all we can hope is
that their plight is not in vain. In this case it was not, but it is clear
that many have failed where Phoolan did not. The fact of the matter may have
been that women were/are not respected as women at all, but are meant to be
subservient to men in all aspects of life. This is the 20th century, and
this is something that is very
much alive, the whole world over, and many countries still have this type of
insulting and demeaning behavior in their social mores. It is time that we
make it clear that this is not needed, and neither is
it supported.
This film is the clearest attack on this matter I have ever seen. They say
that India has power because of its history. In this case its history is
also the power that is destroying it in the modern day. Can
it be saved and changed.? I think this is the real point of the film.
Extremely brutal, savage is the word, film, not only in the violent aspects
of it, but with its unbelievable sexual attack. Phoolan Devi, I'm sorry that
you have suffered so much, but I praise your spirit, and
what you have stood for, and we need more of you in this day and age over
run in many places by savage men.
Reviewed by Pedro Sena. Moderator of Centipede's THE FILM.
Copyright (c) Pedro Sena 1997. All Rights Reserved.

Title
Review for Stranger Among Us, A (1992)
This film was one of the nominees for the Oscar's FOREIGN FILM Award this
year.  And it is a worthy candidate, that stands out as a special film as it
does very quietly, and slowly, what only the likes of David Lean have been
able to do.  Tell a story where the country itself is the story.  Few film
makers have been able to get the setting to come alive, a veritable desert
full of mirages and thoughts
that keep one coming and going.
Using all Mongolian actors, it is the story of a family that farms in the
middle of nowhere land, and they have their habits and ways of doing things.
Their style of lovemaking, or at least of chasing for
lovemaking, is literally the old Mongolian way.... a real chase on
horseback, which unfortunately for Gombo, is in violation of the new Chinese
laws that limit the number of children.  But Gombo, as
old fashioned as he is, and unable to come to terms with the present
commodities of childbirth control ( he is a country boy and she is a city
girl.... ) at least maintains himself long enough until he is ready
to burst out.  He can't find the answers he is trying to find on his way to
town, to trade for what he has to offer, but the town's ways with religion
and drinking also have nothing to help him with.  He returns empty handed
ready for another chase, his only real love being the woman he has married
and the wild country.
The acting in this film is either total, or it is a dedicated job to
showcase some very strong people that live in incredible at odds with nature
itself.  It is smooth, moody when it has to, and well designed
by a director that knows the difference between the use of space and camera
to display to us, their dilemmas... very much theatre style, only alive
instead of staged.  The distancing between people
is a measure of their ability to understand or communicate.
While the film stops short of saying anything about this way of life, it
does suggest that modernization is about to destroy the myths and the
legends of this once proud and great people that were systematically
dismantled by both the Chinese and the Japanese in this century.  But if the
new life of modern creatures is coming, it has no hint of the wild life that
these peoples had lived.  The town is structured in such a way as to make
things difficult to get done, the priest is too busy praying, the doctor is
too busy dating, and the Russian visitor  is too busy drinking, all a
statement on the frustration of life these people have and suffer in their
everyday existence.  Gombo is not about to let this get in the way of his
feelings.
He returns, and while he does not bring from the town what he was asked to
bring, he does bring with him a certain vivacity and explosive desire, which
the wife, at first upset, but then defiant immediately
takes on to.  It doesn't matter that the Chinese have rules.... these are
the Mongolians....... and the ending is very nice and leaves us rather
excited and happy.  The modernization did not stop those
two from creating another child, and it neither did stop their desire for
each other.
Wonderful film.  Long shots, trying to remind us of the beauty of a pristine
country, the once proud culture of the Mongols.

Title
Review for Cronos (1993)
CRONOS, is a nice film, in the gothic vein of things.  Were it not for the
fact that the film really has an obvious lack of funds for its making, this
might have looked better, than it does.  And with as little as it
appears to have had, it does bring forth a story that is nice, although the
modernization of what might have better been a period piece, but appears to
suffer due to some ill chosen locations.
It is the story of an elder man ( Jesus ) who has an antique store, and
happens to be carrying some items that are historical, unbeknownst to him.
And he finds out that one of the statuettes he has is actually a very old
piece that contains a special piece of machinery that fits in a hand that
injects a special fluid, that was created by some mysterious alchemist
several hundred years ago.  Jesus, finds that the fluid happens to stop the
aging process.  But also finds that it leads to the tendency to look for
blood, and the person to become a vampire.
His battle, towards the end, is quite heroic, his name being an obvious
attempt at making a connection, while another man ( Dela Guardia ) is
craving the piece of machinery simply to keep his apparently large  business
empire going much longer.
There are no tricks, no fancy things, just a nicely photographed film with a
very small budget, from the looks of things.  Lights are dim, which creates
an atmosphere that helps the film and the story
but does not specially do anything else.
Federico Luppi does very well as the old man who is having a tremendous time
with his discovery and gets better as he gets older, and has to fight his
addiction.  Unfortunately the film seems to take a downturn at the same
time, although the story of good and evil comes forth and gets clarified.
Though not a film in the class of the moody Hammer material, this film is
still nice, and actually reminds me of another Spanish film maker who did
very well with a slight budget, and made Barbara Steele famous.

Title
Review for Uomo delle stelle, L' (1995)
Giuseppe Tornatore is difficult to ignore as a film maker. He may not be the
flashiest of directors, or the best of them, but there is one thing that you
can always count in his films.... a real story, that you can relate to, and
cry with/for/along. The Star Maker is no different a film.
It is a simple story. A man, drives a truck through the countryside in
Sicily, and films people doing screen tests. They do whatever comes to their
mind, and do a few poses for the camera. The man tells everyone that he is
sending the film to Rome, for it to get checked out by other film people,
who may hire some of these characters they see on a screen test.
And he gets out of many localities some really gems of performances, from
the eclectic, to the miraculous, to the odd, to the most unusual of
assortment of people, including a few Mafia people.
And one day, he meets a young woman that wants to go with him. She has real
dreams, and he is her escape. It doesn't matter that all these people paid
for this audition, and that they couldn't afford it. All it matters is that
they have their one shot at being seen and loved. And they all take that one
shot. Another day, a police chief tries it. He is not as gullible as most
people and goes through the whole thing. Later on, in the film, the young
man finds himself arrested. The policeman has done some checking on him.
( Spoiler Alert ) The story turns into a really sad one. He is beaten up by
the Mafia family, who was going to rob and kill him. And is thrown in jail
for a couple of years. In the meantime the young girl who loves him dearly,
is not doing well. When he gets out of jail he sets about trying to find
her, and  seeing if they can save anything. She is in an institution, partly
damaged because her dream has crashed hard.
This sad film, has its truly beautiful moments, and I am of the opinion that
Tornatore's desire is to ask if it is such a bad thing, when one man can
wake up people, so well, like he does, even if the camera has no film in it
at all, or of it does, he has damaged it, one night while threading it. And
the questions arise... is it right for anyone to wake up people's dreams,
and leave them hanging? Will people be the same? Most will. But some will
not. But, generally, they all enjoyed doing what they did, and would do it
again in a minute for a chance to make it in film, be it real or not.
Wonderful film, in many respects, it is photographed beautifully and has
some magnificent moments to share with us. One may have wished that there
had been some poetic justice in the end, but it seems that hope just is not
one of the choices in Italy, specially in Sicily, it seems.
Worth seeing, although the last few minutes are sad. Ends on a positive
note.

Title
Review for Como agua para chocolate (1992)
Some stories are meant for movies, but then again, there are times when I
wish some stories remained stories, unless we had a French film director do
them.  Laura Ezquivel's novel is a treat.  It stays with you as a fine
dessert, or a fine food, and she knows it so well, and revels in it.  In the
film version, this gets lost because it can not translate.  The twelve
recipes for each month get reduced to an occasional side story.  In the
novel, it is the food that brings about the results, and Tita has learned to
make the most of the secrets of the culinary delights.  The movie couldn't
possibly show us how Tita and her mentor ever decided the reasons why such
and such a dish were done for whatever occasion.
This loss reduces the richness of the story into a film that is missing a
third dimention, but never the less, it is still good.
Tita, is the last girl born in a family, and as is the tradition, she is
destined to be the slave daughter to take care of the mother.  This Tita
rejects, and because of it, she becomes one of the slaves and reduced to
kitchen servant.  But her downfall into the kitchen has placed he in the
hands of an old maid that really knows her food, and discusses it as the
greatest love affair and event on the face of the earth.  To the maid,
the food is the monumental moment when one can place her mark on the world.
Tita learns well, and goes better.  Gertrude cooked.  Tita has learned to
affect changes in people because of her choices.
Sometimes the food is sad.... the whole table has a tremendous cry upon
eating such a magnificent dessert.  Other times the food is so hot that the
older sister has to leave to cool off, which is not enough even after a cold
shower.  And trot off she does in the hands of a military opposite to what
the mother stands for.  Tita's revenge is working.
But it doesn't work.  Tita is in love with the young man, who loves her, but
is forced to marry her older sister, because Tita is marked to take care of
the mother.  Pedro never really loves the older sister, and as they get
older, and the sister gets uglier, the thing between Tita and Pedro never
really cools off, and eventually is answered.
Tita has grown, and a good man, an American comes along and he relieves the
suffering she has, but he is no match for her desire and love for the one
man she has been wanting all her life since that one night.  Tita confronts
the ghost of the mother one more time, and returns.
Finally free to meet and enjoy Pedro, they finally do.  And we will keep it
this way for all the viewers.
I, personally, love the writing of Laura Ezquivel, much better than I do the
movie version.  But I think that much of this problem may have been because
I saw a version that was DUBBED and the voices were repetitive, unemotional,
and so glaringly
bland, that it ruined what looks like a good film.  It also appears to have
taken away the food part of the whole story, which is as tasty as anything
else.... it matches the desires
in all the film, but then, that must have not been the reason to make a
film, or to distribute it to other nations.
Superb performances, if you can get by the lousy translations and often
screwy sub-titles.  Read the novel first, and then watch the film without
the voices.
But a great novel, nonetheless... see it and read it afterwards.

Title
Review for Fuori dal mondo (1999)
This is reminiscent of a Spanish film also seen at this Film Festival a
couple of years ago. "The Cradle Song". But the similarity ends there.
The story in this film is rather interesting, and told with a certain amount
of dry wit that is difficult to get into, but eventually allows us a laugh
here and there. The subtleties are not quite obvious, until later, when at a
Bingo game, it becomes apparent what this film is really trying to
accomplish.
On a day when Sister Caterina is going to visit her own mother, we find that
she is handed a baby in a sweater. She does not know what to do, but she
takes it to the Hospital and then the story really starts. She begins
getting attached to the child. In the meantime, we come to see a two other
dysfunctional families. In one, a daughter is leaving home, and apparently
has been hiding -- the pregnancy and the baby she gave away. In the other,
Caterina's mother is upset that Caterina took on the vows of a nun. Well,
there is a third dysfunctional family. Ernesto's little laundry business has
several girls working for him, and his attitude is less than helpful at
times.
 Sister Caterina's only clue is a sweater that is given back to her by the
Hospital and she undertakes to go find its owner. It leads her to this small
laundry business. When Ernesto finds out he may have a child the film begins
its run. Sister Caterina is trying to find the mother of the child, and now
Ernesto is interested because he might actually be the father. In the end,
things get back to a semblance of normalcy, and as usual, the status quo
lives on, and those involved are distant from these things, with the
exception of the two parents that get to adopt this child. It's in between
these cracks that this film shines. Not as well done as "The Cradle Song",
but no less effective.
 Like the other film, this one spares no second thought about the coolness
and the viciousness of the church and its lack of respect for people
themselves, in lieu of their own order of things ... indeed, not of this
world at all, and the reason for the title. In between lie the emotions of
the young Caterina seeing things happen in her face that bring her to
question her own motives and ideas to herself. What is unusual in the end,
is that she does not renounce her rights, and affirms them even better, or
stronger. One can only hope that she will not have the cold heart of the
Mother Superior, who is not convinced that Caterina is made for the order,
as she has taken this affair with a maternal instinct, which the order
obviously wants to take out of all its nuns. A caring heart, means you can
not be motherly affectionate, or get involved in these things with a human
heart. A very serious theme and charge in general, which 30 years ago would
have had this film "banned" by many authorities, in ways similar to the
works of Luis Bunuel, the style of which this film is not reminiscent of,
but the spirit of the film and way it is delivered, which it is.
 Ernesto himself is a loner, and in many ways is a Bunuel'ian hero. He does
not have disdain for the women, but he has obviously been hurt enough that
his aloofness is an issue with women, with the exception of Sister Caterina,
to whom he has taken a serious liking (another Bunuel'ian subtlety), but
probably knows that it is impossible. he gets to witness Caterina's last
battles with herself, on her way to become a full fledged nun. But when
watching the atrocities of human behavior and ideas in action, she does the
one thing that we really don't want her to do. She leaves "this world".
 One really wants this film to turn around, I did. It isn't that I think
that compassion should always win over ideas and a commitment that may be
idealistic or futile in the end, but there are a lot of people in those
areas, whose heart is not in question, and they belong there. Ernesto's
indifference at the start, and his slowness into coming around, is in a way,
very similar to Caterina's doubts.
 A film that has its fine moments, with two very fine leads in  Margherita
Buy and Silvio Orlando, while not a stunningly well done film, it makes up
for it in spunk and doing. It plods along well, is well written, and though
one may find the end disappointing, it never the less makes it ok. We still
have a baby and an Ernesto to keep track of, I guess.
3.5 of 5 GIBLOONS
Reviewed by Pedro Sena, Copyright (c) Pedro Sena 2000. All Rights Reserved.

Title
Review for Naked (1993)
Acting, weather on film or on a stage can be two things:  One, a style is
offered, and everyone has to follow it this way or that. An actor camps it
up, or one does it such and such.  This is idealistic acting at best since
it has no basis in any reality except an idea.  Two, is a school of work
that started with Stanislavsky and still lives today in different forms, the
more advanced ones being the likes of Grotowski, and the Living  Theatre.
This work depends on the actor's ability to push their experience levels to
the deepest parts of themselves, to define acting moments with more strength
and inner direction.  The inevitable "you got to feel it" type of work.  One
should say that there is no style here, beyond the last vestiges of any
culture.
This film, however unpleasant and brutal it might be, is about these depths
that acting can take a character. And the story is loosely centered around
the ability of these actors to move around and inter relate between each
other.  The director throws a few monkey wrenches here and there and we see
the characters take their brow beatings.
As an intense piece of characterization, this film is not for everyone.  It
is boring, if one likes action.  But if you could mix action with this, you
would have a movie that would keep you awake up at nights.  But as an acting
exercise, with a solid sense of direction, although not one for an audience,
it is an absolutely RIVETING, and exciting piece that is unpredictable,
lively, never fake, and very intense.  Excellent theatre, if you will.
In the process, the characters find themselves stripped of any conventions
and have to find their own inner motivations for responding, be it "stay
with it" or "quit" and move on.  Johnny seems to move on when it is time to
discuss any thinking, something he is starting to enjoy ( with men only ),
but ready to quit when it comes to women.
There is a sense of vulnerability in all the characters, who are rather
insecure at these levels, but all in all, the women seem to survive these
things a bit better, though we would like to think that these exercises
would not affect us.  THEY DO.  And they change one's ability to work into
another level.
Loosely, the story centers around Johnny, who has moved from the inner parts
of England to the metropolitan life that is London. And while survival for
him is a matter of movement, for everyone else it has become a matter of
comfort and ease, if almost all of the women are the hint.  And one comes to
love him, but not satisfy him.  The first one used to be his girlfriend.
And in one instance he tries to pick up a cafe girl, who stands
her ground despite her obvious weakness.
A very talky film, with excellent rushes, nevertheless it leaves many of us
feeling unfulfilled. It is a beautiful premise for a director to work with
reminiscent of the work of Peter Brook, who has done this a step further by
mixing actors from various cultural backgrounds to put together the
MAHABHARATTA, also an astounding piece of acting.

Title
Review for Beyond Rangoon (1995)
    Were it not that we already had seen films like THE KILLING FIELDS, to
which this one will always be compared, this would have been considered a
good film.
    As it is, this film comes off like another one of the same, and its
political edge is lost.  Had it been done ten to fifteen years ago, it may
have been considered a lot better.
    This is the story of an American tourist, or visitor, that gets caught
up in the political changes in Burma in 1988, when the communist government
was taking charge of the country through force.  And most of the foreigners
were trapped inside and efforts were made to make their life difficult.  The
leading character, an American, is having problems and is finding it
difficult to get out of the country, and with the help of her servants, and
their friends, she finally makes it.
    Although this film is not as poignant and powerful as the film it
copies, it manages to hold its own.  It does have some nice acting along the
way, Patricia Arquette, probably being the weakest of the lot, but still not
bad.  As is common in all other John Boorman films, both the music and the
cinematography are nicely done, and well designed coupled with odd camera
angles to add a larger feeling that something, someone is trying so hard to
escape, not only a political situation but a personal one as well, which is
the larger issue in this film.  Thus it's title.
3 GIBLOONS
Reviewed by Pedro Sena. Ygdrasil's Film Newsgroup
Copyright (c) Pedro Sena 1996. All Rights Reserved.

Title
Review for Savage Messiah (1972)
I am partial to some film biographies of artists.  Some are overly creative
but I have always felt that this was good for the art form, as long as it
did not make the whole thing look stupid.
Ken Russell was, and still is, one of the masters of biographies. His young
days consisted of a series of BBC specials on the lives of various artists.
Some of them were exceptional, though  they have never hit the larger
screen, or their release as videos have been deemed to the vaults of the
tight lipped BBC conglomerate. ( Ditto for THE GOONS ).  Of special mention,
were one on Dante Gabriel Rossetti, and one on Isadora Duncan.  But the BBC
seems to not be that interested in releasing these things which have been
around for ages, and deserve to appear in video or dvd.
This very special, subtle, and funny film, is, a quiet film, much like
MAHLER, about a second rate artist during the early decade of this century.
While he was spending his time doing his sculptures and other projects, he
basically paid for his art by creating copies of original art works, which
some collectors and their agents were trading for obscene amounts of money.
As he becomes better known, he is eventually trapped by authorities, but
decides to go off to war, instead.  The story continues, and like the
furtive personality that the main character lives under, the film pulls off
the same on us.  It is how we find out what happened to him.  And an ensuing
display of his art, is a wonderful tribute to a man that deserved a lot
better, and is finally getting a bit of his due, were it not that he was
known to be one of the finest copy makers ever. If anything, like MAHLER,
this film is not an extravaganza waiting to explode as so many of the films
Ken Russell has done. This film is "quiet", subtle, and really smooth. It is
a real well made exercise in the life of an artist, few films of which can
bring it about so well.
There are some exceptional performances in this film, Dorothy Tutin, and a
young Helen Mirren come to mind off the bat, and they make this film a real
treat. It's worth mentioning that Dorothy Tutin added some of the soundtrack
music to this film, and if anything Tommy aside, this film has some
excellent use of music, which is one of Ken Russell's trademarks.  Worth
seeing anytime.  It is not boring at all.

Title
Review for Christopher Columbus: The Discovery (1992)
While this is not the superb adventure film we would like it to be, it does
have a few good things in it.
Rachel Ward, is not only the most attractive of all, of them, she smoothly
delivers the best performance.  She is not campy, she does not come of
pretentious, and she is feminine enough, though she is a queen.  Aside
from Rachel Ward, there is Marlon Brando, the elder church statesman
Torquemada, upon whose shoulders the whole voyage may have depended. And if
so, the voyage was arranged to get rid of an over zealous Christian who was
getting in their nerves with all the clever rhetoric.  But the well meaning
Torquemada ( he lets everyone choose their own destruction ) also knows that
he has to deal with the fact that the queen happens to
love this genoese.   He does not disapprove of it, and allows the whole
thing to go through.  He blesses it at the departure, as a sign that even if
he doesn't believe the young man, at least he has a heart for the
visit to the unknown.  And Marlon Brando, as this elder is very good, not
jumpy, very quiet, and also smooth.  There is a certain aura of control and
calm when he is on.
Christopher Columbus -- The Discovery, is not a bad film.  If it suffers a
bit, it is that the film has to live with 'every day' Spain, for a while,
and then has to live with insurrections and bad leaders of ships, the only
people the young sea captain could come up with.  These moments in the
script are a bit difficult to recreate, in that the story is limited to
setting things up in the beginning.  Had it just happened, instead of
immediately telling us that this character was going to be a problem might
have made the film more surprising and enjoyable, rather than so
predictable.
But it isn't a bad evening of history, and could be enjoyed for a few
moments, even if it is so darn romantic in the whole thing, which many  of
those sailors had to be anyway....
SEE IT WHEN YOU HAVE NOTHING BETTER TO CHECK OUT.
LET THE KIDS SEE IT BEFORE THEIR HISTORY CLASSES.
3 GIBLOONS

Title
Review for Ba wang bie ji (1993)
China is finally starting to make some waves in film making. Unfortunately
for the writers and directors, the work is heavily censored and limited. The
results are from good to acceptable, but often somewhat unsatisfying.
FAREWELL, MY CONCUBINE, is very satisfactory, despite what appears to be a
bunch of moments, where the political events affect the story, when things
have to be toned down, or hidden.
It is the story of a famous singer, whose life has been tortuous in the
sense that he can not maintain a sense of control over his popularity, or
the events surrounding it, be they personal, or simply artistic desires.
And the film covers the span of over fifty years to tell the story.  The two
tremendous actors who were so famous at one time, are trying again to
rekindle some old memories, this time for a production that does not mean
much, as opposed to the early days, when the art form was respected and
revered as important.
The early days of schooling were tough and the actors that were a part of
those schools, for the most part were known to be sons of the lower classes,
kids to whom, a chance to make a life was more important than anything else.
The training is tough, and the way the kids are treated is tougher,
specially when the teachers tend to think of the children as wimps and
prostitutes.  The fact that the schools are badly funded, tend to augment
the position that living as an actor of an outdated style of performance is
fading into the sunset, despite a few who care, and care so darn much that
they will do anything to keep it going and maintain the status quo.
Mister Cheng, becomes famous for his role as the woman in a play, at a time
when only boys sang the roles of women.  And on the verge of the war with
Japan, Mister Cheng has achieved a level of fame that allows him to demand
certain privileges.  But one of them is not love.  His partner, who has been
one of his lovers and the main
reason why he has become famous, has fallen in love with a woman. And this
affair is hurting the singing relationship.
The war brings about some major changes in China.  The upper class that
supported the famous operas has been substituted by a system that has no
regards for an artistic event, and even less respect for the needs of the
individuals that perform them.  It plays the duo's personal relationships as
a political event, and destroys everything along the way, even isolating the
old style of music as something that is against the new way.  The events
separate the singers, and pretty much kill the woman that the partner has
loved for so long. All that is left in the old age, is the two old men,
singing one more time for what appears to be a show that leans on a
burlesquian appeal.  A freak show.  A generation is dead.  A political way
is gone.  Is there anything left, even for someone, whose ability was so
important to him, like Master Cheng.
The question arises if this film is about the characters and their story, or
a political attack on the new order that does not care for arts at all, as a
way to keep the masses in line.  This is the political intrigue, and the
film walks a fine line during these moments.  But the result, is not the
definition of the politics.  It is the destruction of the individuals as
traitors and people that are against the revolution.
Chen Kaige has put together a film that is an epic, and that is visually
stunning.  The only time that the film is shining and looks at things in a
loving way, the camera poses for the actors, is when they perform.  The rest
of the time the camera is active, in search for a subject, if you will.
Colorful, well directed, with exceptional performances by Leslie Cheung and
Gong Li, as his best friend's lover and eventual wife, this film plods along
very well.  It is a stunning piece of work.  Well designed, with some
exceptional costumes.  A must see, even if the political situations are not
favorable, and are the force behind the demise of an art form, the ultimate
dishonor for a political movement, that feels that arts are a waste of
valuable time for its people.
And this film is not a waste.  We can only hope that the directors in this
country can only continue to produce more material and that they eventually
will usher a new age revolution, that includes film, stage and music,
because no doubt a country as large as
China has a lot of it.

Title
Review for Carrington (1995)
Films about artists and writers are not fun... they can really take it to
your heart. But they sure create some amazing performances from the actors.
And when a script as this one comes around, it is difficult not to
appreciate the beauty of the work that Jonathan Pryce out into it, and the
very nice job that Emma Thompson did as the writer's long time friend.
This film is about the living arrangement that the writer Lytton Strachen
and artist Dora Carrington had during their time, right after the glory days
of Victorian England.  Lytton is a homosexual, and Emma is not. But this
does not deter from their agreement to withstand each other as personal
friends and housemates for a very long period of time.
Lytton's health interfered with his ability to write, many times, as well as
his ability to stay with his writing. And Dora provides much of the
stability that the otherwise un-emotional Lytton seems to avoid. But as he
grows, and his homosexual side comes out, his life takes different turns. He
is a bit more emotional, and apparently his health is all the better for it.
It's when he has the emotional letdowns, that he appears to suffer the most.
And Dora, appears to be much in love all the time, even going so far as to
get married to the man with whom, they are both having an affair. The
triangle is not an orgy, as each couple maintains their space, but it is a
severe strain all the way around.
When Lytton's health takes his life, the lonely Dora decides that her life
is miserable, and does something about it.
In between, it is easy to see what it is that turns on a writer, and a
painter. Dora, though not a major artist,
became, in time, considered quite an accomplished artist, with a sizeable
collection of works, mostly portraits of
the people she liked. Lytton's work is available in the many libraries the
world over.
Jonathan Pryce ( Brazil, Miss Saigon ) is the thing that keeps this film
going, and it really shows up when he is
not around. Lytton has a large ego, built out of being well educated, but he
also has the knack for making
things appear more interesting, and important. The others do not have his
sense of occasion.  And Jonathan
Pryce just shines all the way through, even if the line is a quick cut, or
take, in the film.
With sharp acting like that, it is up to Emma Thompson to bring out the
originally shy Carrington, but later
the woman that pretty much knows what she wants from those people around
her.  She can't have children, so it seems, and she then turns into a life
of enjoyment, to compensate for it. She can not break through Lytton's
barriers against a physical relationship with women, but his attitude
towards them softens with her around,
much later in life.  But the film makes it clear that it is the likes of the
early rejections that Lytton
receives, even from Dora ( two other times it shows up in the film ),
eventually is what makes him say
such things as women's bodies are "hideous and ugly". But his inner
relationship with Dora makes up for
whatever lack of physical satisfaction may be present.
An outstanding film, with superb acting all the way around, this is really
more of a study of a gone by era,  and its attitudes, than it is the story
of Lytton and Dora. In the capable hands of a respectful director and sharp
actors, that era comes alive even more, even if it can not be found today.
Excellent film, well directed, and sharply made, in that it is tightly
thought out, and accomplished. It also
has some magnificent music by Michael Nyman, which is highly noticeable.

Title
Review for American Friends (1991)
If one was a Monty Python fan, one still follows the footsteps of the many
actors and writers it had in its midst.  And it is easy to see why they made
it, since they are indeed a group of good actors that are interested in
doing their work very well, albeit off the wall. Michael Palin is excellent,
and like A FISH NAMED WANDA, is very smooth and believable.  And this film,
is actually very nicely written and rather subtle in how the story comes
about.
And in the process it drops a scathing attack on one of England's oldest
institutions of higher learning and its idiotic belief that men must live
with men in order to preserve higher education.
This makes a good theme for Palin, who is well educated and read of a
gentleman.  The story is actually based on the memoirs of his father who
left the chance to become president of the Oxford college in order to take
up with an American girl whom he has come to like very much despite the fact
that the new president is the hypocrite that got her pregnant, and violates
the rules of the college many times.
On a holiday, into the Swiss alps, this educator (Palin) takes a vacation
and comes to meet an American girl (Trini Alvarado) and her mother (Connie
Booth).  The mother is making the rounds trying to find a husband, and in
doing so, the daughter is left behind at times, although the mother does
mean well.  In the process the young girl is the one who is falling in love
with the educator, as is the mother, but their situation seems hopeless
until they visit the college and get taken up by another educator (the new
candidate) who proceeds to take advantage of the desperate young girl, while
the mother is trying to land the best suitable candidate for the job. But it
is an impossible situation because the college does not allow the men to
marry, or to get involved with women, one of the old rules that stands to be
dropped.  Palin's stand is a bit on the old traditional values, and he is
afraid of making a decision.  But in the end he makes the right one, because
we have a Michael Palin and a wonderful story to tell.
Very nice film. slow at times, because the old institution is dusty and in
need of a good shakedown, but a real nice little film.

Title
Review for Andre (1994)
One thing is for sure when you undertake to see a George Miller film. It
will be well written and carefully paged all the way to the end, not leaving
many unanswered questions.  And it will leave you thinking  about the film.
Be it Mad Max, the Road Warrior, or things like The Witches of Eastwick, or
more recently, Lorenzo's Oil.  The scripts may not be the tidiest, or the
best, but somehow, this director makes it all look alright, and still come
off with a story.
ANDRE is a story for children, but it is also a nice story for adults. It is
the story of a seal that got spoiled by a family, that took care of it when
it was young.  And despite the fact that the man taking care of the seal
happens to be the local harbor master, and he is violating rules by keeping
an animal captive, he manages to do his job and make a friend here and
there.  And, during what seems like a bad fishing season, the seal, is being
blamed for the poor fishing that all the hard working fishermen are having,
or at least for the fact that the harbormaster is more worried about the
seal, than he is about the welfare of the fishermen.
In time, the seal ends up going to Boston, some 200 miles from where they
are, and becomes a star in an aquarium.  But more importantly, Andre becomes
a star attraction in the small community, and seems to attract many
tourists.  And despite a few hang-ups, the devil may care attitude that the
seal has, manages to get it and some people in a bit of trouble, but mostly
in good humor.
While there is nothing fancy in this film, there is some real nifty shooting
in the water watching seals, and Andre do his thing, this film is nice
enough to grab your attention.  It isn't great, but it is nice.  And the
kids will love it.  Andre is an attention getter, and quite a critic, and tv
watcher.  And much smarter than we give him, and other seals, credit for.
Worth seeing, make sure the kids see it.

Title
Review for Ginger e Fred (1986)
It seems that I have become more curios about this director since his
honorary Oscar, this past year.  While he is not a great writer of film, he
is a fun director to watch, because like Jean Luc Godard, he is quite
impossible to predict.  There are some stories here and there, and this film
has it, but all in all, it isn't the story of two dancers that entertained
the ballrooms of Europe by doing their imitation of the famous pair, as much
as it is the story of Fellini's opinion of the very Rome he lives in.  Maybe
we should assure him a candidacy for a top post, and he will accomplish a
bit more than Ciccolina ever has done, though it is felt by many that she is
doing a very good job.
Right from the start, we see the incongruencies, which Fellini wants us to
see about Rome.  It is dirty, ugly, and the Italians take to the streets
with a reckless abandon of dialogue, which can't be scripted, and is simply
shot as is.  As is costumary, the city life does not stop for the filming of
this work, and life just seems to continue
as if nothing had happened.  And the television studio, which is  sponsoring
the massive program, makes sure that everyone in this large cattle call gets
their two cents worth in.   Amidst these 'fifteen minute'rs' are Ginger and
Fred.  And it is a good thing
that there isn't a soccer match on television during the running of this
show, because no one would have paid attention to the show at all, if it
had.  In the beginning of the film, when some of the characters are checking
into the hotel, there is a major game, and the whole staff is more
interested in the game than  they are in the guests.
Amidst the life in the film of Fellini is his constant attack on the
insensitivity of many people, and also their sexual proclivity which appears
to run rampid.  It is all a part of the Rome, most tourists might never have
a chance to see.  And when the dreamy
qualities of the Ginger and Fred characters shine, the film literally
stops, and the music starts up.
While it isn't as bombastic as FELLINI'S ROMA, or SATYRICON, or the works
which were more extravagant and gave us a copy in KEN RUSSELL, it is still a
nice movie to see.  Despite the wonderful acting of both Masina and
Mastroianni, this film plods along with many gags and digs at the film
business, from its make up moments to the
costuming moments, to just about any second during the production at the
end.  And of course, every dignitary is present, including the Mafioso that
is being escorted by the police.  And the new age gets ripped apart, with
its idealistic look at things, rather than accept the reality of the moment.
Good Fellini film.
Fun to watch, and would give you an idea how much many Hollywood films have
influenced the television productions in Europe.  The stage show would do
Busby Berkeley very proud.

Title
Review for Don Juan, mi querido fantasma (1990)
This is another of those Spanish films that is really surreal, and off the
wall, and we watch it trying to make anything we can out of nothing.  This
is not a film for those looking for MEANINGS.  It is a fun, black satire at
times, full of unusual things, and surprises.
Both Spain, France and Italy are full of Don Juan stories, the famous man
who spent his time making it with as many women as he could.  His reputation
preceeded him, and women were always ready to take him on.  And there are a
few legends relating to him, and Casanova, which still live here and there.
One of them, is that on the day of Don Juan's death, he comes to life for
the evening to pick up a few more women to his endless list.
And this movie mixes a theatrical production of Don Juan with reality.  The
real Don Juan comes out of his grave ( naked ) and goes carousing.  And the
actor who is playing him, also tries, but he is a gay buffoon, that most
women don't like.  Amidst the mess they change places, and end up in the
weirdest of places, doing the weirdest things.  And Don Juan does get
another score, and so does the actor when some women do not know any better,
and the film keeps getting more surrealistic as it goes on.  The sequence of
street scenes, the changing of actors, the reversal of personalities ( a
dual role for the main actor ) gets highly complicated and lots of
fun.
Although I knew nothing of this film, and expected likewise, I did find
myself laughing several times.  The predicament of each character does
create a very funny situation.  And the film plays it up as much as it can.

Title
Review for Love Affair (1994)
Copyright (c) Pedro Sena 1997. All Rights Reserved.
One always wonder why these stories exist. It seems such a hopeless thing, a
romantic ideal that is often doomed to crash. But, in between,  is often the
story of a person, or two, that really tears our hearts apart, makes us cry,
laugh, pay attention, and then some.  But nice music all the  way through
helps us cope through a rather difficult situation.
This story of a double identity, is a magnificently original story, that
might be only unsatisfying in the end, but then, this is forgivable, since
the role is played by the same woman. The film fits, either way it decides
to end, although I have to admit that I have become spoiled by the Hollywood
stories... I wanted the two to meet, I really did.
The story centers around a girl whose fiancée just dies. She never really
met his friends, and all of a sudden, is meeting a few of them. By chance,
she comes across the guy's class yearbook, and she decides that she wants to
write a letter to her ill fated fiancée. One gets the idea that she does not
wish to let go of this one, and this is, of course, often dangerous.
But the film has an ironic twist right from the start. The girl sends off  a
letter, and it gets returned. And a correspondence starts.
And one comes to find out that this person, with the same name, is a woman,
instead of her ex-fiancée. And, on top of it, this woman has been linked to
him from the first day of school. And we learn of the whole story  through
these letters.
And the film keeps getting better and better, until it comes to an end. The
two women did not meet, but at least the hopeful woman has regained a
measure of caring and understanding for the fiancée she never had the chance
to  meet. Amidst these suggestions, is that both people with the same name,
actually liked each other, but could not do much about it, as the other
classmates were always teasing them, and playing tricks on them, which made
any connection almost impossible. And on top of it, people were always
making fun of them by putting them together, and teachers mixed them up all
the time.
There are a few things that stand out in this film, the major one being
Miho Nakayama, in the double role, which is excellent, and really well
designed and thought out. One does not really realize that it is the  same
woman that we are watching for a long time.
If there are a couple of things that are also interesting here, but at times
a bit odd, and more spontaneous than otherwise, is that the camera has the
habit of moving around a lot, and by virtue of its movements, it allows the
actors to really get into it without stoppages, which is the nicest thing
in the acting in this film. But there are times, when the camera is a bit
off key, for example in a setting when the young man friend of Hiroko, who
is trying really hard to pursue her. The camera is restless during that
moment, which is ok for him, but not for her. She is totally still the whole
time. But it creates a nice analogy for the film character and its doings.
She is a bit stuck in her thinking, and will not let this go. And everything
around her is moving along, even if it is not exactly what she was hoping
for.
The film ends on what could be considered a less than positive note, but I
think that we can tell that the young Hiroko is coming to grips with what
she has faced, and will come out of it.
Along the way, the film keeps adding moments of psychic suggestions and
connection, like when Itsuki is in the hospital in the end, and she can hear
Hiroko's words. These touches suggest that there is a much larger connection
between these two other than the young man, but the film never  takes to it,
and builds on it.... it could become a whole other film.
And like Kieslowski's film THE DOUBLE LIFE OF VERONIQUE, in this film the
inner characters never really make the total connection with their
doubles... but the possibility is now there, and right in front of the
character's face... and this is where the film ends.
Really nice film, with some great touches all the way through. It has some
lagging moments, but these come around as well. There are things that
happen that do not seem to make sense, but come clear a bit later.

Title
Review for Heart of Darkness (1994) (TV)
It's been a long while since Nicholas Roeg has done a film that suits his
ability.... that is, a film that is psychological, that is complicated, that
is hard to define, something that his work has not shown since the days of
PERFORMANCE, WALKABOUT, THE MAN WHO FELL TO EARTH, and to some extent
INSIGNIFICANCE.  This QUALITY adaptation of Joseph Conrad's novella stands
out as the directors finest piece in several years, and shows that he is
(still) quite a capable director.
HEART OF DARKNESS has been a well read story.  It also has been adapted in
many forms to the screen, the most famous of which is APPOCALYPSE NOW, by
Frank Ford Coppola.  But none of these adaptations, had ever been faithful
and close to the novella as this one has been.  The story is  in Africa
where the jungle was once considered a living hell, where the white man
could not survive the various diseases and the indigenous black people's.
As such, these jungle hells, were at one time considered the part of the
earth that associated with the horrors of man's mind, which had to be
conquered, and delivered from evil.  In the 60's, this kind of thought was
taken to Vietnam.  Today, it may be Bosnia, and  the former Yugoslav
republics.  Tomorrow it will be somewhere else, like South Africa.  But 100
years ago, Africa had it all.
And amidst the colonials that are out to make a fortune on ivory by killing
the elephant population, is a group that has mingled with the indigenous
cultures for various reasons.  Some for greed, some  because they got
stranded, and some for spiritual reasons. The story of the Commander Kurtz,
is one of a spiritual evolution, and one
that leaves behind its mark.  It is a dedicated attack on the mind of
everything that the industrial revolution has become.... a symbiotic evil,
where anything is killed in the name of progress, and greed. The English had
become the symbol of this type of people.  Their ruthlessness for adventure,
in the search for riches, took them to every corner on the face of the
earth.  And in every corner, there is a Kurtz, waiting to tell you his
story...... have we listened for the past 100 years...???? likely not... we
still rape, plunder, and plunge ahead, thinking our idealism is the law of
the land, and the mercy of the weak.  But the horrors will plague us as long
as this happens.... the horrors, repeats Kurtz, as he is dying.
The film has many of the bits and pieces which helped the story and defined
the Coppola film.  The fears which turn the characters into scared men, the
jungle diseases at the time, and of course, the enemy that stalks their
victims at every turn.  The enemy
always knows what is going on when we don't.  The enemy is powerful and we
are weak.  And Nicholas Roeg uses this, with close, tight angles of camera
work, to help define the novel even better... at every turn there is
something which can be seen,
but can not be defined.  And to those who are fearful, this can be a deadly
thing.  To those who have purpose and courage, this is a challenge for
life....... but as the novel tells us so well, a challenge of what....????
Outstanding set of performances, specially Tim Roth as Marlowe, the
adventurous captain, and John Malkovich as Kurtz.  The film was done in the
jungle'd places of Belize, and is nicely done.  It was originally done for
television, and later released on video. It is a very well done, and
faithful adaptation, of a master novelist, whose work still is of importance
today, still quite visible as the decaying industrial society still rapes
and plunders.

Title
Review for Family Viewing (1987)
Atom Egoyan is not easy to figure out. We don't really know if he wishes to
become a bit of a David Lynch, or if he wishes to become a bit of a Luis
Bunuel.  His films are full of surrealistic details which keep our
attention, but unlike Bunuel, or even Lynch, the
storylines are rather weak, and tend to be evasive.  Bunuel, we always knew
that the story was immediate, and that tomorrow and yesterday were always
around, we just never knew when.  But with Egoyan, the concern seems to be
how the characters are feeling now, and that's that.  It may be surreal, but
it should have much interest for psychiatrists and psycho-analysts, which,
unfortunately, we are not.
Egoyan even goes so far, on occasion, as to replay the scene in its
entirety, but unlike Godard, he does not give us a different conclusion to
direct us to a different set of circumstances.  The characters are trapped
in the play/replay of their videos and
life.  They are not connected.  And the film seems to be a series of slight
vignettes that eventually come together to tell a basic story of the teenage
son that is trying to grow
out of his father's shadowy image.  The film tends to blame that image on
the fact that the father has no liking for his mother. The son, seems to
know that, and is trying to correct it. He doesn't exactly dislike his step
mother, but he is not about to like her either.  But then, he doesn't know
his own  mother, until the end of the film.
There are some curious thoughts here.... television provides  a focal point,
but no connection to anything within it in particular, starting with the
aging grandmother.  And then,  there are telephones, which DO make
connections but not  quite the right ones.  In almost all the situations,
all the phone calls are used for the wrong purposes, and not to make things
right, nice, or ok.
While Egoyan makes a valid point in his film, and the later one THE
ADJUSTER, he is still lacking in the one part of this kind of filming that
defines weather a viewer stays or goes.  He doesn't let us in, what is going
on. Everything is hidden, as it usually is,
be it behind the TV camera, the telephone, or just appearances, like those
of his childhood.  But this part is, in this film, the one thing that is
probably best be left alone to die.  It drags the meaning, and the
resolutions into a film that lures you into wondering what it is about, but
not really giving a darn about what it really is about. This, it seems to
this reviewer, is a terrible attitude to take when it comes to this film.
It destroys it, and makes it no fun to sit through.
But there are enough eccentricities to keep us amused. The satirical side of
this film is deadly, and one could only hope that it had been able to
explore that side a bit more.
3 GIBLOONS
Copyright (c) Pedro Sena 1995. All Rights Reserved.
Member of the Internet Movie Critics Association

Title
Review for Pao Da Shuang Deng (1994)
RED FIRECRACKER, GREEN FIRECRACKER, is another film in the long list of
material that is dead serious bent on turning over a leaf in Chinese
history, where women are not important for anything except child bearing
and cooking.
And a good thing, too.  Because with strength like this, it will be a matter
of days before the whole thing crumbles and another large country falls
apart at the seems of its own viciousness.  Traditions have had a lot to do
with this stuff, and they seem to be hard to let go, specially when carried
out by the men.
This is the story of a firecracker factory that has become one of China's
best known and biggest.  It's leader has died, and the person to take it
over happens to be his daughter, who is immediately  forbidden to marry to
ensure that the fortune stays in the family. And the woman is watched every
minute to make sure that she does
not go beyond what she is told that she can, or can not do.
The rich family has everything that money can buy and work with.  And it is
now looking for another painter to do its decorations in their castle. But
unlike the previous one, he is a young man, in his prime, and he takes an
interest on the princess, and she takes an interest in him.  But their
love/hate relationship is a problem, not only
to her but to him.  Everyone around her, tries to make sure that she doesn't
do anything with the painter.  And the painter, tries everything he can to
make sure that something does happen.  And eventually, it does, and she
spends time with him.  But this pretty much creates havoc in her world.  The
elders are terribly upset, and
the man that has been charged with making sure that no one can reach her, is
all of a sudden being charged with not doing his job.
Eventually, a solution is found.  And that is that they will allow her to
marry a man that will agree to come into the family.  And a contest is set
up so that the suitors can vie for the prize.  And her suitor  is there, as
well as the man in charge of making sure that she does not meet anyone else.
After all these years, he is finally getting
a chance at getting to the lady he really loves, but can never say so.
The context comes to an end, and the film ends in a rather interesting way,
the woman is pregnant with the wrong man's child, and she did not marry.
And the film displays the cruelty that it has passed on down the ages to
many of its own people, a tradition that eventually is going to fall apart,
regardless of any resistance.  And films of this kind, while getting out of
the rather harsh and critical eye of the  Chinese system, get away with it,
as long as they keep it so historical that no one notices that this is still
going on today, by the very hands that are sharply cutting these films.
But the lyrical way this is done, is something else. This film, just like
many of Zhang Yimou's material and others, is just so well designed and
written that it is hard to fault it.  It is terribly difficult to sit
through sometimes, like TO LIVE, but, they are very satisfying in a way.
You know that the individual human spirit may be broken, but it will
survive, and its strength will one day shine, in another day and time....
and I, for one, sure hope so.
And not only for the sake of such beautifully directed works as this.
